Whether there is a way to punish him
to prevent such things from happening again
Or, how long until the restaurant is ready? Can you ask for me?
At the Zhejiang University Academic Conference, the students played the leading role and the research results opened people's minds - Xinhuanet
Use air to wash hands, use breath to judge the disease, and accurately search for the source of haze. Yesterday evening, at the opening ceremony of the 2016 Academic Annual Meeting of Zhejiang University, a series of academic achievements with big ideas were awarded.
The main researchers of these achievements are students, and the research covers major fields such as environment, machinery, energy, medical care, life sciences, humanities education, and so on. The students started from a curious idea and created many high-end inventions with practical value. Some of the projects have won awards both at home and abroad.
Biosensors: Your at-home doctor
Zhang Diming, a doctoral student from the School of Biomedical Engineering, demonstrated an on-site biological sensor for smartphones, which is only half the size of a smartphone.
"You just need to take a gentle breath, and this instrument can preliminarily detect your health status from the components of the gas you exhale. "
Zhang Dingming introduced that this set of sensors is connected to smartphones, and the health report will be displayed on the phone after exhalation.
The smart bracelets that can detect health conditions on the market usually detect physical parameters such as temperature and pulse.
This set of biological sensors uses graphene, a new material, and its target is chemical elements. Its sensitive "sense of smell" allows it to more deeply and accurately reflect the body's health status.
Intelligent surgical lights: doctors' high-energy eyes
In addition to smartphones, smart operating lights are also used in the operating room.
This invention won the silver award at the 44th Geneva International Invention Show in Switzerland this year.
Zhu Linjing and Shen Junfei, master students of the College of Optoelectronic Science and Engineering, started a new idea in the defects of traditional surgical lights and invented an intelligent LED surgical shadowless light.
"Many diseases are not detected early and not removed properly, which is related to the lights used by the doctors in the operating room. "
Shen Junfei said that for example, if the doctor can't see all the tumor tissue in time during the early examination of cancer, then the cancer cells will continue to spread.
The smart surgical light has four light plates, which enhance the difference between different tissues under illumination by adjusting the spectrum.
During the operation, the doctor can adjust the size, brightness, spectrum, color uniformity and shadow-free rate of the light spot according to the needs of the operation and personal habits at any time.
This kind of smart surgical lamp has been tested in Shaoyifu Hospital affiliated to Zhejiang University School of Medicine, Children's Hospital affiliated to Zhejiang University School of Medicine and other hospitals, and has received good feedback.
Last October, this invention won the first prize of the National Challenge Cup.
Washing your hands with air: water-saving and cool
Ordinary people just use water to rinse their hands, at most wipe some soap and squeeze some hand wash, while Li Qichang and his classmates invented a set of "air hand washing device".
All we need to do is stand at the basin and our weight will compress the air out.
"It's like a defibrillator.
The compressed air forms a fluid at the tap, which combines with the water.
That way, we can get our hands clean!"
The colour-changing reaction and bacterial residue tests proved that the effect of hand-washing by this method was the same as that of ordinary hand-washing.
This device only relies on our own gravity as the driving force, which can ensure the cleanliness and save 90% of the water, and the whole process is completely energy-saving and environmentally friendly.
Last year, this invention stood out among many top universities in the world and won the only gold award at the Second Global Major Challenges Summit.
Please arrange to return them to me as soon as possible, thank you.
Please cancel the order and return the cash, not points, and will not use #PRS_ORG# in the future!
The pickled vegetables with bones and the spicy pickled vegetables are not suitable for children to eat.
If so, order as soon as possible
There is none at the moment. Thank you.
He asked me to tell you where he is #PRS_ORG#
I can't wait, cancel the order
I bought #PRS_ORG#, but I wrote the wrong address
Can it be changed?
or cancel the order
OK, thank you
A very meaningful certificate - First Aid Certificate
It's one of the most important skills certificates I have, apart from my driver's license!
Let's popularize: First aid is actually an emergency rescue in case of an emergency, that is, rescue before the ambulance arrives.
It is well known that there is actually a period of time between the accident and the arrival of the ambulance, and it is this period of time that is the most critical.
This is when first aid is needed.
If I really had a heart attack, a stroke or respiratory arrest, our window of life is only four minutes, the golden four minutes!
So it is so important that people around you know first aid.
When someone around us falls down, we can use our professional knowledge to save him, instead of standing there stupidly and doing nothing. This feeling of helplessness is too terrible.
In China, there are 300,000 accidental deaths every year, and the most dangerous one is sudden cardiac arrest.
In the U.S. as a whole, about 15% can be saved.
In Las Vegas, 70% to 80% can be saved. In Shanghai and Beijing, it is less than 1%."
This is what Lu Le, the founder of First Response, said.
If someone is in cardiac arrest, with no breathing and no pulse, putting your fingers in their neck is useless.
It is only possible to save a person by doing artificial respiration and chest compressions.
I find that we do not have enough awareness to learn first aid at present, but it is too late when things happen, so I still call on everyone to learn this skill so that we can make a timely response when we face an emergency.
It might even save a life!
You can sign up for a first aid certificate at your local Red Cross training center. I signed up at the Red Cross training center in Zhuhai, and students get a discount.
P.S. The last picture is a record of the goals I wanted to achieve before I turned 25, and adding the first aid certificate to the goal list was something I did a few months ago, but I did complete it!
Next, I will go to take other certificates that I want to take. I plan to take a diving certificate. I saw a diving first aid certificate on Little Red Book before. It seems that I need to have a first aid certificate before I can take this certificate, so the first aid certificate is actually very useful!
I ordered ＃#NUMBER#
13 yuan for one shrimp dumpling?
I haven't tried
How could #NAME# not be clear?
One is 13 yuan?
Yesterday, #PRS_ORG# failed to deliver a meal. This time, I'm only given one shrimp dumpling to eat!?
Because I could see that it was valid when I entered the code before
First of all, let's talk about the conclusion. In my personal opinion, I think "Four Seas" is a full-fledged bad film, which is bad in every sense of the word.
But if you say that this film is not a bright spot at all, it is not at least the selection of music is pretty good.
There are many kinds of bad movies. This kind of movie allows you to sleep soundly in the cinema. This kind of movie allows you to be indignant after watching it. "Four Seas" is like a monkey on Emei Mountain for the audience. It can ignite your anger in countless ways.
In terms of insulting the audience, Han Han is really a genius.
The most painful thing about this film is that it seems to be a creature in the Cthulhu novel, indescribable, and full of loopholes, just like the windbreaker on Xiaoma's body.
Even after watching it, you'll wonder if there are any hidden metaphors, but when you think about it carefully, it's just a pile of crap.
First, I'll talk about some plots that are hard for me to understand.
The protagonist should live on a small island in the south, living with his grandmother.
Her grandmother had a wish to see the snow, and then the plot arranged for an uncle in the neighborhood to take her to the northeast to see the snow in a van.
Elderly people sitting in a van from the south to the northeast to see snow??
He and his father are very confident about this.
Then the old man had nothing more to say.
How did the heroine's brother get a business license to open a hotel in an abandoned ship?
Why can the little hooligans of the flying car party on the island easily block a section of mountain road?
Then the truck in the middle of the road stopped by the side of the road, and even the truck driver could not be found around.
The props are too obvious, aren't they?
Why would a credit-impaired, law-suspect fly-by-night become an auxiliary police officer?
Why don't you call the police for high-interest loans? The police in the movie even asked if there were any difficulties?
How could an adult who knows how to use a smartphone not know how to use a room card to open a door in a hotel, and then forcibly arrange to find the hotel owner and sleep in the doorway of the room?
This bizarre plotline permeates the entire film, to the point where it's so ridiculous that it hurts to remember it.
Worse than the plot is the movie's message, or lack of one, which is a hideous Frankenstein's monster.
At the beginning of the film, you will think it is a comedy. After 20 minutes, you will guess that it may be a motivational film. After watching half of the film, you will think that it may be a film that wants to show the difficulties of young people in small towns. After watching the film, you will have no idea what you have just watched, and you will have deep doubts about yourself. Why do you have to go to the cinema to enjoy the feces during the Spring Festival.
In fact, most people are also very familiar with the routines of all kinds of movies. For example, if you want to shoot a motorcycle racer, then it will be inspirational + comedy, and then tell the audience how a talented rookie will step by step to success.
If you want to shoot a love film, then you should honestly talk about the love and hatred between the small town youth who likes to ride a motorcycle and the waitress girl.
If you want to reflect reality, then at least your plot can't have things that are contrary to the real world.
(such as the character played by Yin Zheng, who just had his new motorcycle burned, and can still sing), you can't open some brain holes that even Kennedy couldn't stand.
As for the heroine who is not mentally retarded but acts like a 5-year-old child in some ways, I really don't know whether this is due to acting or the director's requirements.
Another thing that I don't quite understand is that as a race car driver, why does Han Han like to add car accident scenes in his own films so much?
Is the arrangement of such a film in the Spring Festival for the sake of adding trouble to the audience?
Application: Taida value encoder with battery box
Place of Origin: Shenzhen, China
The size of the battery box is as follows:
The following are the A2 series products:
CN1 connector CN1 signal I/O connecting line CN1 port use terminal block brake resistor
Low power encoder cable, medium and high power encoder cable, low power power cable, medium and high power power cable
Low-power drive line with brake; medium and high-power drive line with brake; encoder and power plug; servo battery box
1. The express delivery companies we cooperate with,
1) Cooperation delivery will be based on Wangwang signature!
2. SF Express
2. If the buyer urgently needs the product or has a time limit, it is recommended to choose SF Express, and it is recommended to pay on delivery. SF Express is relatively reliable, and the freight can be modified before payment.
3. If the buyer has any questions about the freight charged by our store, he can choose to pay the freight.
4. Heavy products are usually sent by logistics. Please contact us separately.
1. Our store supports 7-day return and exchange services. Due to product quality and wrong quantity issues, our store will bear the freight.
2. Non-quality problems of the product itself. If the buyer chooses the wrong model and other factors need to return or exchange, as long as the product itself has no problem and does not affect the secondary sales, our store supports free return and exchange service except for the freight. The round-trip freight needs to be borne by the buyer.
3. Our store does not support the return of goods due to the delay of express delivery, and the seller shall bear the freight.
4. Non-quality issues of custom-made products will not be returned or exchanged.
1. Is this product original and genuine?
Answer: If the original factory brand is not specified, domestic substitute products will be used.
2. Do you have fake products?
We are very sorry that we do not sell fake products. The so-called fake products have the original factory’s logo and packaging.
3. Is the domestic xxx produced by the original factory in China?
Answer: The domestic one is a substitute product, not a product produced in China by the original factory. It is just that all the domestic people use this term.
Professionally provide Mitsubishi, Yaskawa, Delta, Panasonic, Omron, Siemens and other domestic servo and PLC connecting cables, connectors and other peripheral accessories. The main products include servo encoders, power cables, control connectors, power aviation plugs, terminal blocks and cables, lithium batteries, PLC program download lines, connecting lines, brake resistors, field buses, wires and cables, and all accessories are strictly in accordance with Mitsubishi standards, and are custom-made by professional engineers.
and use the actual test of servomotor and PLC to ensure the provision of high-quality and durable products to customers.
Welcome to inquire!
Direct sales from the factory, welcome agents to wholesale!
Other lengths are also available by special order.
For more information on related customized products, please contact the store!
What does it mean if we just credit you the amount of the order?
Can I
Got it, but my 3 drinks all spilled
Check the concrete module production and processing equipment Zhengzhou well wall brick module equipment introduction:
Zhengzhou Yixin is a domestic concrete inspection well module brick machine device, inspection well block machine, well wall wall module machine professional manufacturer, from semi-automatic to fully automated production line.
After years of practice and development, it now has quality products, mainly producing hydraulic, mobile, and fully automated inspection well series equipment and supporting devices.
Check the concrete module production and processing equipment Zhengzhou well wall brick module equipment assembly site:
Inspection well concrete module production processing equipment Zhengzhou well-wall brick module equipment features and advantages:
The Yixin inspection well block brick machine device is widely applicable to the new building materials for urban underground structures such as coal, heat, water, electricity, and gas.
For example, various inspection wells of drainage and water storage facilities, rainwater outlets, square gutters, septic tanks, small structures, bridge wing walls, and so on.
The advantage of using concrete modules to build the inspection well is that the four sides of the module are concave and convex structures, which can be combined to form a chain lock.
The shear resistance of the well wall body is far better than that of the flat friction masonry form.
The module is a hollow structure. After the combination is built, the longitudinal holes are connected and the horizontal holes are connected. After the core is poured, a cast-in-place concrete network structure is formed, which has the effect of secondary reinforcement and waterproofing.
Each module has both horizontal and vertical reinforcement slots, and the horizontal and vertical reinforcement increases the overall strength of the structure.
In addition, the inspection wells and drainage wells built with concrete inspection well modules are not easy to collapse, sink or leak. The mechanical properties of the well wall modules are stable, the operation is simple, and the formed size is standard.
The concrete inspection well module brick machine equipment is equipped with intelligent control, data input and output device, one-touch touch-screen liquid crystal display, monitoring the whole process of mechanical operation, realizing ideal man-machine dialogue, automatic analysis of materials, density operation, safety logic control and fault diagnosis system.
The mechanical and hydraulic system of the wall body module of the well wall uses single-cylinder hydraulic transport and double-cylinder hydraulic transport.
The independent hydraulic integrated station avoids the influence of the vibration of the host on the hydraulic system, thus ensuring the reliability of the hydraulic system.
The concrete inspection well module brick machine equipment, cloth box, progress box, demoulding, rising, storage box door closing, and automatic conveying pallet are all independently completed by the hydraulic system, so as to reduce the wear and maintenance of the machine.
The concrete inspection well module brick machine adopts imported computers, electrical appliances, sealing and hydraulic parts, and the comprehensive performance of the equipment is stable and reliable.
The wall body module of the mechanical excitation platform uses a whole steel plate, the line cutting ratio of the platform is a mold without welding points, which makes the filler box swing freely and guide, and fully reduces the mechanical wear.
Reduce the mold load, fill and two-in-one encryption amplitude, adopt one-piece and full synchronization, table vibration and mold vibration, and ensure that the vibration effect is achieved.
The wall body module is equipped with a mechanical vibrator and a computer-controlled vibration amplitude. The vibration amplitude is adjusted according to the cost-benefit ratio of the raw materials. There is no wear-and-tear braking, thus extending the service life and reducing the cost.
The well wall module has dual functions of mechanical automatic control and manual control.
Inspection pit mould:
The inspection well of Yixin brick machine uses cement blocks on the surface:
A corner of the workshop of Yixin Company:
Check the concrete module production and processing equipment for the inspection well
The Zhengzhou well-wall brick module equipment can not only produce inspection well bricks, but also various standard bricks, hollow bricks, and road flower bricks.
At the delivery site:
Chongqing middle and vocational school pilot modern apprenticeship, enrollment is equivalent to an employee of the enterprise - Xinhuanet
Yesterday, the reporter learned from the Municipal Education Bureau that from this year, our city will pilot the “Modern Apprenticeship” talent training mode in 60 vocational and technical schools, and the students who are accepted for trial training will have the status of apprentices. After enrollment, they will be pre-enrolled as unit employees by the pilot enterprises.
The Municipal Education Commission required that the enrollment and admission procedures of vocational and technical schools and the employment procedures of enterprises should be standardized, and the dual identities of vocational and technical school students and enterprise employees should be clarified. According to the principle of two-way choice, apprentices, schools and enterprises should sign a three-party agreement. For the apprentices who have reached the age of 16 but have not reached the age of 18, a four-party agreement should be signed by the apprentices, guardians, schools and enterprises to determine the rights and interests of each party and the specific posts, teaching contents and rights protection of the on-the-job training of the apprentices.
Encourage pilot schools to adopt the modern apprenticeship form and cooperate with enterprises to carry out pre-job training and job change training for enterprise employees.
The pilot schools must reform the talent cultivation model.
The school and enterprises jointly designed the talent training plan, and jointly formulated professional teaching standards, course standards, job standards, enterprise master standards, quality monitoring standards and corresponding implementation plans.
The pilot is based on the training period as a pilot cycle. The student internship time in the enterprise is determined according to the professional talent training scheme. The on-the-job internship is generally 6 months.
In the enterprise practice, the enterprise should implement the enterprise group management mode. According to the characteristics of different professions, one master can lead 2 to 5 apprentices to form a learning group to ensure that students master the skills required for each training post.
According to the arrangement, from 2016 to August 2019, 60 city-level modern apprenticeship pilot projects will be determined in three batches in our city, with about 50 people in each pilot project, and a total of about 3,000 students (apprentices) will be trained.
According to the principle of first pilot and then implementation, from point to face, gradually promote, explore the establishment of a long-term mechanism for school-enterprise joint enrollment, joint training, and integrated education, effectively improve the job skills of students, improve the employment rate and employment quality of students.
My app says delivered but I haven't received it
I just ordered a takeaway, and I didn't know it was hanging on the door
Then, call for a re-send
I live in Sha Tin, why is the order in Hoi Fai Garden?
Did you get the address wrong
This vacuum cleaner has been considered for a long time, and finally cut the grass with a heavy heart. The vacuuming effect is good, and the dust in the house is obviously less. However, it is a little heavy to hold with one hand; the wet drag needs to be improved, and there will be dust marks when going back and forth; overall, I am very satisfied.
The cooker is quite heavy and looks high-end. It is suitable for a kitchen novice like me. My child says it tastes better than what I cook. I have cooked two meat and two vegetable dishes, and the sweet and sour pork ribs are especially delicious. It takes a little longer to cook, but the cooking time is very short, and the noise is very small. You don’t have to worry about cooking too much, and you don’t have to worry about not knowing how to cook!
After receiving the goods, I couldn't wait to cook three dishes at noon. It is true that technology changes life. The control of temperature and seasoning is very accurate. The taste of the dishes is directly upgraded to the level of a chef, which is not bad. For those who are not good at cooking, it is an artifact. I recommend buying it!
I've added a new member to the kitchen.
A smart cooker, the kind that automatically controls the temperature and automatically stirs.
No more fear of being scalded by hot oil, no more fear of not controlling the heat and burning or undercooking the food.
The fried dishes are much better than mine, and the fried tomatoes and eggs are very delicious, and the taste of the eggs is very good.
This pot was worth the money.
The east and the west are not bad, worth buying, very good
Overall, it is very good, very clear, and consistent with the description.
It's worth having.
The customer service is also very good.
The screen is large and clear, and the eyes are not tired. No other abnormalities have been found for the time being.
It is much thicker than the current mainstream display, and the frame is a bit wide. The gap between the frame and the screen is a bit large, but the screen display effect is good, and the accessories are complete.
Logistics is fast!
The service attitude of the merchant is good!
After using it for some time, the quality is good, and the screen resolution is also very clear.
Stock trading is very good, 4 points for a minute, too perfect
The logistics is fast and the goods are good. I bought the second one. It is indeed a good thing. The display screen is of high quality. It is not distorted because of the large screen. All the interfaces are complete.
It looks good, the color restoration is good, and the quality is good!
The China Children's Center will hold a series of activities to let children have a “high-tech” “June 1” – People’s Daily Online
Xinhua News Agency, Beijing, May 20 (Huang Xiaoxi, Zhou Shanshan) The reporter learned from the China Children's Center on the 20th that during the Children's Day on May 28 to June 1, the China Children's Center plans to hold a series of activities such as children's creator experience, children's visual art festival and parent-child book festival, so that children can spend Children's Day in the charm of cutting-edge technology.
It is understood that the activities held by China Children's Center during this year's Children's Day include the "Love Home, Create Cool" Children's Future Learning Carnival, the First Children's Visual Arts Festival, the "Book Carnival" activities, the "Whole Family Love Reading" picture book series activities, etc.
Li Zhongming, deputy director of the China Children's Center, said at the 2016 Children's Day media briefing held on the 20th that the Children's Future Learning Carnival was the key activity for China Children's Center to celebrate Children's Day this year.
The activities focus on integrating social innovation with family and individual creativity, and through children and family participation in various innovative education activities, to make innovative practices become the cultural genes of the majority of families, and make "hands-on" become a new learning and living style for the majority of families.
It is reported that the "Love Home Cool" children's future learning carnival includes the "Bean Fruit Creator" experience activities, the 1st anniversary celebration of the Old Bull Children's Exploration Museum and the "Explore All the Family's Love and Children's 61st Birthday" activities, the VR nationwide experience plan, and the "Creator Tribe" interactive workshop and other dozens of cutting-edge technology experience contents.
Barbecue pork rice turns into kimchi pork rice
Will we have to buy another $100, $200 to use it?
The worry is how long it will take to complete
Okay, thank you
Did the same rider deliver it to me?
May I ask if you can help to follow up?
The restaurant said the food had been ready for more than half an hour
But no rider showed up to pick up the food
South African doctor: Omicron is highly contagious, but mostly mild
Many doctors and medical experts in South Africa believe that the symptoms caused by the Omicron variant of the new coronavirus are milder than those caused by the Delta variant, although it spreads faster.
According to the Associated Press, as the Omicron variant spreads in South Africa, a group of more than 5,000 doctors in Gauteng Province, South Africa reported that the symptoms of the new coronavirus patients they are currently treating are relatively mild, such as body pain and coughing, which are similar to flu-like symptoms.
Dr Unben Pillay, the head of the organisation, says he sees dozens of patients a day, but none of them need to be hospitalised.
Pyle said: "They are able to control the disease at home, and most people recover within 10 to 14 days of isolation. "
He said this includes older patients and those with health problems, who are more likely to become critically ill from a coronavirus infection.
He said compared to the previous wave of the Delta epidemic, the new coronavirus patients he treated "were short of breath and had low blood oxygen levels.
Many people will need to be admitted to hospital within a few days."
Other doctors have also shared similar experiences in the two weeks since the omicron variant was first reported in southern Africa.
While it will take weeks to collect enough data, the doctors' observations and early evidence provide some clues.
According to the summary of the South African National Institute for Communicable Diseases, only 30% of the new coronavirus patients who were hospitalized in the past few weeks were severe cases, which was half of the proportion of severe cases in the previous wave of the epidemic; the average hospital stay was reduced from 8 days to 2.8 days; only 3% of the recent new coronavirus patients died, while the death rate in the early outbreak of cases in South Africa was as high as 20%.
"So far, almost all the evidence suggests it's a milder illness," said Willem Hanekom, director of the African Health Research Institute, citing data from the National Institute for Communicable Diseases and other reports.
He added: "It's early days, we need to get some late-stage data.
In general, hospitalization and death occur later, and we've only been in this wave of the epidemic for two weeks. "
At the same time, scientists around the world are monitoring case numbers and hospitalizations while testing the efficacy of current vaccines and treatments.
While Delta remains the predominant strain of the coronavirus around the world, Omicron cases are emerging in dozens of countries, with South Africa as the epicenter of the outbreak.
According to health officials, new cases discovered in the first week of December increased by 400%, and more than 90% of the cases tested positive for the Omicron variant.
Thank you to today's supporters, all 80 boxes have been sent out!
Ingredients for the beauty-nourishing soup:
The function of wood ear: sweet in taste and neutral in nature, it belongs to the lung, stomach, and kidney meridians; it has the functions of strengthening the sperm, nourishing the kidney, lubricating the intestines, benefiting the stomach, nourishing the qi, harmonizing the blood, strengthening the heart, nourishing the yin, moistening the lungs, generating body fluid, strengthening the body, nourishing the brain, invigorating the mind, beautifying, tendering the skin, delaying aging, and prolonging life; it is used to treat lung heat cough, lung dry cough, women's irregular menstruation, gastritis, constipation, and other diseases; it is a good tonic for patients with yin deficiency and excessive fire who are not suitable for warm and nourishing tonics such as ginseng and deer antler.
The role of peach gum: bitter in taste, neutral in nature, and belongs to the large intestine and bladder meridians.
Efficacy: It has the effects of nourishing blood, promoting diuresis, relieving diarrhea, relieving pain, replenishing water, and moistening the intestines. If you have constipation, you can eat more peach gum.
The function of wolfberry: neutral, sweet, and belongs to the liver and stomach meridians.
It nourishes the liver and brightens the eyes, nourishes the liver and kidneys, whitens and beautifies the skin, replenishes the essence and generates body fluid, and delays aging.
The function of red dates: sweet in taste, neutral in nature, and related to the spleen and stomach meridians. It has the effect of nourishing the spleen and stomach, invigorating qi, generating body fluid, nourishing blood, calming the nerves. If the spleen and stomach are weak and the qi and blood are insufficient, people with insomnia can take more red dates.
The function of longan meat: it has a sweet taste and is warm in nature. It belongs to the heart and spleen meridians. It is suitable for those who are deficient in both the heart and spleen.
Longyan meat can also moisturize the skin and beauty, nourish blood and calm the spirit, nourish the heart and spleen, strengthen the yang and benefit the qi, and people with anemia are also suitable to take it. People with insomnia are also suitable.
The function of lotus seeds: sweet and astringent in taste, neutral in nature, returning to the heart, spleen, and kidney meridians.
Nourish the heart and calm the mind, heart palpitations and insomnia, stomach deficiency, forgetfulness, heart restlessness and thirst, nourish and supplement the deficiency, and stop urinary incontinence.
Therefore, this beauty and health soup is not only a dessert, but also a health tonic!
Eating more can make you feel well-being!
It is not as expensive as bird's nest, so you can eat as much as you want without making a hole in your pocket!
The food has gone cold, and the food may go bad
Order #NUMBER#, which was originally estimated to be delivered at 18:40, was changed to the current estimated delivery time of 19:15!
Dinner time is limited, please handle it as soon as possible!
I didn't get it
How could it be completed in just 5 minutes after placing the order
Where can I see the actual discount code details?
Education commentary: What does it take to save abducted children?
If we compare it with the famous public welfare advertising slogan of “there is no killing without buying and selling”, then, in the good environment where there is no demand for “trafficking”, group prevention and group control, and all-people anti-trafficking, will make the trafficking behavior unprofitable, high risk and high cost, and this kind of crime will not happen again and again.
Recently, the Ministry of Public Security's Criminal Investigation Bureau launched an emergency release platform for missing children information developed by the anti-trafficking department.
It is an Internet information platform established for the purpose of establishing an authoritative channel for the release of missing children’s information and finding abducted children in a timely manner.
When I heard that the app is called "Reunion", I felt very warm.
The new technology is not only named "art" and full of feelings, but also well applied to informatization. It is practical and effective.
The first goal of anti-trafficking law enforcement is to find the abducted children and protect their personal safety and freedom.
The second is the trial and punishment of the suspect.
There are many "big words" to describe the meaning of criminal punishment, such as individual punishment, social prevention, and legal education.
However, before the trafficking case is solved, the victim's personal safety should be prioritized.
Matters are divided into light and heavy, and urgent and non-urgent. Under the urgent "rescue" purpose, controversial issues such as "whether child trafficking should be sentenced to death" can be temporarily put aside and discussed with caution; but the rescue of abducted children must not be delayed.
According to the experience of handling such cases, human traffickers tend to move away from the scene as soon as they get their hands on the victims.
If the search for missing children is delayed by one minute, the child will be one step further away from the parent, and the difficulty of solving the case will increase by one point.
In this case, it is indeed a practical action to take out effective methods such as the "reunion" platform that are directly helpful to solve cases and recover children.
After all, "beating the staff" is a big task that requires the operation of the entire legal system.
To combat crime, protect the rights and interests of children and parents, from the improvement of legislation, to judicial protection, and the meticulous law enforcement, there is no need to implement the care of "protecting the young and helping the weak".
Moreover, the prevention of child trafficking can be bettered from the family to the society.
For example, a common case is that a family of three rested at the train station. The parents slept. When they woke up, they found that the child was missing.
You can't expect a two-year-old to have enough self-protection skills, but as a parent of a young child, you should at least have some protection awareness.
Parents taking turns to rest, or placing their children in a safe place, are the most basic means of preventing children from being abducted.
On the other side of the police crackdown on child trafficking, the buyers of trafficked children should also be paid attention to and punished.
A single illegal act is often just one link in a long chain.
According to the Chinese Criminal Law, the minimum sentence for child trafficking is 5 years, and for particularly serious cases, the death penalty and confiscation of property can be imposed.
The sentencing starting point is high, and the maximum punishment is severe. Under the trend of "light punishment", the crime of trafficking in children is obviously a crime with more severe punishment.
However, there are still many trafficking cases every year.
It can be seen that some people have outdated views on the upbringing of children and have little legal awareness.
The legal education for this group of people should keep up with it.
It is not enough to rely solely on official law enforcement to effectively control trafficking crimes.
If the “trafficking market” is widespread, the traffickers will be greedy for money, constantly innovate trafficking methods, and form a “struggle” situation with the law enforcement officers. The anti-trafficking actions will inevitably fall into the low-efficiency quagmire.
Therefore, breaking the backward ideas and popularizing legal knowledge can also help to eradicate the crime of buying and selling children.
Yang Haodong explained the spirit of the 6th Plenary Session of the 19th CPC Central Committee and the Provincial Party Congress at Malanshan
Draw inspiration from the 100-year history of the Party
Hunan Daily on December 10: According to the unified arrangement of the Provincial Party Committee, on the morning of December 10, Yang Haodong, member of the Standing Committee of the Provincial Party Committee and Minister of the Provincial Party Committee Propaganda Department, gave an interactive lecture at the video and creative park in Malanshan. He studied and implemented the spirit of the 6th Plenary Session of the 19th CPC National Congress, studied and implemented the important speeches, important instructions and important instructions of General Secretary Xi Jinping on Hunan, and studied and implemented the spirit of the 12th Provincial Party Congress.
Yang Haodong expounded the core connotation and practical requirements of the spirit of the 19th CPC National Congress from three aspects including ideals and beliefs and the original mission, self-revolution and the youth of the great party, and the party’s leader and the party’s theory, combining his own feelings and experience.
He pointed out that it is necessary to combine the spirit of the National Congress with the spirit of General Secretary Xi Jinping's important speeches and important instructions on Hunan, as well as the spirit of the Provincial Congress of the Communist Party of China, to learn, understand and integrate, and enhance the ideological self-consciousness, political self-consciousness and action self-consciousness of defending the "two establishments" and doing the "two maintenance", and move forward unswervingly along the direction pointed out by General Secretary Xi Jinping.
In the interactive communication session, representatives of grassroots cadres, representatives of enterprises, and representatives of young people asked questions about the relationship between the three historical resolutions, how to understand the decisive significance of "two determinations", how cultural enterprises should grasp the direction, and how young people in the new era should draw strength from the century-old history of the party. Yang Haodong answered them one by one with simple language and vivid examples. He sincerely advised the young party members to draw strength from the 100-year history of the Party's struggle, to closely unite around the CPC Central Committee, to follow the Party unswervingly, and to write their responsibilities and dedication with their youth.
The number of graduates from higher education institutions in Beijing is expected to reach 268,000 in 2022-Xinhuanet
Xinhua News Agency, Beijing, December 11 (Reporter Yang Na) The reporter learned from the video conference on the employment and entrepreneurship of 2022 graduates of Beijing universities jointly held by the Beijing Municipal Education Commission and the Beijing Municipal Human Resources and Social Security Bureau recently that the number of graduates from Beijing universities in 2022 is expected to reach 268,000, an increase of 16,000 from last year.
A relevant person in charge of the Beijing Municipal Human Resources and Social Security Bureau said that Beijing will deploy the employment work of university graduates from the aspects of strengthening supply and demand matching, strengthening policy support, expanding employment channels, ensuring assistance for difficulties, supporting innovation and entrepreneurship, and improving service efficiency.
The reporter learned that the Beijing Municipal Human Resources and Social Security Bureau will set up a practice platform, increase the supply of jobs, actively contact the 40 university graduate workplace experience bases, visit employers, integrate demand information and job information; focus on the "six batches" , that is, expand the recruitment of public institutions, expand the recruitment of state-owned enterprises, expand the recruitment of grassroots projects, expand the recruitment of military service, expand the recruitment of employment internships, and expand the recruitment of entrepreneurship and employment; implement "one person, one policy" dynamic management, recommend at least 5 job information for each graduate, and ensure that 100% of the graduates from difficult families with employment intentions are assisted.
In fact, I don't know whether the store made a mistake or the rider made a mistake
There was no receipt in the bag
Couldn't be traced
I hope you understand
Because the delivery time was 30 minutes earlier than the display
No, thank you
Yes, it's a different rider now.
He's waited a long time
The restaurant has been saying it's in the process of dealing with it.
Waited for a few hours
The International Olive Oil Association divides olive oil into two large categories, virgin olive oil (Virgin Olive Oil) and refined olive oil (Lampante Olive Oil or Refined Olive Oil), and five levels.
Extra virgin olive oil, also known as natural olive oil, is obtained by mechanical cold pressing from fresh olive fruits, followed by filtration and other treatments to remove impurities.
It can be classified into three levels according to its acidity:
Extra virgin olive oil (EVOO): This is the highest grade, highest quality olive oil and is a pure natural product.
It has a delicate and pleasant plant aroma, with an acidity of no more than 1%.
Fine Virgin Olive Oil (FVO): The acidity is slightly higher, but not more than 2%, and the taste is pure and fragrant.
Ordinary virgin olive oil (Ordinary Virgin): the taste and flavor are acceptable and the acidity is no more than 3.3%.
Refined olive oil refers to the olive oil obtained after refining the first-pressed olive oil with an acidity of more than 3.3%, or the "second oil".
Refined olive oil can be divided into two grades:
Ordinary olive oil (Olive Oil): Refined olive oil mixed with a certain proportion of first-pressed olive oil to adjust the taste and color, with an acidity of less than 1.5% and a transparent light golden color.
Refined olive-pomace oil or olive-residue oil: It is obtained by extracting it from the pomace and refining it.
As you can see from the grading system, the acidity of the olive oil is a very important indicator.
Just like grapes used to make wine, olives from different regions and different varieties of olives produce olive oil with different standards.
The best place for olive trees to grow:
The Mediterranean coast has the most suitable soil and climate conditions for the growth of olive trees, including temperature, sunshine, air humidity and rainfall.
Other regions can only be planted sporadically in suitable areas, except along the Mediterranean coast.
Main production areas (the Mediterranean):
Italy, Spain, Greece, Turkey, Portugal, Morocco, Syria, Israel, Tunisia, Algeria, Egypt, Pakistan, Lebanon, and so on. There are also Argentina, Peru, and South Africa, which are far away in the southern hemisphere, with similar climates.
The harvest month of the olive oil:
The olive tree flowers and fruits from March to June, and the fruits start to develop and ripen from July to October, turning from green to red, purple, and finally black.
November to February is the time to pick the fruit (the freshness of the olive oil is very important).
The nutritional composition of olive oil:
Olive oil is rich in abundant monounsaturated fatty acids, including oleic acid and linoleic acid, as well as vitamin A, vitamin B, vitamin D, vitamin E, vitamin K and antioxidants.
Olive oil is considered to be the most nutritious oil of all the oils discovered so far.
Democracy summit ends, Biden says flame of freedom will never be extinguished
The online "Summit for Democracy" convened by US President Biden and attended by government leaders and civil society and private sector leaders from 110 countries around the world concluded on Friday (December 10).
In his closing speech, Biden said the flame of freedom burns in the heart of every person in the world, and no dictatorship can ever extinguish it.
He also said that a second global "democracy summit" is planned to be held next year.
On the second day of the summit, representatives of the Taiwan government, Tang Fenghe and Hong Kong democracy and human rights activists who are currently in exile in the United Kingdom also made speeches.
Mr. Biden said: "We know the work that lies ahead of us is immense.
But we also know that we can meet the challenge, as I have said before, and as this summit has shown, democracy is everywhere.
The fire of freedom can never be extinguished by a totalitarian government. It burns in the hearts of people everywhere and all over the world."
Biden also said that defending democracy requires the joint efforts of the whole society.
He said: "As leaders of the government, we have a responsibility to listen to our citizens, strengthen the fence of democracy, promote reform, implement transparent and responsible governance, and resist the power of authoritarianism and those who want to seek naked power before the public interest. "
The themes of the second day of the Democracy Summit were defending human rights, consolidating democracy and countering authoritarianism, and countering digital authoritarianism and affirming the value of democracy.
This day coincides with the International Human Rights Day.
The Secretary-General of the United Nations, Guterres, also stated in his opening speech on the same day that democracy is facing challenges across the world, especially the challenges brought by emerging digital technologies.
He said: "Now is the time to reaffirm our common values and positions and the resilience of democracy.
This requires deepening social dialogue, tackling inequality, fighting corruption, updating social contracts, investing in quality education and expanding opportunities for women and girls.
This also requires a resolute condemnation of all forms of populism, nationalism and extremism, including the use of all tools provided by the technological revolution. "
Hong Kong democracy and human rights activist, Law Ka-chung, delivered a speech at the summit via a pre-recorded video, reminding the participants to continue to pay attention to the human rights situation of ethnic minorities in China, including Hong Kong, Uyghurs and Tibetans.
He said, "For a long time, the world has been directly affected by China's rise, but no mechanism has been established to hold it accountable.
This is why politicians and civil society leaders must work together.
We must use all we have (resources) to ensure that the revival of democracy is our top priority. "
Law Ka-chung also called on the free world to unite and fight against the threat of the Chinese Communist Party.
He said: "Maybe some of you are afraid of offending General Secretary Xi Jinping, maybe some of you don't want to lose the Chinese market, and maybe some of you don't realize the threat of the CPC to our democratic values.
And that's why we failed.
That's why we have to change. "
Tang Feng, a member of the Executive Yuan of Taiwan, released the "State Declaration" through a video at a roundtable discussion on "Combating Digital Dictatorship and Affirming Democratic Values", and emphasized that Taiwan is standing at the forefront of fighting against despotism and authoritarianism.
He also shared his experience on how to fight against COVID-19 through information transparency and building mutual trust.
He said, "At a time when Taiwan's democracy is thriving, we have always stood firmly at the forefront of the global fight against authoritarianism, and played a leading role in promoting global freedom, democracy and human rights.
During the epidemic, the authoritarian governments in various places have justified the violation of human rights in the name of public health and collective interests, and global democracy has shown signs of regression.
However, in Taiwan, we do not need to close the city to control the epidemic, and we do not need to withdraw to defeat fake information. "
At the same time as the second-day agenda of the “Democracy Summit”, the US Treasury Department announced that it would impose legal sanctions on 15 individuals and 10 entities in China, North Korea, and other countries that have been determined to have seriously violated human rights, and at the same time impose investment restrictions on a Chinese company that has been determined to use surveillance technology to assist in the violation of human rights.
I have already taken photos and uploaded them to you
I know.
But the restaurant didn't know why the delivery kept getting delayed.
Originally wanted #NUMBER#
In any case, I won't call him
I'm not eating it
I will definitely complain
Why didn't you say it earlier if you couldn't send it?
I've been waiting for you for so long
No, I didn't get a call
Please ask him to send it to our company
I don't want to wait #NUMBER# more minutes
A meal took an hour and a half
#PRS_ORG# has not been delivered
I want to cancel the order
Why not cancel
Hi, the chicken sent by the restaurant is raw
I want to try tennis, but I'm afraid that I can't persist, so I want to find a similar price to practice first.
It is not friendly. In fact, the price is often directly proportional to the degree of friendliness. If you can't tell the difference, then the expensive ones will be more friendly than the cheap ones. This kind of "entry-level camera" is actually industrial waste.
They are very low in strength, and when the ball hits the racket, the vibration is very large, and hard balls can't stand it, and it is very difficult for experts to control it.
Their logic and subtext are: Tennis is so difficult that you know you won't be able to learn it, and you know you won't be willing to buy an expensive one, so we'll give you a cheap one to fool you. You'll play a couple of times, and then you won't want to play anymore. This way, the racket is cheap, and you won't feel bad about it.
When you are really able to distinguish between good and bad, it means that you have made progress, and then you can come back to me to buy the expensive ones, and I will earn twice the money.
It is recommended to buy a second-hand racket for a similar price. You can choose Prince or Dunlopa. These two brands are not well-known, so the good rackets are not expensive. A new racket costs 500 or 600 yuan, and a second-hand one costs 200 yuan. Do you enjoy the experience of having a 1,000-yuan racket?
It is friendly to beginners, but it is useless after passing the beginner stage. However, most people, especially girls, cannot pass the beginner stage.
The order has been repeatedly delayed in delivery time.
May I ask if you could help follow up on this?
Postponed
Thank you
In other words, I already have credit?
Do I need to place a new order next time? Do I need to ignore the original order?
Hello, I ordered the food from this restaurant, but the food I received was missing a lot, and the chicken was also raw
#PRS_ORG# I don't know why you want me to withdraw, please cancel
I placed an order for delivery, and there was no such thing as self-pick-up.
Jiangxi will train 10,000 rural primary school teachers in three years - Xinhua
Xinhua News Agency, Nanchang, May 22 (Reporters Chen Yushan) The reporter recently learned from the Education Department of Jiangxi Province that in order to enhance the guarantee ability of the shortage of subject teachers and realize the balanced development of rural compulsory education, from 2016 onwards, Jiangxi Province has planned to use three years to train one qualified music, art and physical education teacher for each primary school in the rural areas (townships and below) in the province, with a total of 10,000.
It is understood that this training targets rural primary school teachers in Jiangxi Province who are 45 years old or younger and have a basic knowledge or talent in music, art, and physical education, and can serve as other subject teachers for music, art, and physical education classes.
Through the training, they will master the basic knowledge and teaching skills of the subject, update the teaching ideas and concepts, master the modern teaching methods, improve the teaching ability, activity design ability, campus culture ability and self-development ability, and build a team of multi-talented music, art and physical education teachers, so as to alleviate the shortage of rural music, art and physical education teachers.
In order to ensure the quality and effect of the training, Jiangxi also planned to train one person in each of the 100 counties (cities and districts) of primary schools in music, art and physical education, with a total of 300 trainers, to comprehensively improve their teaching demonstration leading ability, design and organization ability of teaching and research activities, training ability and network training workshop construction ability, so as to play the role of teaching, demonstration, guidance and supervision.
Because waiting for another 20 minutes is already 1 hour #NUMBER# minutes
I don't want food that was prepared an hour ago
I have found the buyer of the previous wrong order
But my wheel cakes are gone
The editor brings you the best cleansing cream.
How good is the facial cleansing cream?
1, Han Shu skin care cosmetics set for moisturizing, moisturizing, whitening, freckle removal, brightening skin tone, light sense of white gift box five-piece gift box (cleansing milk, toner, lotion, freckle essence, eye cream)
Reason for recommendation: It has the effect of pulling and tightening, peptide repair, shaping tight skin, saying goodbye to skin sagging, improving the crow's feet and fine lines around the eyes, and the moisturizing effect is very excellent, and it can quickly penetrate the skin.
This product has a shelf life (year) of 5. The product packaging has anti-counterfeiting features. The effect is whitening. The net content (mL/g) is a set. The product packaging has a gift box. It is suitable for mixed skin. The effect is to fade spots. The effect is moisturizing. The effect is moisturizing. The product packaging has an outer box. The effect is to lift and tighten. The product packaging is sealed. The product place of origin is Suzhou, Jiangsu. It is not a special-purpose cosmetic. The effect is other. Currently, more than 14,000 people have commented on it. It has received a 99% praise rate. They commented that it is very easy to use, well packaged, high-end and atmospheric.
2, Han Shu skincare cosmetics set of hyaluronic acid, mild cleansing, moisturizing and moisturizing, big water light moisturizing luxury gift box set of six (facial cleanser, toner, lotion, essence cream)
Reason for recommendation: It has the effects of repairing, moisturizing, whitening and tightening the skin. It can improve the problem of rough skin and large pores. It is very suitable for mixed skin. It is clean and not dry after washing.
This product has a shelf life (year) of 5, whether it is a special-purpose cosmetic or not, the product packaging has anti-counterfeiting, suitable for mixed skin, efficacy moisturizing, suitable for skin age 25-34, net content (mL/g) 120ml+120ml+100ml+6g*3, efficacy moisturizing, the product packaging has an outer box, the product packaging has a seal, the product origin is Suzhou, Jiangsu, and currently more than 7,700 people have evaluated it, and it has received a 99% positive rating. They evaluated it as refreshing and comfortable, with a good moisturizing effect, and high-end and elegant.
3. OSM cosmetics set, nutritious skin care crystal color flawless moisturizing moisturizing cleansing milk skin care gift box for women (facial cleanser + toner + eye cream + cream + face cream)
Reason for recommendation: Deep skin cleansing, help you wash off the dust and oil on the skin, fine pores, and can fully nourish the skin, effectively moisturize and remove dark spots, can improve the dark yellow and spot conditions of the skin, and continue to use to help enhance the skin's self-repairing ability and help the skin restore its firmness.
The shelf life (years) is 4 years, the place of origin is Huzhou, Zhejiang Province, whether it is a special-purpose cosmetic, the effect is soothing and calming, the effect is whitening, the net content (mL/g) is a set, the effect is moisturizing, suitable for any skin type, the effect is moisturizing, the product packaging has an outer box, the effect is fine pores, the effect is deep cleansing, currently more than 220,000 people have evaluated it, and it has received a 98% approval rate, and the evaluation is that it is comfortable to use, relatively high-end, and the packaging is good.
4. Hanhoo (Hanhoo) Red Pomegranate Fresh Care Six-Piece Set (Skin Care and Cosmetics Set, Moisturizing and Moisturizing, Student Girls, Cleanser, Toner, Cream, Eye Cream, Gift Box, Formal Wear)
Reason for recommendation: Deeply cleans the dirt in the pores, softens the aging keratin, tightens the skin, fades the fine lines on the face, softens and plumps the face, improves the skin quality while moisturizing, prevents the occurrence of small wrinkles, and is suitable for all skin types. It is gentle and non-greasy.
Hello, how long will it take to deliver the ordered food?
People have already finished work.
Your driver's phone number is #PHONENUMBER# and his name is #NAME#
Please give us a reasonable explanation
Yes, but your rider has a problem, please deal with it properly
Can you check if it is still on its way? It would be best if it could be delivered
OK, if there's not, I'll get my money back for the reservation.
In fact, there are many things to pay attention to when dressing and matching for slightly fat girls.
The skirt worn by girls with a fat body must not be too short or too long. The length is about the knee, which can just cover the fat part of the thigh.
If the skirt is too short, it will reveal the fat on the legs.
If it's too long, it will make you look short and fat.
If you wear it in the upper, middle and lower three segments, it will make you look naturally tall, that is, the upper body, skirt and long stockings use different colors, which will produce a sense of elongation.
In fact, many dark-colored clothes are the standard for slightly chubby girls (the author knows this very well), and dark colors are also a good way to hide your body fat. The dignified and elegant black short skirt is also the first choice for slightly chubby girls.
Wearing dark-colored clothes, especially black mini-skirts, will make you look thinner.
If you have chunky calves, don't wear socks or shoes that draw attention to them.
The more popular it is, the better, and the color should not be too bright.
So as not to make people feel fat when they look at your legs and feet.
For slightly chubby girls, you must know the tricks of dressing and matching.
Chubby girls should not wear tight-fitting short skirts. In addition, the top should not be too short or tucked into the skirt, which will make people feel very uncomfortable. If the legs are thick, they should wear black long socks or grid socks (the kind with fine grids), choose soft-textured printed flared skirts, and pair them with a collarless top, which can effectively conceal the shortcomings of chubby girls.
Of course, chubby girls also need to pay attention when wearing short skirts.
If you wear a short skirt, you should choose a top that matches the color of the skirt to make you look taller.
Short skirts with high heels can make your legs look more slender, which is the most popular combination in summer!
If you are a girl with a fat upper body and thin legs, it is recommended to choose a gorgeous one-piece short skirt.
It can not only cover your big belly, but also show your advantages.
An A-line short skirt will make you look thinner, and it is more suitable for fat girls. You should choose a tight top to create a sense of layering, which will make you look thinner.
A simple white T-shirt with a short skirt can also be tried by a fat girl.
Girls with a little more meat on their bones can also wear stylish clothes.
As long as they can grasp the rules of dressing and matching, slightly fat girls will also be the focus of everyone's attention.
After changing the way of dressing, we should also exercise more in daily life. Let's strive to get rid of the label of "micro-fat girl" a day earlier 😄
The 18th World Beverage Innovation Awards (World Beverage Innovation Awards) was jointly held by FoodBev Media and the Nuremberg International Beer, Brewing and Beverage Industry Exhibition (Brau Beviale) in Germany.
It attracted 279 works from 25 countries and 22 different categories.
On October 15, the list of finalists was announced. The final list of winners will be announced online on November 11 (British Summer Time).
We saw that Yuanqi Forest’s LP28 no-sugar yogurt was nominated for the best dairy beverage award, Yili’s “GOGO Wuhan” marketing was nominated for the best marketing activity award, and Pepsi and People’s Daily New Media’s packaging was also nominated for the best packaging design/label award.
Laura Nettle, Senior Marketing Director for FoodBev Media, said: "We are delighted to be celebrating the 18th year of the World Beverage Innovation Awards alongside Brau Beviale.
From new flavours, new concepts and new functions to brands, packaging and manufacturing, we are seeing trends in the beverage industry as the industry continues to innovate in a more sustainable way.
The World Beverage Innovation Awards recognized the most ambitious new products and developments in the global beverage industry this year.
Here's the full list of finalists in each category.
The technology developed by Ardagh Group can melt 100% recycled glass into new bottles.
The bottled water comes in a box which is 100% recyclable, reducing packaging by 66% and carbon emissions by 97%.
LatCub is 100% biodegradable, uses less paper, and does not use environmentally harmful glues or tape.
The technology developed by Ardagh Group allows 100% recycled glass to be remelted into new bottles.
The final award list will be announced on FoodBev Media's YouTube channel on November 11 (UK time), and FBIF will continue to report on it. Stay tuned!
Why so long?
I'm starving
From the estimated time of 7:30 to now
Don't pick up if you can't handle it
I can go out and buy my own food, I don't need to wait here for #PRS_ORG#
Xinhuanet+丨The Beijing Youth Ice Hockey League Fueled the Winter Olympics Enthusiasm - Xinhua News Agency
On December 11, in the game, Pang Yaotian (center), a player of Beijing Dream Team, made a shot.
On the same day, the 2021-2022 Beijing Youth Ice Hockey Club League continued to compete in major ice rinks in Beijing.
This year's league is divided into regular season and playoffs. The age range of participating athletes is from U6 to U18. The groups are divided into competitive groups and selection groups. It attracted nearly 3,600 players from 256 representative teams in the city to participate.
After more than ten years of development, the Beijing Youth Ice Hockey League has become a platform for Beijing's young ice hockey enthusiasts to exchange skills and make friends, and to provide excellent players for the Beijing Youth Ice Hockey Team and Youth Team.
The league has played a role in promoting ice hockey among Beijing's young people, ignited the enthusiasm for ice hockey at the Winter Olympics, and laid the foundation for the development of ice hockey in Beijing after the Winter Olympics.
Girl uses herself as a target to raise funds for her sister: "It's better to think of it as a skin wound" - Xinhuanet
At Wulin Square in Hangzhou, a girl stood in front of a large wooden board with the words "human target, 10 yuan per shot" written on it.
Yesterday morning, a photo of a "Hangzhou girl willing to be a 'target' to raise funds for her sister" went viral on WeChat Moments.
The photo shows that a girl in Hangzhou Wulin Square is standing in front of a piece of wood that is slightly taller than a person, with the words "human target, 10 yuan per arrow" written on it, indicating that people can use bows and arrows to shoot after paying.
This behavior has aroused heated discussion among netizens.
Last night, the publicity director of Xiacheng Sub-bureau of Hangzhou Municipal Public Security Bureau confirmed to the reporter of Beijing News that the police confirmed that the girl made such an extreme move because of her sister’s fund-raising, but this kind of behavior is not worth advocating. After being advised, the girl left the local police station yesterday.
Girl's street 'dartboard' fundraising warned
In the circulated picture, a long-haired girl stands in the shape of the character “个” in front of a large wooden board. The words “human target, 10 yuan per arrow” were written in black ink on the wooden board. On another wooden board in front of her, her bank account number and WeChat and Alipay account numbers were written.
The photo has caused controversy since it was posted online.
Some netizens believe that this move is "begging for attention", and many netizens have expressed their sympathy.
"We found the situation when we patrolled to the square around 10:00 a.m. on the 23rd. At that time, there were already a lot of onlookers. "
The policeman of Tianshui Police Station near the scene told the local media that there were two girls in their early 20s. They were dressed in a youthful and beautiful style.
One of the girls was crying and begging passers-by to play the game; another girl was shouting on the side, saying that her friend’s sister had leukaemia and urgently needed surgery, and asked everyone to help.
"We contacted the local police in Guizhou and learned that the girl was raising funds for her sister's leukemia treatment. "
Last night, the publicity director of the Xiacheng Branch of the Hangzhou Municipal Public Security Bureau told the Beijing News reporter that the girl's name was Jijiali, and she was raising funds for her sister Jijiayan.
However, since the treatment still costs more than 300,000 yuan, they could not think of a good way to raise funds, so they did this.
He said that during the whole process, one of the two girls was the target, and the other was in charge of assisting, but did not participate in it. During the whole process, no one was found to shoot arrows, but some people watched and took photos and posted them on Weibo.
Later, the police determined that the bow and arrows used were not subject to control by the public security department.
The official said, "We don't encourage this kind of attention-grabbing fundraising. "
She left the police station after being warned by the police.
Heat dissipation performance: good Thinness: convenient Appearance material: satisfactory Acer has always been very cost-effective.
The new machine is very good.
Its performance is stable, and there is no problem with heat dissipation from the four air outlets. It is worth recommending.
This ASUS ROG gaming laptop is pretty good. The workmanship and materials are sufficient, and it is a reassuring brand!
The price of the Acer Predator Helios 300 is not expensive.
In my opinion, the Acer Shadow Knight Dragon is really good. The game effect: The game effect is comfortable, and you can play most of the games. The frame rate of my chicken eating is stable, and it is very smooth. LOL is not a problem. CSgo is also easy to deal with. Most of the three-A games can be played.
Heat dissipation effect: The heat dissipation effect is good, the fan is very powerful, it is very quiet during work, and the fan is not small when the game effect is fully opened.
Appearance material: The appearance is quite cool, and the game laptop is very cool. Display effect: The screen is very clear. 1080 is enough to play games.
It feels pretty good to buy a notebook. It's mainly used for design, and it has a high price-performance ratio. It's lighter than I imagined, and it looks better than I imagined. The red on the butt is a very beautiful wine color. It's not so gaudy. Overall, it's much better than expected. It's worth buying, and it's pretty suitable for girls.
I started to get in touch with the Honor Night Rider two years ago. After two years, it is cost-effective and of good quality!
My friends around me also recommended them to buy this product!
I've already bought three machines in this series!
It looks beautiful and has a good configuration.
I bought it for my nephew. I wanted to wait for the 418 bank activity, but he needed it urgently, so I bought it in advance, so I didn’t catch up with the bank’s big activity, which was a little regretful.
However, the cost-effectiveness is quite high, and the logistics is quite fast. Let's come back and review it after using it for a period of time.
This is a brand-new gaming laptop with high cost performance. Its design style is very good and it has already installed Windows 11 and Office 2019.
The display effect: I bought it for my child to use for 3D rendering. The software has been installed, and my child says that it can be used without any problem. This computer can be used for 3D design work.
The one he bought for his son, he said, is very good.
The computer is good, especially the customer service attitude is very good. If you don't understand, just ask. I recommend buying it.
Not bad, the quality of the game is really nice
What's the hottest thing in 2021?
There is no doubt that it is the Tokyo Olympics.
Do you think that only Olympic athletes can win awards?
Recently, an article titled "Look! Project Managers Can Win the Gold Medal in the Olympic Games" was very popular. It mentioned that in many projects, project managers could definitely take the lead, and no one could compete with them: moving bricks, going on business trips, and staying up late are the daily routine of project managers, and firefighting, taking the blame, and apologizing are not a problem.
The article, which appears to be a joke, reveals the daily bitterness of project managers. Behind it represents the powerlessness of the current project management work.
People engaged in project management have also gradually chosen to take some actions to get rid of the difficulties in their work.
From the increasing number of applicants for the PMP (international certification for project management professionals) every year, it can be seen that more and more project management practitioners are improving their project management capabilities through learning.
According to the "Report on the Development of Project Management in China in the Past 20 Years (1999-2019)", as of September 2019, the total number of PMP® exam candidates in the country was nearly 600,000, the number of PMP® certified people was about 420,000, and the number of effective certificate holders was about 300,000, accounting for 31.2% of the global PMP® certificate holders.
The number of PMP certified people has increased year by year in the past 10 years, which indicates that more and more project managers realize that it is no longer feasible to rely on the "old experience" to do things, and the ever-changing work environment makes us know that we need to stand on the shoulders of scientific giants to explore the road ahead.
However, does passing the PMP guarantee a smooth sailing in project management work?
Many project management beginners said that they can learn the knowledge points such as the ten areas and five process groups of project management in a systematic way by studying the related courses such as PMP/IPMP, but they are still confused when they really do project management work.
Many project managers often feedback the following problems: lack of awareness of project management, relying solely on personal experience, having a lot of project management theory but not knowing how to put it into practice; lack of systematic project management process and system support, unable to implement in work, project estimation is not accurate, control sensitivity is poor, and the project is delayed again and again; the division of labor is unclear, and the "old hands" in the team do not know how to deal with it; cross-departmental assistance communication is not smooth, and it is difficult to promote the project...
Therefore, focusing on product innovation and R&D management for more than ten years, it has helped many excellent enterprises to cultivate a large number of product managers, project managers and other key R&D talents, and won the honorary titles of “China Enterprise R&D Management Talent Training Demonstration Base” and “Research and Development Project Manager Special Training Camp” online course of Zhongtian Huaxia Consulting came.
This is an online course of "Research and Development Project Manager Training Camp". It is a way of online fragmented learning, which combines the practical cases, tools and methods of many R&D enterprises. It helps you master the necessary knowledge and standard actions of project managers, and take the next step in your own project management.
This is also an opportunity for enterprises to use lower costs and less investment to promote the cultivation of project managers and bring high-efficiency operation results to enterprises.
This course is not only given by the Zhongtian Huaxia expert team (the original Huawei R&D management team), in combination with international advanced project management methods and many well-known enterprises' real business scenarios, to give in-depth and easy-to-understand professional explanations of the course content.
It will also provide scientific and practical management tools and methods, as well as rich templates and forms to help students apply what they have learned to their specific work after class.
Only one order of siu mai?
Why are there six chopsticks?
Before Double 12, Jinshi advocated rational consumption for consumers - Economic Observer - Professional financial news website
This year's "Double 11" carnival nationwide network payment business transaction amount reached 1.77 trillion yuan, which was a new high compared with previous years.
The variety of discount coupons, the eye-catching live-streamed shopping once again made consumers call out the benefits. This wave of consumer enthusiasm, on the one hand, made people sigh that the national consumption power is increasingly strong, and on the other hand, they could not help but calm down to think about the impact of consumerism on society and the contemporary mainstream consumer group.
Before the arrival of “Double 12”, Jiexin Consumer Finance Co., Ltd. (hereinafter referred to as “Jiexin”) issued a call for rational consumption, reminding all users, especially young people, to establish a good consumption awareness and consumption habits, and to refuse blind consumption and excessive consumption.
According to the results of the "Consumer Financial Literacy Survey Analysis Report" released by the People's Bank of China this year, the national consumer financial literacy index is 66.81, which is 2.04 higher than that in 2019.
Generally speaking, the performance of Chinese residents in financial consumption is good, but there are large differences in financial behavior and skills, and it is necessary to further improve the level of basic financial knowledge.
The financial literacy of the elderly and adolescents is relatively low, and "one old and one young" will continue to be the focus of financial education. The "Chinese Young People's Debt Situation Report" released by Nielsen and the "2019-2020 China Youth Consumption Report" released by CCTV Finance show that young people have great consumption potential. Credit consumption has become an important channel for consumption upgrading. 86.6% of young people are using credit products, and nearly half of them do not have debt accumulation. Although the overall consumption trend of young people is rational, it is very different from the "excessive waste" label attached by the outside world. However, some young people do have over-consumption and follow-the-trend consumption behaviors, which have caused great financial pressure and debt risks, and even led to a gradual increase in social problems. Financial enterprises should be willing to take on social responsibilities and provide positive guidance.
As a licensed consumer finance institution, Jiexin has always been committed to helping people build their own happy life with high-quality and considerate services. It advocates consumers to establish a good and correct consumption concept, and actively responds to regulatory calls, and takes practical actions to improve the rational consumption awareness of consumers, especially young people.
Over the past few years, JCB has carried out all-round and diversified financial knowledge popularization activities for young people, including university students. Through cooperation with top domestic universities and the launch of innovative practice competitions and other forms, it has subtly guided the consumption needs of young people, helped them establish the concept of rational consumption, and reasonably plan their consumption needs, and thus helped them to accumulate life wealth.
At the time of Double Twelve, Jiexin reminds all consumer friends to establish reasonable consumption awareness and correct money view, resist blind consumption and over-consumption, avoid consumption loan mistakes, and avoid affecting personal credit and future economic life.
When it comes to consumption, one must plan in advance, and pay back on time within one's means.
If the payment is overdue, the overdue record will be recorded in the personal credit report, which may have a negative impact on your economic life in the future, such as buying a car or buying a house.
At the same time, when enjoying financial products and services, it is also necessary to choose regular institutions and channels, and pay attention to whether the relevant institutions have business qualifications.
In the future, Jiexin will continue to rely on its mature and reliable consumer finance system and continuously updated and iterative financial products to provide consumers with more demand-oriented and diversified services, constantly help the public improve their financial knowledge, help consumers cultivate the concept of rational consumption and moderate borrowing, and become a trustworthy consumer finance partner for consumers throughout their lives.
I'm not going to
I deliver according to the order
No one has ever contacted me in an hour. This is a scam on the Internet
Do you think this is the first time I've ordered takeout?
After the investigation, you will say the same thing! I checked the address several times before placing the order.
Okay, thank you! How many days?
Vietnam People's Daily - Gulf Cooperation Council faces common challenges
Saudi Crown Prince Mohammed bin Salman's stops included Oman, the United Arab Emirates (UAE), Qatar, Bahrain and Kuwait.
It is worth noting that this is the first visit of the Crown Prince to Qatar since Saudi Arabia and its Arab allies imposed a ban on Qatar in mid-2017, which led to a diplomatic crisis in the Gulf.
In this crisis, Saudi Arabia, the United Arab Emirates, Bahrain and Egypt cut off diplomatic relations with Qatar and imposed a full embargo on it, accusing Qatar of supporting terrorist organizations and having close relations with Iran.
Diplomatic tensions have seriously affected the internal unity of the Gulf Cooperation Council, and had a negative impact on the economy of the countries in the region.
Four Arab countries have blocked all land, sea and air routes to Qatar.
The crisis was only resolved at the Gulf Cooperation Council summit in January 2021, when the Gulf states signed a US- and Kuwait-brokered agreement toward "unity and stability."
Saudi Arabia has reopened its border with Qatar.
Saudi Arabia and Egypt are taking the lead in restoring ties with Qatar by appointing new ambassadors to the country.
The Gulf Arab states' resolution of their differences to restore ties with Qatar stems from a need to unite for the interests of each country and regional stability in the face of common challenges.
During the visit of the Saudi crown prince to Oman, the two sides agreed to open the first direct land channel between the two Gulf neighbors.
The 725-kilometer-long channel connecting the two countries will provide convenient conditions for the travel of the citizens of the two countries and the integration of the supply chain.
The Saudi Public Investment Fund (PIF) will invest $5 billion in Oman, and the two countries have signed 13 memoranda of understanding worth $30 billion.
The Saudi Crown Prince's visit to the Gulf countries comes at a time when Iran and the world's major powers are negotiating to save the Iran nuclear agreement called the Joint Comprehensive Plan of Action (JCPOA) - an agreement which the Gulf Arab countries have denounced for being unable to solve the issue of Iran's missiles.
The Gulf countries have always regarded Iran as a long-term "competitor", and regarded Iran's nuclear plan as a "threat" to regional security.
Gulf countries believe that it is flawed not to solve the Iranian missile problem and not to take action to curb Iran's activities in the region.
In the background of the major countries and Iran nuclear negotiations failed to meet the wishes of all the Gulf countries, Saudi Arabia and Iran conducted direct negotiations.
Its aim is to contain the escalation of tensions in the region.
This has been a factor in slowing economic growth in the Gulf Cooperation Council countries.
The upcoming GCC summit will be the first GCC summit since the dispute between some member states and Qatar ended.
This is an opportunity for the Gulf Cooperation Council to re-evaluate and make diplomatic achievements to promote the recovery of the Gulf Cooperation Council and make contributions to the unity of the Gulf Cooperation Council. At the same time, a series of measures have been put forward to make the member states fully cooperate to cope with common challenges and make contributions to the stability and development of the Gulf countries.
It has not been delivered from 7 o'clock to 9:30, and the deposit must be refunded and the order must be canceled.
OK
It claims to be the loudest supercar exhaust sound in the New District!
This car brought by our team this time is the dream of many men!
It is the flagship supercar of Lamborghini, the successor of Murcielago — Aventador LP700-4!
The asking price is nearly two million Malaysian ringgit, and the annual road tax is about ten thousand Malaysian ringgit. It is four-wheel drive. Why is it called the LP700?
With 700 horses under the hood, can you imagine how fast it is?
As for the editor, I don't know. The data says that the acceleration from 0 to 100km/h only takes 2.9 seconds. That is, when the editor's Myvi reaches 30km/h, the other party has already reached 100km/h. Well.
The low body, the arrogant scissor doors, the large air intakes all over the body, and the 6.5 V12 engine that can be seen through the glass, perfectly interpret the style of Lamborghini.
There's no need to say too much about the car model. You can just Google it. The editor has compiled some explanations that may not be given by Google!
Too much attention. Wherever I go, everyone is looking at me. It's not comfortable! (Actually, it's kind of cool.)
1km of fuel costs about RM1 (car owners don't care at all)
Practice getting in and out as it can be a bit awkward (because you can't climb out and get stuck halfway)
The engine was too loud, and after getting out of the car, my ears were instantly deafened. (But it was still very cool.)
The car is too big. It is very narrow to park in a normal parking space, and I'm very afraid that it will be knocked by the car next to it when it opens the door!
A little lonely, because there were no opponents on the road (I said it myself, it has nothing to do with the car owner, haha)
Don't misunderstand, the supercar in the video is not for sale, sorry!
Friends who want to shoot videos for their cars are welcome to contact us!
For more car news you don't know, visit The Car Guide / People's Car Guide.
It involves a car accident worth tens of millions of dollars!
Bugatti Chiron and Porsche 911 are known to car enthusiasts. Chiron is one of the most expensive supercars in the world, and the price of Porsche 911 is also at the million level!
The day before that, a million-dollar Porsche 911 and a ten-million-dollar supercar, the Chiron, were crashed by foreigners in just a few minutes!
Look at the results, and you will see that you were right!
Let the spirit of universities resonate with the spirit of the times - Xinhua
The so-called university spirit refers to a series of educational ideas and value pursuits formed by a university in the process of development, which is the soul of a university.
From ancient times to the present, the university spirit has been crucial to the development of politics, economy, culture, science and technology and society, and the progress of a nation.
Since the birth of the first modern university in the world, universities have shouldered a unique mission that is different from other social organizations. For Chinese universities, it was born in the autumn of national crisis, and its spirit is deeply influenced by traditional culture and the changes of the times. It advocates the value concept of "cultivating virtue and benefiting the world" and the patriotic responsibility of "strengthening the country with education".
At present, the trend of informatization and internationalization of higher education is becoming more and more obvious, and the global education competition, science and technology competition, and talent competition are intensifying. As an important "supply-side" of higher education, its structural reform is facing unprecedented opportunities and challenges.
In particular, the proposal of the Overall Plan for the Coordinated Promotion of the Construction of World-class Universities and First-class Disciplines has not only shown the confidence and determination of China to move from a big country in higher education to a strong country in higher education, but also put forward higher and more updated requirements for the development of universities.
How to strive to enter the ranks of the world's most popular in a short period of time, accelerate the construction of several world-class universities and a number of world-class disciplines on the basis of still having some gaps, and achieve "overtaking on a curve"?
In addition to having confidence in the goal, path and ability, universities should also fully play their three advantages: the first is the latecomer advantage, through the continuous introduction of overseas outstanding academic talents, learning and borrowing the advanced experience of world-class universities, and realizing the significant improvement of academic level and educational quality; the second is the cultural advantage, inheriting the wisdom content of five thousand years of Chinese civilization, promoting the development of excellent traditional culture, and thus gathering strength, shaping brands, and enhancing images; the third is the institutional advantage, playing the institutional superiority of socialist countries, strengthening the goal-oriented, gathering the power of consensus, optimizing resource allocation, and providing a sustainable and solid guarantee for the school to catch up with the world's advanced level.
It is particularly important to realize that building a world-class university cannot be a one-size-fits-all approach. Each university must play to its strengths while showcasing its individuality and characteristics.
Educational characteristics must have the common Chinese characteristics and also reflect their unique target positioning, educational tradition and resource endowment.
In terms of Zhejiang University, we emphasize three aspects in our education: First, we emphasize the cultivation of innovative and entrepreneurial talents, build an integrated education and training environment for the integration of science and education and the combination of schools and enterprises, and form a complete chain of entrepreneurial education ecosystem; Second, we emphasize the characteristics of interdisciplinary integration, promote the optimization and adjustment of the discipline system, create an institutional environment for interdisciplinary integration, and actively cultivate interdisciplinary emerging disciplines and characteristic interdisciplinary achievements; Third, we emphasize the characteristics of the education system and social services, carry out in-depth international exchanges and cooperation, and speed up the formation of the pan-Zhejiang University industry-university-research cooperation system.
In this process, it is particularly important to always adhere to the university spirit and let the university spirit resonate with the spirit of the times.
For Zhejiang University, the school motto of "seeking truth and innovation", the common values of "diligence, virtue, discernment and sincerity" and "embracing the Yangtze River and the Yellow River, seeking truth and virtue, opening the way for the people, and building my country" constitute the latest expression system of the spirit of Zhejiang University.
This is an important guarantee for the school to adhere to the correct direction of education and continuously accumulate cultural height and spiritual power. It is rich in connotation and profound in significance.
Among them, "Haina River" emphasizes the spirit of openness and inclusiveness, embodies the spirit of "using the world's talents for me", and shows the quality concept of learning from the world's top universities; "Qizhentongde" emphasizes the spirit of seeking truth and goodness, that is, universities should not only pursue the truth, but also accept the cultivation of morality and the tempering of personality; "Kewumianmin" embodies the spirit of reform and innovation, which not only contains the pursuit of new knowledge and the innovation of scientific research, but also embodies the reform and development, and the overthrow of the old and the creation of the new; "Shouwuguokun" emphasizes the spirit of patriotism and dedication, which means that universities should always be with the destiny of the nation.
This series of spiritual concepts and value pursuits is the soul of Zhejiang University's 120 years of education.
"Those who are intelligent listen to silence, and those who are wise see what has not yet taken shape."
Chinese universities should further take root in the overall cause of socialism with Chinese characteristics, deeply grasp the era position and historical mission of higher education, and accelerate the construction of world-class universities.
At the same time, it will adhere to humanistic care and independent freedom, so that the university spirit and the spirit of the times, the spirit of the nation will be mutually stimulated, so as to provide inexhaustible power for realizing national prosperity and national rejuvenation, and realizing the common ideal of human beings.
Ordered a set meal and got 2 things wrong
The order
want to pay a service fee to the rider
How to pay now
Iranian President: If sanctions on Iran are lifted, the Iran nuclear talks are expected to reach an agreement - Xinhuanet
Xinhua News Agency, Tehran, December 11 (Reporters Gao Wencheng and Wang Shoubao) Iranian President Raisi said on the 11th in Tehran, the capital of Iran, that if the United States lifts its sanctions against Iran, the Iran nuclear issue comprehensive agreement talks can reach a "good agreement".
According to the news released by the website of the president of Iran, Raisi said in the meeting with the ambassadors of Iran to the neighboring countries that day that Iran has proved its negotiation sincerity by submitting proposals to other parties to the Iran nuclear agreement.
If the US side makes up its mind, "the way to reach an agreement will be smooth".
The parties to the Iran nuclear agreement began to hold talks in Vienna, the capital of Austria, in April this year to discuss the resumption of compliance between the United States and Iran.
The new round of negotiations began on November 29 in Vienna, suspended on December 3, and continued on December 9.
Still haven't received the take-out
Please contact the rider
Xi Jinping sent a congratulatory letter to the 2021 Greater Bay Area Science Forum - Xinhua Net
Xinhua News Agency, Beijing, December 11 - On December 11, President Xi Jinping sent a congratulatory letter to the 2021 Greater Bay Area Science Forum.
Xi Jinping pointed out that the world is currently experiencing a great change that has not been seen in a hundred years, and the global technological innovation has entered a period of intensive and active development. The new round of technological revolution and industrial transformation has had a profound impact on the global economic structure.
The Guangdong-Hong Kong-Macao Greater Bay Area should focus on the strategic positioning of building an international science and technology innovation center, strive to build a global science and technology innovation highland, and promote the development of emerging industries.
China is willing to work with scientists from all over the world and international science and technology organizations to closely carry out international science and technology exchanges and cooperation, strengthen the research on major scientific issues, promote the breakthrough of common science and technology, deepen the cooperation on key scientific projects, and jointly promote the development of world science and technology and better benefit mankind.
The 2021 Greater Bay Area Science Forum opened in Guangzhou, Guangdong Province on the same day, with the theme of "exploring the future and sharing science". It was hosted by the People's Government of Guangdong Province.
Yes, the order is accepted
But the restaurant called to say they needed to cut the meat and bones apart because the rider didn't deliver bones
Do you understand my question?
It is not an order delay
Or you can call me directly
Is it being followed up on?
The longest time for undergraduates in Guangxi to suspend their studies for entrepreneurship is up to 5 years - Xinhua News Agency
Xinhua News Agency, Nanning, May 19 (Reporter Zhang Ying) Recently, reporters learned from the Education Department of Guangxi Zhuang Autonomous Region that in the future, all universities in Guangxi will implement a flexible academic system, relax the year limit for students to take a leave of absence, and the year limit for students to take a leave of absence to start a business can be extended by 2 to 5 years on the basis of the original academic system, and the time for taking a leave of absence to start a business can be regarded as the time for practical education.
In order to promote the improvement of university students’ entrepreneurship and innovation ability, Guangxi’s education, human resources and other departments have jointly built an entrepreneurship platform, built more off-campus practice teaching bases for university students, university science and technology parks, university students’ entrepreneurship parks and entrepreneurship incubation bases, and provided external guarantees for university students’ entrepreneurship.
According to requirements, by 2020, the area of innovation and entrepreneurship practice base in each university should reach more than 3,000 square meters for undergraduate schools and more than 2,000 square meters for vocational schools.
The government encourages colleges and universities to set up innovation and entrepreneurship credits, and give priority to supporting students with excellent performance in innovation and entrepreneurship practice to change their majors.
University teachers should spend at least two months at industry enterprises every two years for internship and training, so as to improve their awareness and ability of innovation and entrepreneurship education.
The Education Department of the Autonomous Region required all universities in Guangxi to carry out the innovation and entrepreneurship training plan for college students in depth, and strive to make every college student participate in one innovation and entrepreneurship training plan during their stay in school.
Colleges and universities should actively organize students to participate in various innovation and entrepreneurship competitions at all levels, and give financial support.
NEWS GOV-MO: University of Macau awards honorary doctorates to 7 outstanding individuals
The University of Macau held the “2021 Honorary Degree and Higher Degree Conferment Ceremony” on the 11th, and awarded honorary doctorates to Liu Zunyi, Chen Kaixian, Nakamura Shuji, Li Lanjuan, Li Xiaoliang, Zhu Lilan and Jiang Chaohui in recognition of their outstanding achievements and major contributions to the development of society and education.
At the conferring ceremony, the Chief Executive and Chairman of the University of Macau (UM) Council, Secretary for Social Affairs and Culture of the Macao Special Administrative Region (MSAR) Government, Ao Ieong U, accompanied by the President of UM, Song Yonghua, and the Chairman of the UM Board of Directors, Lam Kam Seng, presented the honorary doctorate degree.
Professor Liu Zunyi was awarded the Honorary Doctorate in Education, Professor Chen Kaixian was awarded the Honorary Doctorate in Science, Professor Nakamura Susumu was awarded the Honorary Doctorate in Science, Professor Li Lanjuan was awarded the Honorary Doctorate in Science, Professor Li Xiaoliang was awarded the Honorary Doctorate in Business Administration, Professor Zhu Lili was awarded the Honorary Doctorate in Science, and Ms. Jiang Chaohui was awarded the Honorary Doctorate in Science.
In his speech, Ouyang Yu first gave a warm congratulations and high respect to the seven outstanding people who were awarded honorary doctorates. They made extraordinary achievements in different fields and made outstanding contributions to the development of the country and the progress of the world. At the same time, Ouyang Yu expressed the most sincere blessings to the graduates and their parents, and also expressed his heartfelt respect to the dedicated and academically excellent teaching staff team of the university.
When Professor Sun Yifeng, a lecturer at the Australian Academy of Humanities, read Professor Liu Zunyi’s eulogy, he said that Professor Liu Zunyi was a world-renowned economist known for his outstanding academic achievements and forward-looking educational philosophy.
Apart from his achievements in economic development, economic growth and East Asian economy, he is also a far-sighted education leader.
In short, he has made great achievements in many fields.
When Sun Yifeng read the praises of Professor Nakamura Shuji, he said that Professor Nakamura Shuji was a pioneer of sustainable energy technology.
He is one of the three recipients of the 2014 Nobel Prize in Physics for the invention of the blue light-emitting diode (LED).
Professor Nakamura's invention has not only completely changed the lighting industry, but also led to the widespread application of white light-emitting diodes in daily life and industrial production, making a huge contribution to human well-being.
When Sun Yifeng read the praises of Li Lanjuan, he said that Professor Li Lanjuan was the pioneer of artificial liver in China and created a unique and effective Li’s artificial liver system, which made a major breakthrough in the treatment of severe hepatitis and liver failure, and significantly reduced the death rate of liver failure.
In the battle against COVID-19, she and her team proposed the "four resistance and two balance" scheme and the three major technologies of artificial liver, microecology and stem cells, which significantly improved the critical care rate.
Sun Yifeng, when reading Li Xiaoliang's commendation, said that Professor Li Xiaoliang laid the foundation for the innovative research of operational management, shaped the thinking mode of supply chain theory and practice, and completely changed the business model of the world.
Li Xiaoliang is famous for popularizing the concept of long whip effect in operational management and exploring measures to cope with this phenomenon.
Now, with the epidemic and the tense economic situation, the long whip effect has become increasingly prominent, causing serious damage to the supply chain.
Li Xiaoliang’s far-sighted research is like sending charcoal in a timely manner, helping the industry to overcome the difficulties, thus bringing great social value.
When Sun Yifeng read the praise of Zhu Lili, she said that in her research work, she found a breakthrough and innovative dyeing technology for the preparation of samples, which has a high reputation in the domestic and international scientific and technological circles.
She was honored with important titles such as academician of the International Eurasian Academy of Sciences for her extraordinary achievements in science and technology. With her brilliant achievements, she won her due high status in the world science temple.
When Chen Xin, the deputy director of the Chinese Medicine Research Institute of the University of Macau, read Chen Kaixian's commendation, he said that Professor Chen Kaixian has been engaged in drug research and development for more than 40 years, and his outstanding scientific achievements and important contributions to the country, Macao, the University of Macau, and the national key laboratory have given him a high international status and reputation.
His positive role in promoting the development of traditional Chinese medicine in Macao and the Greater Bay Area fully reflects his sense of mission to contribute to the national medical development strategy.
Xu Chengzhong, Dean of the School of Science and Technology at the University of Adelaide, said that Ms. Jiang Chaohui has participated in the development of more than 15 major inventions and patents related to storage virtualization, navigation, file systems and power management, all of which are highly practical, widely used, and improve the convenience of human life.
As an accomplished inventor, Ms. Jiang is often able to simplify high-tech and theories for the general public.
Finally, Chen Kaixian read the acceptance speech on behalf of the honorary doctor.
He is happy to see that the medical industry in Macau and the Greater Bay Area has set a good example: from the first national key laboratory of Chinese medicine quality research established by the University of Macau to the vigorous development of traditional Chinese medicine in the Greater Bay Area, the University of Macau has made a great contribution to the integration of excellent talents in the field of traditional Chinese medicine in the Greater Bay Area.
In addition, he believes that the management team of the University of Adelaide is far-sighted, not only providing research soil for students, but also sending many people with a sense of responsibility to the society.
He was honored to exchange and cooperate with ANU and sincerely congratulated ANU on its achievements in recent years.
Did he have the right address?
I haven't seen it yet
That rider just went the wrong way so I didn't get
However, #PRS_ORG# has received
The app was unable to contact the rider at the time.
My family thought I didn't
But it's been more than an hour
When the NFT was quickly out of the circle, a new concept emerged in the encrypted community.
In 2021, a blockchain game called "Axie Infinity" had a huge impact in Southeast Asia, and some residents who lost their jobs due to the epidemic began to obtain stable income in this game.
"Axie Infinity" is a blockchain-based pet-raising game that combines multiple play styles including NFT, and is currently the NFT project with the highest transaction volume, which has exceeded 3 billion U.S. dollars.
According to TokenTerminal data, Axie Infinity’s daily revenue exceeded 8.2 million US dollars, close to that of King of Glory.
On August 6 this year, the official of Axie Infinity announced that its daily active users had exceeded 1 million.
The popularity of "Axie Infinity" has passed a new "palytoearn" model to more people. With the help of blockchain and smart contracts, players are no longer a single role. In addition to getting pleasure and economic benefits from the game, they can also participate in the governance of the game ecology.
This subjectivity is not given by the game developer, but is guaranteed by blockchain technology.
After seeing the news about my friend's stock price, my biggest feeling is the choice of the enterprise in the track, that is, the choice of the investment target industry. First, choose the industry with large growth space, with a market scale of more than 100 billion at least; second, choose the industry with good growth in the future, and consider the industry with the best growth in the next 3-5 years; third, choose the industry with policy support.
The width of the track refers to the size of the market, the length of the track refers to the development stage of the industry, and the flatness or ruggedness of the track refers to the competitive pattern of the industry.
Go for the right track!
The first thing in the new year is to summarize 2021 and adjust the tactical layout in 2022.
The strategy is to “do things right”, that is, to do things right.
And the strategy is “do the right thing”, that is, do the right thing.
The strategy is to find the direction, and the tactic is to land. There is room for strategic thinking above most tactical thinking.
For example, in addition to increasing the number of customers (tactical thinking), it can be considered whether to continue to deepen in the current field or extend horizontally (strategic thinking); in addition to improving the customer retention rate (tactical thinking), it can be considered how to improve the retention rate of core customers and high-value customers (strategic thinking); in addition to improving the activity participation rate (tactical thinking), it can be considered how to set the correct activity KPI and achieve the correct activity target, such as improving the participation rate of target customers, activating high-value silent customers, and accurately recruiting new customers; in addition to improving DAU (tactical thinking), it can be considered whether the current growth is healthy and sustainable.
Bitcoin, which was born 12 years ago, welcomed several milestone events in 2021.
On September 7, the small Central American country of El Salvador declared Bitcoin as legal tender, marking the first time that Bitcoin has become legal tender in a country or region.
On October 12, the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission approved ProShares for the first time in eight years to launch a bitcoin ETF and list it on the New York Stock Exchange, marking the landing of the first compliant bitcoin futures ETF in the U.S. capital market and the further expansion of cryptocurrency investment opportunities.
From the perspective of the development of blockchain technology, Bitcoin is not the protagonist.
On November 14, 2021, Bitcoin conducted a soft fork upgrade called "Taproot", which improved the anonymity of Bitcoin network transactions and reduced the data burden of transactions by changing the data structure of the block itself.
McChicken, no McChicken sauce
If you just eat that McChicken, it would be hard to eat.
Does your $32 discount code only work if you spend a certain amount
If it's less than 15 minutes, can it be canceled?
I'm entering the code, why is it asking me to confirm the order
OK
I won't get a discount then?
Hello
The ordered food was not delivered
The rider has already been delivered to
I hope you can be on time, not for your coupon!!
Did you encounter any problems with the initial registration of the first-level construction cost and the continuing education study hours?
Late registrants fail to provide proof of continuing education A late registrant must provide proof of at least 30 hours of continuing education in the past year. A re-registrant must provide proof of at least 120 hours of continuing education in the past four years. A re-registrant must provide proof of at least 30 hours of continuing education for each annual period.
Standards for continuing education fees for construction cost engineers
The construction cost engineers who participate in the network continuing education shall pay the learning fees to each management agency when they register, and the general standard is as follows: the fee for 30 hours of compulsory courses is 300 yuan per person per year (including the unified textbook for continuing education);
The fee for the 30-hour elective course is 300 yuan/person/year.
The cost of 30 hours of compulsory courses and 30 hours of elective courses is 600 yuan per person per year (including unified textbooks for continuing education).
(I) Participate in the network continuing education learning of registered cost engineers organized by the China Association of Cost Engineering or provincial-level and departmental management agencies, and calculate the course hours according to the time recorded in the online learning courseware;
(ii) Participate in the centralized face-to-face training of registered cost engineers organized by the China Association of Cost Engineers or provincial and departmental management agencies, and each half-day can be recognized for 4 academic hours;
(Three) participate in the continuing education courses of the China Association of Cost Engineers, provincial and departmental cost engineers, and cost engineers, and each half-day can be recognized as 10 academic hours;
(Four) participate in the research of the China Price Association and provincial projects, the compilation of industry standards, and the writing of textbooks, and recognize 30 academic hours for each item every year;
(Six) participate in the writing of textbooks for the national professional qualification examination for construction cost engineers, and can be recognized as 30 academic hours per year;
(Seven) Engineering cost related professional papers and works published with personal signature and open to the public (based on the official serial number).
For every 10,000 words published, 12 academic hours are recognized;
Each thousand words of papers published in national-level journals are recognized as 8 academic hours, each thousand words of papers published in provincial-level journals are recognized as 5 academic hours, and each thousand words of papers published in city-level journals are recognized as 3 academic hours.
(9) Participate in the public training (except for the general management and skill training for enterprises) organized by the engineering cost consulting enterprises approved or authorized by the Economic and Trade Committee, the provincial and departmental management agencies, and the provincial construction cost association, which can be recognized as 4 academic hours per half day, with a maximum of 30 academic hours per year.
Continuing Professional Development (CPD) Learning Journey for Quantity Surveyors
After the registration agency receives the fee, the student’s identity will be opened immediately, and the cost engineer can enter the online education classroom to learn with the user name and password.
Students can learn through on-demand courseware, questions and answers, and online discussions.
If you forget your password, when you log in, the username and password are incorrect and cannot log in for learning, please contact the registered institution to which the student belongs, and the registered institution can help modify the student's password (but cannot modify the username), and use its modified password to log in again.
Scan the QR code to download the Tieba client
Watch high-definition live broadcasts and videos!
Please arrange for delivery
My order hasn't arrived
The delivery person left without collecting the goods
Please let the delivery person know that we are still waiting
The restaurant had given the food to the rider 30 minutes ago
The full vision wedding photography base (Hebei store) has no branch for the time being.
The wedding fashion is avant-garde, and the makeup artist is also top-notch. The shooting technology and angles are very professional, and the shooting effects are very good.
A very reputable seller with good service attitude.
The makeup was exquisite and the team service was very good. This trip was very happy. It was a very professional team. The seller's service attitude was very good. I will introduce it to my friends. I am very satisfied.
Thank you to the photographers and make-up artists for making me look so unique in my wedding photos.
Thanks to all the staff who took wedding photos today, and look forward to seeing the finished product.
Taking wedding photos is a physical activity, especially for the photographer, who is running and jumping all the time.
The makeup artist was very considerate and designed a makeup suitable for my face shape. The photographer was humorous and funny during the shoot, and deserves praise.
Thanks to my photographer and make-up artist for making me look so beautiful in my lifetime.
He praised the woman, saying that her eyes were beautiful, her appearance was generous and decent, and she looked like a virtuous wife and a good mother. She would be thrifty and frugal in the future.
The groom has made a profit, and will live a lifetime of happiness and harmony.
The quality of the wedding photos is really good, just like what is said on the Internet, my husband and I are very handsome and beautiful, and we are very satisfied.
The service attitude of the seller is also very enthusiastic.
On this trip, not only did they enjoy the scenery, but they also took beautiful wedding photos and made friends with the photographer.
The wedding photos are so beautiful. I have to blow the photographer and makeup artist, you are really super professional.
I am very grateful to Miss Mu for her patience and meticulous guidance. I like the photos taken.
When I saw the wedding photos, I didn't recognize myself.
As long as the photographer chooses well, you can also have wedding photos that are comparable to those of celebrities.
The most important thing when taking wedding photos is that both the photographer and makeup artist have a good sense of aesthetics. Fortunately, I met them.
After seeing my wedding photos, I realized that I was a "photo fraudster" as well.
American-Asian groups complain that three Ivy League schools, including Yale, discriminate in admissions - Xinhuanet
Xinhua News Agency, Washington, May 23 (Reporter Xu Jianmei) More than 130 Asian groups in the United States submitted a complaint to the U.S. Department of Education and the U.S. Department of Justice on May 23, protesting against the discrimination against Asian applicants in the admission process of three Ivy League universities - Yale University, Brown University and Dartmouth College.
The Asian American Education Alliance, which initiated the complaint, held a press conference in Washington that day.
Zhao Yukun, the president of the group, said at the press conference that in the past ten years, the number of Asian applicants who meet the admission conditions of American top schools has doubled, but the proportion of Asians in these three American top schools has basically remained at the same level.
Many studies have shown that these universities "long-term and systematic discrimination against Asian applicants" in the so-called "comprehensive consideration" admission process.
Zhao Yukun introduced that in 2014, Sanders and other scholars' research showed that among the three universities, the acceptance rate of Asians was the lowest among all ethnic groups relative to the number of applicants.
The data from the U.S. Department of Education also shows that among all Ivy League universities, Brown University and Dartmouth College have the lowest admission rate for Asian students. Yale University and Brown University have implemented de facto racial quotas for Asian students for more than 20 years.
Zhao Youkong told reporters from Xinhua News Agency that they hoped that the United States Department of Education and the Department of Justice would conduct an investigation after the appeal was submitted, and take measures to stop these universities from continuing to discriminate against Asian students in admissions.
They also hope that the universities that have received complaints will take the initiative to pay attention to this issue and change their admission policies for Asians.
At present, the three universities complained about have not responded.
The Asian American Education Alliance was established in 2015, when it complained of Harvard University's admission discrimination, but the U.S. Department of Education refused to accept it on procedural grounds.
In addition to the Chinese-American group, the Indian-American, Korean-American, Japanese-American, and Pakistani-American education groups also participated in the appeal.
Utensils needed
Just canceled an order
Why is it still being implemented?
Can you check if it has been cancelled?
But I ordered at 5:09 this morning
That's the ordering line and they have no idea what's going on
Can I contact them directly by phone?
In September 2020, Mr. Lu learned about a factory located in Zhangting Town, Yuyao, Zhejiang from a real estate agent. After several site visits, Mr. Lu decided to buy the factory.
In December of the same year, Mr. Lu discussed the details of the purchase of the factory building with Ms. Lin, a family member of the house owner, and paid a deposit of RMB 200,000 by bank transfer on the same day.
Mr. Lin signed as the payee on the “Factory Purchase Deposit Receipt”, which stated, “If the buyer does not want to buy this factory, the deposit will be returned to the seller. If the seller does not want to sell this factory, the deposit will be doubled and returned to the seller. The two parties have agreed to sign the factory purchase and sale contract within one week”.
However, later the two sides failed to reach an agreement on the main terms of the contract, such as the scope of the sale of the factory and payment method, which led to the delay in signing the house purchase contract.
Considering that the two parties failed to reach an agreement on the contract content, a few days later, Mr. Lin returned the 200,000 yuan deposit to Mr. Lu.
The house that was finally chosen, the down payment was paid, and the house money was ready, just one step away from signing the contract, but the seller did not sell, which made Mr. Lu helpless and angry.
Therefore, Mr. Lu sued Mr. Lin to the People’s Court of Yuyao City.
After hearing the case, the court found that the two parties eventually failed to sign a formal contract, which could not be solely blamed on the defendant. It should be reasonably assumed that the negotiation failed. Therefore, this case should not apply the deposit penalty, and the defendant should not bear the double return deposit liability for breach of contract.
The plaintiff appealed after the first trial.
Recently, the appellate court upheld the original judgment.
【Lawyers' Reminder】 In the course of the transaction, it is necessary to exercise due caution.
When signing the contract, as the buyer, you should fulfill the necessary due diligence obligations, such as verifying the information of the property owner and whether the property is occupied by others, and clearly stipulate the specific time and place of delivery in the contract to prevent disputes between both parties when performing the contract.
(German Voice Chinese Network) After the "Democracy Summit" ended on Friday, the spokesperson of the Chinese Ministry of Foreign Affairs issued a statement on Saturday (December 11), saying that the United States held the "Leaders Democracy Summit" to "draw ideological lines, turn democracy into a tool and weapon, and use the name of democracy to do the opposite of democracy, incite division and confrontation, and divert domestic conflicts".
The Chinese government believes that “for a long time, the United States has imposed its political system and value concepts on others, carried out ‘democratic transformation’, abused unilateral sanctions, and instigated ‘color revolutions’, resulting in catastrophic consequences.
"Democracy" has already become a "weapon of mass destruction" for the United States to interfere in other countries.
This summit is an action by Biden to fulfill his election promise.
The two-day meeting was held via video, and leaders from 111 countries around the world were invited to attend, including Taiwan leaders, but China and Russia were not invited.
On the eve of the summit, China and Russia criticized the United States for its own democratic problems and said that the United States was not qualified to convene such a summit.
Internationally and in the United States, there are also voices of doubt, such as criticizing that the invited participants include some leaders with authoritarian tendencies, such as the leaders of the Philippines, Poland and Brazil, and some people doubt that the true intention of the Biden administration is to organize this summit for geopolitical purposes rather than for democratic purposes.
The newly appointed German Chancellor Scholz also participated in the video democracy summit.
A statement from the Chinese Ministry of Foreign Affairs on Saturday said that "the disease of American democracy is revealed today, and the problems of money politics, identity politics, party division, political polarization, social division, racial conflicts, and the rich-poor gap are becoming more and more intense", and that the democracy of the United States is a "rich man's game" built on the basis of capital.
U.S. President Biden said in his speech that "as leaders of the government, we have a responsibility to listen to our citizens, strengthen the fence of democracy, promote reform, achieve transparent accountability governance, and resist the buffer and impact of authoritarianism, as well as those who want to pursue power nakedly before the public interest. "
He stressed that democracy is not a matter of course, "We must constantly update it in every generation. In my opinion, this is the defining challenge of our time. "
Biden also said that democracy "needs warriors to defend it" in the face of continuous and worrying challenges to global democracy and human rights.
The United States has promised to carry out a one-year action after the Democracy Summit, including a $4.244 billion initiative to strengthen democracy around the world and support independent news media.
The United States hopes that all countries will make specific public commitments to improve their democratic systems before the in-person Democracy Summit to be held at the end of 2022.
Biden said, "Let's all countries implement our commitments and report on the progress we have made next year."
Okay, I'm just worried that he sent it to the wrong address.
Ri Chang Restaurant (Wudaokou Store)
[Peppermint] Environment: Average [Service Bell] Service: The dishes were served very quickly. "Old-fashioned Malatang" was my must-order dish. The malatang was too fragrant, too soft, and too delicious. 😋 If you like desserts, you must try "Dongjiang Squid Slippery Stuffed Bean Curd Pot". The soup was very tasty. The tofu was very tender. The squid...
The taste is good, the meat is good, and the service is enthusiastic.
I haven't been to Rishang for a long time, and the fruit tea is still so delicious and full of real ingredients. This is the first time I ordered the char siu bun, and it is the southern taste of soft flour that I love!
The clay pot rice was just right in terms of dryness and wetness, and the portions were very generous. The signature tin foil chicken wings were as good as ever, and the soup was not bad either. The Chinese cabbage was also...
The taste is good, the service is warm, and the meat is good.
The Jichang old store was also a popular place many years ago. Dongdan Xiaolou, wooden floor.
The rice-in-a-pot always takes a long time to eat, and the rice-in-a-pot pot is all cracked...
It's been several years since I went to eat at Richiang. The rise of various small shops and Cantonese cuisine has dispersed the flow of customers.
It's a rare thing to have a seat when you arrive, and the quality of the dishes is beyond doubt, as good as ever.
The taste is good, the meat is good, and the staple food is good.
Jiangchang take-out.
[Rice] meal: The food this time was slightly disappointing.
Three-cup chicken: The side dishes are a bit too much, and the chicken meat is slightly less.
The main taste is a bit off, the bottom taste is not salty enough, and the sweetness is highlighted. You can imagine the sweetness plus various spices and side dishes...
How do you drink a red-card whisky?
People have different hobbies. Some people like collecting, some people like food, and of course, some people like drinking. Johnnie Walker Red Label is one of the most popular Scotch whiskies in the world, and Johnnie Walker Red Label has won a gold medal in the International Wine and Spirits Competition.
Every bottle of Johnnie Walker has a unique taste, but if you don't know how to taste it, it would be a waste of its aroma.
So, how do you drink the Red Card whisky?
Here is a simple introduction by the editor.
How to drink Red Label whiskey:
The Johnnie Walker Red Label Scotch Whisky is a blend of about 35 types of Scotch whisky. It has a strong aroma and the characteristics of traditional Scotch whisky. The strong aroma has a sweet and smoky flavor.
Freshly malty on the entry, with hints of herbs and a strong, smoky malt flavor.
The wine can be enjoyed on its own over ice or mixed with your favourite drink.
Red label whiskey entered the domestic market. In order to adapt to the taste of Chinese people, red label whiskey + Coca-Cola or Sprite or other carbonated beverages have become a long-lasting fashion.
These sweet drinks can not only neutralize the sourness, but also give people a pleasant visual experience. They can be added to drinks to dilute the taste of alcohol and change the taste.
Red label whisky + a slice of lemon + rock sugar (or white sugar), is the most authentic and traditional way of drinking.
The authentic Hongfangwei has a slightly sour taste. Adding sugar can neutralize the sourness, and lemon will give the wine a fresh fragrance. Of course, the sweetness and sourness can be adjusted according to individual taste preferences.
The above three are the best way to drink red card whiskey. Everyone can try it as a reference. I hope that the editor's introduction can help everyone.
Educational thinking: How can the college entrance examination make "smart kids" and "dumb kids" get what they want - Xinhua News Agency
Three students from Lanzhou Jiaotong University wrote a letter to the school leaders to express their confusion about the university exams, and proposed to increase the difficulty of the exams, change the exam format, and let the exams truly reflect the actual level of the students.
Indeed, university exams have been a "hot topic" for a long time.
In the university campus, students come from all over the country and have different levels of ability. In addition, the learning level is different, and the learning situation is very different.
It is inevitable that there will be different perceptions in the assessment of such a diverse group of people.
Of course, if the examination questions are of a single type and have a high repetition rate, and the questions are too simple, it will inevitably cause another completely different feeling.
Students who do not work hard may be able to pass the exam by cramming before the exam. If they want to find other ways, they may be able to get twice the result with half the effort.
As a result, there are “academic slackers” who can pass the exam even if they don’t put in the effort, and even get high marks; and there are “academic superstars” who never miss a class, whose homework and notes are all good, and whose test scores are not much higher than those of their peers.
Judging from this, the problems reflected by Lanzhou Jiaotong University students in university examinations are not groundless, and it is believed that this situation does not only exist in Lanzhou Jiaotong University.
In this sense, we should applaud the three students who wrote the letter.
In fact, those who have been to university all know that it is not uncommon for people to cram for exams and to try all kinds of ways to "extract" exam questions from teachers in order to ensure that the scope of the exam is limited and to get "special attention" before the exam. Even in the exam, there are cases of taking notes and asking teachers for help after the exam.
In my opinion, as a teaching quality assessment guide, measuring whether a university exam is successful or not is more about teachers’ comprehensive understanding of teaching and learning and the scientific formulation of questions on this basis.
At the university undergraduate stage, the major begins to be subdivided, and many professional courses are mainly based on basic knowledge.
It is indisputable that whether or not one has a comprehensive grasp of the basic knowledge points of a discipline is the content to be examined in the university entrance examination.
And the undergraduate knowledge is basically the basic theory and basic common sense of the subject. In terms of knowledge points, the space for change is not great, and it is basically fixed.
Just as a teacher said, "The basic knowledge of university mathematics that was learned 20 years ago is still being learned, and it is still the focus. "
However, the basic knowledge points have not changed, which does not mean that the examination questions are single and the questions are repeated.
In many universities, exams are generally composed of a group of examiners, and then coordinated by senior teachers in the discipline to form a test paper. Exam marking is also participated by all teachers in the subject, which can to a certain extent overcome the situation of repeated questions.
However, in order to formulate a set of questions that are in line with the actual situation of teaching and learning, the difficulty of the questions should be distributed in a normal distribution according to the overall situation of students' learning. It is also necessary to comprehensively grasp the teaching situation, comprehensively analyze the degree of students' learning, so that the examination questions can dynamically grasp the difficulty and types of questions, so as to not only highlight the examination of basic knowledge, but also take into account the examination of ability, and at the same time, innovate the types of questions.
The exam is the baton of university education, and what kind of exam, students will have a corresponding preparation plan. This will affect the effectiveness of university education in the long run.
The Lanzhou University attaches great importance to the suggestions of the students, and has made a rectification plan in the whole school.
It is required that each teaching unit organize teachers to conduct seminars and course end-of-course examination self-inspection, formulate examination question setting and related systems, and strengthen supervision and inspection of examination question setting and review links, refine grading, and strengthen comprehensive assessment of all aspects of course teaching.
To solve the problems of single types of questions and repeated questions from the mechanism is an issue that university examination affairs need to face. Of course, corresponding systems need to be issued, but the key is daily efforts. Teachers need to have a comprehensive grasp of the teaching situation. Not only do they need to understand the teaching content, but they also need to understand the learning situation of the students. Both ends need to be understood. Teaching and learning will be better connected, forming a positive interaction, and the examination will also be more in line with the actual situation, so that both "academic masters" and "academic dregs" will get what they deserve.
If I can't change the store location, can I change it to delivery?
I don’t have to give you any more money, do I?
The colleague's order has been delivered.
Couldn't pull it off
What about GPS?
Mrs. Jin's Wedding Photography (South Street Store) does not have a branch for the time being
Before taking the photo, we changed the time twice because our time was not arranged well. The consultant, Lanlan, was very patient to help us arrange the time.
It was taken on a sunny weekend later on.
The staff at Mrs. Kim's, whether advisers, makeup artists or photographers, were over the top.
It was the first time in my life that I did my makeup properly, wow, I could hardly believe that one day I would look so good, haha.
Xiaojie and another girl (sorry, I can't remember her name) were very patient and the makeup was very natural.
The outdoor scenes were filmed in Jiangwan City. Fortunately, the weather was good that day, and I didn't feel very cold. The makeup artists paid attention to our clothes and headwear from time to time. If there was something wrong, they would help us fix it immediately.
The photographer was also very humorous, and I felt very happy after a day of photography.
When choosing the photos, because I had seen many cases on the Internet, I didn’t want to let the guests delete too many photos. However, when we chose the photos, we really didn't have the intention to add photos. The 24 photos in the package were not added (I heard that my cousin, who took wedding photos around the same time as me, added more than 10,000 photos to the 7,000-yuan package. At that time, I was shocked. I was also afraid that I would choose too many)
Today the photos have been fixed. Lanlan sent them to me. I looked at two of them and thought they were not very good. They immediately helped me to fix them.
I flipped through my sister's previous photos and compared them. I think our photos are really satisfying. They are simple and fresh, which is the style I want.
I really recommend everyone to take wedding photos in Xuanhan Jinfu!
Price: RMB 3,999
Mrs. Jin is grateful for your sincere wishes for her happiness, prosperity and a bright future!
How much does this cost?
What conditions must be met to use the $32?
That's good, no need to refund
Your rider says he can't find it
Can't find
But I couldn't understand what he was saying in English
The editor has brought you the Omega mechanical watch, which one is better?
How good is an Omega mechanical watch?
1. Swiss Omega OMEGA Constellation series couple watches, automatic mechanical men's watch, and quartz women's watch
Recommendation reasons: The inheritance of Switzerland, the art of time is in the wrist. Omega is dignified and elegant, simple and unpretentious. It is very charming and can be worn for both commuting and formal occasions.
Couples style, expressing the sweet love between the two, always together, delicate hands, heart-stirring.
No quotation yet
2, Swiss Omega (OMEGA) watch Seamaster series steel strap automatic mechanical men's watch and quartz women's watch 424.10.0.20.02.002/27.60.55.001
Reason for recommendation: Swiss-made, must be a masterpiece, Omega watch, a slim and elegant gold watch, couple watch, which can not only show the nobility of identity, but also show the sweetness of love.
The dial scale design makes the time scale more clear, and the dial uses the popular blue dial. The overall design is simple and bright.
This Omega brand watch, with a stainless steel bracelet, a blue dial, a mechanical (automatic) movement, 30-meter water resistance, a pointer display, a nationwide guarantee, a flat-type interface, a stainless steel case back, a men's watch 39.5mm and a women's watch 27.4mm, a 20mm interface size, a butterfly-type clasp, an artificial sapphire crystal glass, currently has 3 reviews, and received a 100% positive rating.
3, Swiss Omega OMEGA butterfly series couple watch for men automatic mechanical for women quartz 424.10.37.20.01.001/24.60.01.001
Reason for recommendation: Swiss-made, quality benchmark, this Omega watch uses a movement with high precision, couple design, simple and elegant appearance, the flow of time flows from the edge of the pointer, and it is always in a steady pace, suitable for business people to wear, and release the charm of the wrist.
4. Swiss Omega (OMEGA) watch, Constellation series, automatic mechanical watch, men's watch, fashion ladies' quartz watch, couple watch, a pair of watches
OMEGA couple's watch, a pair of watches, made of gold
Reason for recommendation: Imported from Switzerland, its quality is extraordinary. Omega is dignified and elegant, plain and simple. It is not ostentatious but very charming. It can be worn for both commuting and formal occasions.
Stylish and atmospheric, full of beauty, and showing the elegant temperament of a lady, the jumping of the pointer makes me fall in love with you at first sight.
This watch has a steel strap, a mechanical (automatic) movement, a folding clasp, and a 30-meter waterproof function. The dial size for men is 39.5 and for women is 27.4. The display type is a pointer. The warranty is a nationwide unified warranty. The strap interface type is a flat interface. The bottom of the watch is made of stainless steel. The dial color is white. The brand is Omega. The strap interface size is 18mm. The watch lens material is artificial sapphire crystal glass. There are more than 20 people who have commented, and it has received a 100% praise rate.
Do you want me to return the curry sauce to you?
I only got half of it
There are six boxes that I haven't seen delivered.
The company worked overtime and had no lunch at noon. They wanted to order takeaway, but they didn’t know that the order would be cancelled.
Your name is Zheng Mian. This is your second week in Japan.
You're walking down the street, and you suddenly realize someone's following you. You walk faster, then run.
The person behind you caught up: "Miss! Please wait!" (entire dialogue in Japanese) You stopped at the entrance to the convenience store.
"Miss...I am a director. I think you are very beautiful. Would you like to participate in a reality show?"
You're confused, scared it's a scam.
He gave you his business card, and you found out that he is really the director of a large entertainment company in Japan.
"If you have time, we can talk in the company, and the remuneration will not be less."
You just went with him to the company, he said he saw you on the street at a glance, and he really wanted you to participate.
You signed the contract because you thought there was no loss and you could make money.
It is a large-scale love reality show, which is divided into two parts.
In the early stage, the stars and ordinary people will interact in real life, and cultivate tacit understanding.
Later, they will enter the game to pass the level together.
The official recording will start next week, and you don't know who your partner will be or what interesting things will happen?
So, can the system see the new orders?
Then what will happen to the rider
I can't accept that an order is not delivered within 20 minutes
3,200 newborn babies in Sabah do not have birth certificates due to shortage of special anti-counterfeiting paper
(Kota Kinabalu, 11th) The Sabah National Registration Department said that due to the lack of special anti-counterfeiting paper, it has been unable to issue birth certificates to newborn babies since the beginning of October, and the cumulative number of affected people has reached 3,200.
However, the director of the agency, Keruaminus, assured that all babies who have already applied for birth certificates will have their data recorded in the system and will be issued when the counterfeit certificates arrive next week.
He explained at the press conference, in response to the report of the Sarawak Report for more than 10 months on the issue of paper printing.
He said the problem has been there for the past two months, and Sarawak is facing the same problem.
"One of the reasons is that the Chinese manufacturer of special anti-counterfeiting paper is affected by the epidemic, which leads to a delay in delivery to our country. "
He explained that the anti-counterfeit paper used in Sabah newspapers was different from that used in other areas, so it could not be borrowed from the stocks of other states.
Khairul Amnius revealed that the latest batch of anti-counterfeit paper arrived in Kuala Lumpur on the 6th of this month, and was handed over to the printing company on the 8th for part of the printing work.
"The department will send people to collect the goods in Kuala Lumpur next Thursday and return to Sabah for the final stage of printing immediately, and it is estimated that it can be delivered to the applicant on December 20. "
"We will inform the applicants to go to the local bureaus to collect the admission papers. "
He added that Sabah had issued a total of 24,801 birth certificates so far this year.
From 7:30 until now
Is it coming soon?
I'm talking about food
I'm waiting across from #PRS_ORG#
Okay, thank you, as the restaurant said it was ready
Commentator of People's Daily: "14th Five-Year Plan" achieved a good start -- on learning and implementing the spirit of the Central Economic Work Conference - Xinhua Net
Xinhua News Agency, Beijing, December 11 - People's Daily, December 12 - Commentaries: A good start of the "14th Five-Year Plan" - on learning and implementing the spirit of the Central Economic Work Conference
The Central Economic Work Conference held from December 8 to 10 highly evaluated the achievements of China’s economic and social development in the past year.
General Secretary Xi Jinping delivered an important speech at the meeting. He made a profound summary of the economic work in 2021, in-depth analysis of the current economic situation, and made a major deployment for the economic work in 2022. This will guide us to do a good job in next year's economic work, welcome the successful convening of the 20th National Congress of the Communist Party of China, and provide fundamental guidance.
We solemnly celebrated the 100th anniversary of the founding of the Communist Party of China, officially announced the full construction of a moderately prosperous society and the achievement of the first centenary goal, and opened a new journey to build a socialist modernized country and march towards the second centenary goal.
We convened the 6th Plenary Session of the 19th CPC National Congress to summarize the major achievements and historical experience of the party’s century-long struggle, and adopted the third historical resolution in the party’s history, namely, the Resolution of the CPC Central Committee on the Major Achievements and Historical Experience of the Party’s Hundred-year Struggle, which is a political declaration for the Chinese Communists in the new era to remember their original aspiration and mission, to adhere to and develop socialism with Chinese characteristics, and is a guide for action to learn from history, open up the future, and achieve the great rejuvenation of the Chinese nation.
Over the past year, the great changes unseen in a century in the world and the global outbreak of the new crown pneumonia epidemic have intertwined and influenced each other, and the external environment has become more complex and severe. The new crown pneumonia epidemic prevention and control and various tasks of economic and social development in the country are extremely heavy and difficult.
The CPC Central Committee, with Comrade Xi Jinping as the core, insisted on the overall coordination of domestic and international affairs, insisted on the general tone of steady progress, calmly responded to the century changes and century epidemic, coordinated epidemic prevention and control and economic and social development, accelerated the construction of a new development pattern, strengthened the cross-cycle adjustment of macroeconomic policy, and strived to promote the continuous and healthy development of the economy, strived to deepen reform, opening-up and innovation, and made great efforts to complete the arduous task of reform and development. The party and the country have achieved new major achievements in various undertakings.
"The 14th Five-Year Plan" achieved a good start, and one important aspect is that it took new steps to build a new development pattern and achieved new achievements in high-quality development.
China has maintained its global leading position in economic development and epidemic prevention and control. The characteristics of strong resilience, large potential and sufficient power have continued to emerge; the national strategic scientific and technological force has accelerated its expansion, major innovation achievements have emerged one after another, and the technological innovation capability has continued to improve, and breakthroughs have been achieved in the research and development of key core technologies; the resilience of the industrial chain has been improved, the quality and quantity of foreign trade have increased, the structure has continued to be optimized, and new growth momentum represented by new industries, new business forms and new business models has grown and developed; reform and opening-up has moved forward in depth, and efforts have been made to break through the bottlenecks of supply and demand adaptation and the flow of factors, and the annual grain output has been maintained at more than 130 billion kilograms for 7 consecutive years, achieving “18 consecutive bumper harvests”; ecological civilization construction has continued to advance, and the work of carbon peaking and carbon neutrality has been comprehensively promoted, the pace of green and low-carbon transformation has been steady, and new achievements have been made in environmental protection.
These achievements are the result of the strong leadership of the Party Central Committee with Comrade Xi Jinping as the core, the result of the scientific guidance of Xi Jinping Thought on Socialism with Chinese Characteristics for a New Era, and the result of the hard work of the whole party and all ethnic groups.
Practice has once again proved that the Party has established Comrade Xi Jinping as the core of the CPC Central Committee and the core of the whole Party, and established Xi Jinping Thought on Socialism with Chinese Characteristics for a New Era as the guiding ideology, which has a decisive significance for the development of the Party and the country in a new era, and for promoting the historical process of the great rejuvenation of the Chinese nation.
With General Secretary Xi Jinping as the core of the Party Central Committee and the core of the Party, with Xi Jinping Thought on Socialism with Chinese Characteristics for a New Era as the scientific guidance, and with the whole Party and all ethnic groups in the country working together, we will definitely be able to overcome all kinds of difficulties and obstacles, and create a new era of glory and a new historical feat in the new journey of building a socialist modern country in all respects.
Next year, the 20th National Congress of the Communist Party of China will be held, which is a major event in the political life of the Party and the country.
To carry forward the great spirit of founding the Party, to adhere to the general tone of steady progress, to comprehensively, accurately, and fully implement the new development concept, to accelerate the construction of a new development pattern, to comprehensively deepen reform and opening-up, to adhere to innovation-driven development, to promote high-quality development, to adhere to the main line of supply-side structural reform, to coordinate epidemic prevention and control with economic and social development, to coordinate development with security, to continue to do a good job of “six stabilities” and “six guarantees”, to continuously improve people’s livelihood, to make efforts to stabilize the macro-economy, to keep the economic operation within a reasonable range, to keep social stability, and we will certainly be able to keep a stable and healthy economic environment, a peaceful and stable social environment, and a clean and upright political environment, and to meet the 20th National Congress of the Communist Party of China with outstanding achievements.
Let us unite more closely around the CPC Central Committee with Comrade Xi Jinping as the core, strengthen the "four consciousnesses" and the "four self-confidences", and do a good job in the "two safeguards". We must continuously improve our political judgment, political understanding and political implementation, and implement the decisions and deployments of the CPC Central Committee with concrete actions, and continuously push forward the cause of socialism with Chinese characteristics in the new era.
Then I'll re-order with the points, thank you
Where can I pick up my order?
I can't see the address
Download the Suning App
Focus on the Suning Pusher public account
Self-purchase saves money and sharing makes money
Download the Suning Finance App
Pay attention to the service account of Suning.com
Super convenient, just like opening it on a computer, it solves my problem of insufficient hard disk space on my computer.
The newly arrived solid-state mobile hard drive can't be read by the solid-state mobile hard drive computer, and the solid-state mobile hard drive computer doesn't recognize it, while the U disk computer can read it.
The machine has a light touch, a grand appearance, and a beautiful appearance.
I used it for an afternoon today, and the heat dissipation was very good, and I basically felt no burning. The running speed was very fast, and the start-up killed 99% of the users.
The battery is also very strong, with a standby time of 9 hours and a use time of 4 hours, which should not be a problem. All in all, I feel very happy to buy such a quality machine at this price. Other functions will be added later.
It looks good.
In terms of performance, it will be evaluated after a period of time.
The machine is fast, larger than expected, and the rendering effect is amazing. I like it, and I will review it after using it for a period of time.
Not bad, not bad. The serial number of this machine can be found on the Hong Kong** website, and the quality should be OK.
** It doesn't feel big, but it's heavy, and it's not actually big. It's just a little bigger than 15.6 inches. It runs very stably and doesn't feel stuck. I love the sound of the fan's heat dissipation. It has a feeling, and it doesn't spin like a gaming laptop.
The things are not bad, much cheaper than the official flagship store, and gave me a backpack. I think it's pretty good.
The shopkeeper's service was also good, and he reminded me to update the BIOS and issued the ** in time.
Worth it!
Heat dissipation: The heat dissipation is very good, basically no heat. Thin and light degree: Convenient to carry. Appearance material: Thinkpad traditional design, satisfied.
Reputable seller, carefully check the appearance of the whole machine, all interfaces, no signs of refurbishment or use, it is indeed a brand new American machine, and the configuration is the same as the page.
I forgot to send the backpack. They immediately sent me a backpack. Although it was not the original factory backpack, it was enough to prove that it was a conscientious seller in terms of service follow-up.
If you have friends who need to buy a laptop, you can buy it back.
The appearance material: the appearance is atmospheric; the display effect: the screen resolution is OK, clear; the thinness degree: it feels good, after all, the heavier the thing, the better it feels.
Heat dissipation effect: I tried it for the first time, and will evaluate it later.
The keyboard typing is pretty good, and it comes with a mouse and a converter. This configuration is quite affordable compared to the domestic version. Overall, it's cheap and beautiful. As for the performance of the machine, it will be evaluated after using it for a period of time.
This screen is really comfortable!
It is easy to use, and I will review it after using it for a period of time!
Education information: Beijing compresses the proportion of special students enrolled in junior high school in early 2016 - Xinhua Net
On the 21st and 22nd, the Beijing junior high school entrance examination for special students was organized and implemented by the Education Commission of each district.
This year, all districts in Beijing have compressed the proportion of special students, and the competition for special students is more intense.
Take Dongcheng District as an example. This year, the admission rate of special students from primary school to junior high school in this district is generally not more than 5% of the total enrollment plan of the district. The planned enrollment number is 380 people, and the admission rate is not more than 10% of the enrollment plan of the school.
All students who have special talents in sports, art and science and have registered online are eligible to participate in the special enrollment examination.
In order to facilitate students to participate in the assessment nearby, the Dongcheng District continued the arrangement of last year's assessment, setting up 1-2 assessment sites in each district, with a total of 13 assessment sites.
The examination points will be divided according to the examination area, the time will be divided by the hour, and the students will enter the examination points according to the time and take the examination in different examination rooms in different examination areas on that day.
On May 23, the district education and enrollment examination center published the list of students who passed the examination online, and students could check the examination results online.
Can it be delivered in 10 to 15 minutes?
Did not receive food
The key is that I haven't eaten tonight
If you can't send it, you can say it in advance.
Chairman of the Olympic Committee of Bosnia and Herzegovina: I believe China has the ability to hold a good Winter Olympic Games in special times - Xinhua News Agency
On December 11, the Xinhua News Agency in Sarajevo reported that the chairman of the Olympic Committee of Bosnia and Herzegovina, Kvesic, recently said that the Bosnian side is looking forward to the Beijing Winter Olympics and believes that China has the ability to hold the Winter Olympics in a special period.
Recently, the Chinese Ambassador to Bosnia and Herzegovina, Qi Ping, met with the Chairman of the Olympic Committee of Bosnia and Herzegovina, Kvesic, at the Olympic Center in Sarajevo.
During the meeting, Kvesic spoke highly of China-Bosnia and Herzegovina relations and said that he visited China at the time of the 2008 Beijing Summer Olympic Games. He was deeply impressed by the excellent organization of the Chinese side. He believed that China had the ability to hold the Winter Olympic Games in a special period; the Bosnian side was looking forward to the Beijing Winter Olympic Games, and the Bosnian Olympic Committee was actively organizing participation; the Bosnian side hoped to take this opportunity to carry out more extensive exchanges and cooperation with the Chinese side in the field of sports.
Qi Ping said that China and Poland have a special “Olympic bond”.
The 1984 Sarajevo Winter Olympics were successfully held here, and two months later, the 2022 Beijing Winter Olympics will also open, and will present a simple, safe and wonderful event to the world.
It is hoped that the two countries will deepen exchanges and cooperation in the preparation of winter sports events and athlete training, and the Chinese Embassy in Bosnia and Herzegovina is willing to continue to play the role of a bridge, taking the Beijing Winter Olympics as an opportunity to promote the deepening of cultural exchanges between the two countries, so that the people of the two countries can “move forward together”, and wish the athletes of Bosnia and Herzegovina to achieve good results in Beijing.
Before the meeting, the Bosnia and Herzegovina Olympic Committee held the "10th Annual Best Athlete" award ceremony, and Qi Ping was invited as a special guest to award the best young athlete of Bosnia and Herzegovina.
The activity site played the promotional video of the Beijing Winter Olympics on a loop.
So disappointed
Will I get my money back?
Dissatisfaction is not allowed! The shipping fee is also 20 yuan
It can't be helped! Can you ask that restaurant for me?
Thanks for following and of course some of the riders have done very well
Chocolate Addicts [French] by Dominique Eno, translated by Miao Xiaoxia, Shanghai Science and Technology Press
Original books support seven days no reason to return and exchange
My grandmother's New Year's Eve said to learn, play and sing the 24 solar terms, clear winter and see the distant mountains, my grandfather is a stupid child, my grandmother lives in a weird town, dumplings and moon cakes, a piece of chocolate, 2022
[Nora Books] The original version of "Crying Chocolate" and the original version of the "Robber's Little Palm Fairy Tale Pinyin Edition" by Zhang Qiusheng, the original version of grades one to three, the original version of the selected set of classic storybooks, children's reading materials, and extracurricular books for primary school students
[Jiaying Financial Books] 2022 Grand View, Xiaoshen, 100 Classes, 1,000 People in the Second Grade, Grandma on New Year's Eve, a Piece of Chocolate, 24 Solar Terms, Grandpa is an Idiot, My Grandma Lives in a Strange Town, Dumplings and Soup
[Nora Books] The Original Charlie and the Great Glass Elevator by Roald Dahl, a collection of works by Roald Dahl, a sequel to Charlie and the Chocolate Factory, translated by Ren Rongsong, children's literature for 7-9-12-year-olds, 3-4-5-6-7
There are 13 volumes in total, the incredible father of the fox, Charlie's chocolate factory, the collection of Roald Dahl's works, the children's reading storybook, 9-12 years old, non-phonetic version of the extracurricular books for the second, fourth and fifth grades of elementary school, and Matilda round
The full set of 72 volumes of the Horrible Science series, the 12 volumes of the classic mathematics series, the new knowledge of classic science, the mystery of nature, the electric shock thriller, the secret of chocolate, and the popular science reading books for the third, fourth, fifth and sixth grades.
Some books are sold at a higher price than the price tag, so please be cautious when purchasing.
Chocolate in the office: seven ways to work and be happy (German) by Weissenborn - Translated by Chen Bao, Yunnan Science and Technology Press [Authentic book, full amount discount. 】
【Fast invoice, coupon order, high-quality after-sales service, support 7-day no-reason return and exchange】
The six genuine volumes of “Nora’s Books”, Zuo Qing said, 100 classes and 1,000 people, 2nd grade extracurricular books, a piece of chocolate, grandpa is a clumsy kid, said to learn, play and sing the 24 solar terms, winter clears the distant mountains and dumplings, and the picture book of tangyuan and my grandma
[Nora Books] original, little monster urara, 8 volumes of general knowledge enlightenment picture book, mystery of chocolate factory, transformation of transportation tools, luggage transportation big adventure, picture story book for 3-4-5-6 years old
[Nora Books] The original version, you don't understand coffee + wine + bread + chocolate + tea, baking, cooking, tasting, making, appreciation, food control, diet culture, the book is interesting, valuable and fashionable life small encyclopedia
won the White Bread Children's Book Award and is suitable for primary school students in grades 3, 4, 5 and 6 to read, story books, summer and winter vacation reading books, and out-of-class reading books.
The original version of [Nora Book] [3 volumes in total] The French Blue Ribbon Sweets Handbook, Chocolate Sweets Classroom, World Sweets Master's Creative Works, and 100 Step-by-step Tutorials for Beginners
The original 3 books of [Nola Books], the complete collection of Roald Dahl's works, Charlie and the Chocolate Factory + Matilda + James and the Giant Peach 6-12-year-old reading children's books original children's literature
Hello, I have been waiting for this order for a very long time
It is constantly delayed
Thank you
Please help me cancel each order, and place each order again
Do I need an order to get credit?
Did you forget to send this?
What time can I send it?
There's no way
The code includes four $20 price cuts
#NAME# said they helped me reorder
I had to re-order and they charged me all over again.
But I ordered at 1:30 a.m.
48 hours of negative nucleic acid, set "buffer zone" State Council's joint prevention and control mechanism issued a document to strengthen the prevention and control of epidemic in port cities - Xinhuanet
Xinhua News Agency, Beijing, December 11 (reporters Dong Rufeng and Gu Tiancheng) The State Council's Joint Prevention and Control Mechanism recently issued a notice on strengthening the prevention and control of COVID-19 in port cities, requiring that people who have recently left land border port cities (excluding those connected with Hong Kong and Macao) must hold a 48-hour negative nucleic acid test certificate, and people who go to land border port cities must undergo at least one nucleic acid test after arrival.
According to the notice, the time limit for the above requirements is from the date of determination and announcement of port cities in each province, autonomous region, and municipality to March 15, 2022.
In addition, the notice also proposes that cities with conditions can study setting up epidemic prevention buffer zones within their jurisdiction.
An official from the National Health and Family Planning Commission's Disease Prevention and Control Bureau said that for some port cities, cross-border trade is the main economic pillar of the local area, and the two sides have frequent exchanges.
Implement a differentiated management policy, from one line of prevention and control to two lines, which is expected to move the control point forward, compress the risk of epidemic spillover, and achieve the maximum effect of epidemic prevention and control with the minimum social impact and the lowest social cost.
Recently, China has experienced several local cluster epidemics, all of which were imported from overseas through port cities.
The above notice pointed out that this exposed some problems such as the lack of timeliness of epidemic monitoring and early warning in some places, the non-implementation of closed-loop management for high-risk personnel, the formality of regular nucleic acid detection, the lack of disinfection in each link of cold chain goods, the non-standardization of management of centralized isolation places, and the lack of scientific and accurate emergency response to the epidemic.
The notice requires that efforts be made in nine aspects, such as improving the epidemic prevention and control mechanism of port cities, perfecting the epidemic monitoring and warning system, and implementing border control measures, so as to speed up the supplementation of shortfalls and weak links in the prevention and control of port cities, and do a good job in prevention and control work without relaxation and in a scientific and precise manner, so as to weave a dense and firm defense line for the prevention and control of imported cases.
The notice emphasized that each port city must carry out epidemic prevention and control and livelihood protection work at the same time, publish and open up the hotline for livelihood protection, regularly check for signs and hidden dangers in the supply of basic living materials and prices, and timely solve and proactively respond to prominent problems reflected by the masses.
According to the notice, the port cities referred to include the counties (cities, districts, and banners) where the open land, water, and air ports are located, as well as the cities (prefectures, provinces, and leagues) where they are located, and the specific range will be determined by each province (autonomous region, and municipality) according to the needs of epidemic prevention and control, and announced in a timely manner.
Color: As shown in the picture (the color difference cannot be avoided in shooting. The color of the real object will be explained. The color of the clothing will become brighter due to the outdoor light. Please consult in advance before purchasing)
This is a vintage item. If you're buying vintage for the first time, please search "vintage" or "vintage clothing" on Baidu.
A one-off.
It is inevitable that there will be minor defects in second-hand products, so if you decide to buy second-hand products, you should be prepared for this. If you are a perfectionist, you should be careful when taking pictures. If there are obvious defects, I will explain them. This is a characteristic of second-hand products. In my opinion, good things do not care about that little bit of influence!
Vintage products in the store are not accepted for return or exchange.
The so-called second-hand clothes, vintage, and design all have a sense of retro, that is, nostalgia. The reason why we like second-hand clothes is that we like its sense of age and its texture!
So, if you can't handle it, don't say your clothes are old-fashioned, just say you're not suitable!
Those with no risk tolerance should buy with caution. Online shopping is risky, and shoppers should be cautious.
If the item is not suitable for the buyer, or the buyer does not like it, etc, the buyer can ask the shopkeeper to put it back on the shelf for transfer. Once sold, it will not be returned or exchanged. Please do not bid if you cannot do it. Thank you for your cooperation!
A part of it was sold in the circle on June 11, 2021.
Place an order with a number, and the antique items will not be returned or exchanged after they are sold.
Purchase Notice
All products sold in our shop are non-returnable and non-exchangeable.
Please spend a few minutes reading the purchase instructions
Our products are all photographed with real objects. Some products may have a little color difference due to problems such as display and light. If you do not accept any color difference, please read this clearly. Please consider carefully before purchasing, and color difference will not be used as the reason for negative reviews and returns and exchanges.
Our store does not accept the reasons of different from imagination, style and style as the reasons for return, exchange and negative review.
The size is measured by the real object, and the error must exist, but we believe that the error is very small. If you receive the size is not suitable, it cannot be returned or exchanged. Therefore, you must consider carefully in advance.
If you have any problems, please contact me immediately, and I will solve it with all my heart. If there is a malicious bad review, I will complain to the end.
We will check everything carefully before it is sent out, and the quality will not be a problem.
After receiving the clothes, please confirm receipt and give a rating within 48 hours. Please be considerate of our hard work.
Tube Video Exposes the Truth About the U.S. Military's 20-Year Bloodthirsty Killings - Xinhuanet
(Video Source: YouTube)
On December 11, a micro-documentary entitled "Killing Machine" on the YouTube platform attracted wide attention.
The film tells the story of how the United States launched the Afghan war under the pretext of "anti-terrorism" and forced the export of American-style democracy through war, 20 years of war, bloodthirsty, indiscriminate killing of innocent people, and committed all kinds of crimes against humanity.
They used drones to attack hospitals, schools and other civilian facilities, twisted human nature, and established a murder group.
In the past 20 years, the U.S. military has killed tens of thousands of innocent Afghan civilians.
The U.S. military has set up "black prisons" to torture and humiliate "suspects".
One atrocity after another has fuelled more hatred among the Afghan people.
As the video said, the American "anti-terrorism" war is "the more you fight, the more you fear".
War has not brought peace, democracy and prosperity to the Afghan people, but only a country in ruins and countless killings and destruction.
Click on the video, and let’s expose the truth of the United States’ bloodthirsty killing in the name of “anti-terrorism”, and expose the hypocrisy of American-style democracy!
By chance, I saw the following article. From the perspective of business and shelf life, I will talk about why this customer wants the logistics company in the bonded area to do canning. Although canning is deep processing, it is not within the scope of operation of the bonded logistics company. The following text may be able to explain why the customer wants to do so?
I have visited many milk powder manufacturers and contacted many milk powder production lines.
In fact, the ingredients of powdered milk in a bag and powdered milk in a can are exactly the same and there is no difference between them.
So, everyone will definitely ask: Why is the shelf life of bagged food one year, while the shelf life of canned food is two years or longer?
Or ask: Why is there such a big price difference between listening and bagging?
In fact, from this point of view, many consumers, or mothers, believe that the quality will be much better because of the difference in raw materials.
In fact, the raw materials are the same, but people think that the more expensive ones are better.
There are also consumers who eat it with this kind of mentality, and say that the taste or flavor of the packaging is different!
Now, I want to tell you the reason why hearing aids are expensive. Where are they expensive?
Why is there such a big price difference when their raw materials are the same?
Because when the manufacturer sets the price, most of them consider that if the bag price is too high, it is difficult for consumers to accept it, which means that the profit of the manufacturer is very low, or there is no profit at all, so how can the manufacturer survive?
So, they have a large increase in the price of their fittings to ensure their profit space.
Therefore, most of the manufacturers promote the hearing aid instead of the bag.
There are so many manufacturers who spend tens of millions or even hundreds of millions on advertising every year. Where does this money come from?
You can imagine.
As society develops, the cost of market promotion, such as the promotional personnel of the shopping mall, the display fee of the shopping mall, the gift fee of the product, the advertising fee, etc., is constantly increasing.
Therefore, various manufacturers are also constantly increasing new products, and they are listening to them, and their prices are also constantly rising. In fact, these are new products that have emerged as a result of the increase in market costs.
The main purpose is to obtain higher profits. In fact, the increase in the cost of their raw materials will not exceed 3 or 4 yuan.
There are also some brands that will do anything to promote their products, and hook up with doctors in hospitals to help them promote their products. They will take a profit of 30 yuan to 80 yuan from each sale.
China's related laws absolutely do not allow such operation methods, and in fact, this practice is cheating the consumers.
It is recommended that you buy a bag of milk powder and put it into a can if you have a can at home, which can save costs and increase the preservation and sealing of the milk powder, and have no effect on children.
In addition, do not think that the shelf life of the bag is longer than that of the bag. If the shelf life of the bag is the same as that of the bag after opening, it is just that the bag is not easy to store after opening and is prone to moisture and spoilage.
The delivery was late and the food was cold. It was dry and hard after being cold, and it was completely impossible to eat.
And the soup spilled out
Cancelled immediately, whatever #PRS_ORG# sent is definitely cold by now
I didn't take it!
#NAME# said no one went to get it
We called them up
I'll call the police if you don't give me my money back
I've used #PRS_ORG# multiple times, today's was the worst experience
It is not acceptable at all
OK, you can
But it also reminds restaurants and riders
to prevent it from happening again.
I would like to know the exact delivery time
That time is continually delayed.
I don't know when
Can I get my money back if I cancel the order?
How to pay the service fee to the rider?
One cyclist has already been confirmed dead, more than an hour ago.
They don't want to wait any longer
Don’t scare people off at the starting line - Xinhua News Agency
When visiting the book fair, you can often feel the popularity of success education books.
Many of today's self-help books preach the "best principle" -- that is, first assume or imply that you can "do it," and then tell you what you need to do to "do it."
It is equivalent to skipping over the most important and fundamental stage of "how to do it".
This is why all these books have a common feature -- either do it all the way to the best or don't do it at all; either it's 100, or it's 0; either you climb to the top of the mountain, or you just stay where you are.
This "best principle" makes everyone admit that "it is absolutely correct", but 99% of people will be frightened before the starting line.
Because this theory advocates a path of "You must make up your mind, start over, and make a 180 degree change," which is exactly the fatal weakness of many people.
For those who are set in their ways, stubborn, and refuse to change, you insist on shouting "You need to change" in their ears, which is undoubtedly an act of self-deception and talking to a cow.
Most people will feel timid in the face of the word "transformation", hesitate, and find it difficult to make a decision; or they will make the decision of "transformation" on the spur of the moment, and bravely take the first step, but often the good times do not last long, and it is difficult to last for a long time.
Mr. Ma Sanli's famous skit "From Tomorrow" is a classic that best reflects this "universal human nature".
The biggest problem with the "best principle" is that the threshold is too high. It often exceeds the ability limit of ordinary people, making most people "wonder at the door and sigh".
Perhaps the "second-best principle" is a way for more ordinary people to walk on the path of relative success.
The core of the "second-best principle" is "lower the threshold" - it encourages a "theory of small victories," that is, if you can't do 100, you can do 1; because 1 is always greater than 0; if you can't climb Mount Tai, you can climb the little sand dune in front of your door; because it's better than standing still.
All in all, it's better to do something than nothing.
With the threshold greatly lowered, there is more possibility for ordinary people to stick to it, and the probability of success will also increase.
The path to success for those who follow the “second-best principle” is just a little longer.
In short, the "best principle", although it sounds like a banner to make everyone successful, in fact, it can only motivate a few people; while the "second-best principle", can effectively motivate more people and make more people benefit as much as possible.
Do I need to place a new order now?
No one answered the phone.
Constant delays
Not delivered yet
When will it be delivered?
How can we get in touch?
Please cancel the order
I can't wait any longer, thank you
He was two meals short, but one order was complete
I would like to ask, how can I contact the rider?
The first rider just told me that there should be another rider to send
The resource of Qinghai Lake naked carp has increased by 0.71 thousand tons this year - Xinhua News Agency
Xinhua News Agency Xining, December 11 (Reporters Luo Xiaofei, Zhang Hongxiang) The reporter learned from the Qinghai Provincial Department of Agriculture and Rural Affairs that the latest monitoring results show that the resource reserves of Qinghai Lake naked carp increased by 0.71 thousand tons this year compared with last year, reaching 10.85 thousand tons. Compared with the initial protection in 2002, it has increased by more than 40 times.
Qinghai Lake naked carp, also known as "Huang fish", is a precious fish species unique to Qinghai Lake, which plays a crucial role in maintaining the safety and biodiversity of the "water-fish-bird" ecological chain in the Qinghai Lake Basin.
In the 1960s and 1970s of the 20th century, the number of Qinghai Lake crucian carp decreased sharply under the influence of factors such as human large-scale hunting and the gradual deterioration of the breeding environment of Qinghai Lake crucian carp. In 2002, the stock of Qinghai Lake crucian carp was only 2,592 tons.
In 2004, Qinghai Lake naked carp was listed as an endangered species in the Red List of Chinese Species.
Since 2003, Qinghai Province has implemented the breeding of fish in the lake, and prohibited any unit, collective and individual from catching naked carp in Qinghai Lake and its main rivers and tributaries, and prohibited the sale of naked carp and its products.
At the same time, through artificial propagation and release, as well as the cleaning of the main river channels of Qinghai Lake and the design of scientific and reasonable "fish passage" and other measures, the protection of Qinghai Lake naked carp resources has been continuously strengthened, and the reserve of Qinghai Lake naked carp resources has been increasing year by year.
Yang Lin, deputy director of the Qinghai Provincial Department of Agriculture and Rural Affairs, introduced that as of now, the Qinghai Lake naked carp had implemented artificial breeding and release of nearly 180 million tails, and contributed more than 23% to the recovery of the Qinghai Lake naked carp resources.
The Qinghai Three Rivers Source Region is an important ecological barrier and water source conservation area in China and Asia, and Qinghai Lake is a natural barrier and ecological functional area that controls the eastward spread of western desertification.
In order to protect the ecological environment of the Three Rivers Headwaters and the Qinghai Lake waters, protect aquatic wild animals, and maintain the biodiversity of the Qinghai-Tibet Plateau, Qinghai has successively issued notices to ban fishing in the key waters of the Yangtze River, the Yellow River, and Qinghai Lake this year, building a “one river, one river and one lake” comprehensive ban on fishing management system.
I spent more than $180 on food using my #PRS_ORG# RED credit card.
But the order did not come with the $20.
Original software, free trial, use computer and mobile phone at the same time, no paper version
2022 Ye Jun's "Advanced English-Chinese Translation Theory and Practice" (2nd edition) notes and explanation of the postgraduate entrance examination questions/syllabus of the master's entrance examination, teaching materials, review materials, entrance examination
2022 Leaf's Modern Television News Notes and End-of-Chapter Problems (Including Typical Questions) Explained/Master's Entrance Examination Syllabus, Tutoring Materials, Review Materials, Entrance Examination Questions
Original phone photography for beginners. It's so easy to take beautiful photos. Photography composition and lighting techniques, phone photography tutorial book, app software photography post-processing
Quality books, genuine assurance, quality service, timely delivery, worry-free after-sales
The Red Hat Linux System Administrator's Guide (with CD-ROM)
The animal novel king, Shen Shiqi, has a collection of books: The Golden Leaf of the Tiger Cub [If you need group purchase, please contact customer service]
Book information is collected and uploaded by the software. If there are any errors in the information, please refer to the actual product received. If you mind, please do not shoot!
If you have any questions, please contact the online customer service!
The restaurant only gave me one bag, and I had to put it in the bag because it was cold
I'd like to ask, is the takeaway in a bag?
We only see one bag
Wondering if it was sent by mistake, or if someone took it, thanks
1 hour and it still hasn't been delivered
I just read an article about fake news that was too long.
For the men who don't know, here's a little education.
Most girls will suddenly experience their first period at some point between the ages of 13 and 15, and will go through menopause around the age of 50.
If you are in good health, it will be more regular, once a month.
But it's not regular enough to be able to predict accurately, with a margin of error of about a week or so, so you need to be prepared in advance, and sometimes you'll be caught off-guard (when it suddenly comes a few days earlier).
The length of time, the amount of blood, and the severity of cramps vary from person to person. Some people have three-day periods, some people have one-week periods; some people have light periods, some people have heavy periods; some people have no symptoms, some people are in so much pain they have to be taken away in an ambulance. Menstrual cramps change over time, and what was not painful before does not mean it will never be painful.
Menstruation is out of control, and you bleed for 24 hours a day from the beginning to the end of a few days. All you can do is use sanitary napkins or sanitary cotton to suck the blood to prevent it from flowing onto clothes and chairs.
Dysmenorrhea is mainly caused by the secretion of prostaglandins. If you take ibuprofen before the dysmenorrhea starts, it can effectively relieve the pain of this month, but it is useless to take it after the dysmenorrhea starts.
Before menstruation, due to the congestion of the uterus and excessive release of prostaglandins, it is easy to have diarrhea.
If it's around the time of your cycle and you get a sudden bout of diarrhea, you'll probably get your period within two days.
It is best to change sanitary napkins every two or three hours, otherwise it is easy to breed bacteria. Excluding sleeping time, the worst case is to change six times a day, seven days a month, that is, 42 pieces. If you add the pieces prepared in advance, there may be 50 pieces, which is not one piece a month.
(Here is a little modification: sanitary napkins do not need to be changed frequently. They can be changed every 5 or 6 hours, and up to 8 hours)
Hormones during your period may make you more irritable, and ovulation may make you more emotional because of the hormonal changes in your body, which is very unfortunate. Your body is making things difficult for you.
But the official crime rate data shows that women's ability to control their emotions is still very high, and they will not use emotional problems as an excuse.
The flow isn't just blood, it includes shed uterine lining.
The endometrium is the thinnest after the end of menstruation, and it gradually thickens. It can be understood that the uterus is a house, and a house is built every month (the endometrium thickens) to prepare to welcome guests, but there are no guests. All of them are torn down (menstruation discharged), and a new house is built next month, and the cycle is repeated.
Menstruation is very inconvenient. For several decades, for several days a month, you will bleed for 24 hours, and you will also have abdominal pain and back pain. Who would like it?
But people are born because their mothers have periods, and periods are to prepare a 10-month house for you to live in when you first come to this world, so everyone should thank their mothers for having regular and healthy periods.
A lot of things women used to do were suppressed and society brainwashed women into thinking it was dirty, shameful and that's just how it was, but times have changed.
If anyone feels that menstruation is disgusting, and feels that the preparation of the female body for the birth of life is disgusting, it should not be said in public. Girls, stand up, don't think like this. Men who have never experienced it, will never experience it, and don't know much about it, don't be so ungrateful and ignorant. How can you face your mother like this? How can you want your child?
Finally, sisters, try the sanitary cotton strips, which are really easy to use.
Today is the Winter Solstice, and it's disappointing to receive the wrong gift
They have to order separately for the kids to eat.
I hope that the store will check the products in the midst of the hustle and bustle.
Do foot baths make your feet numb? Is it an electric shock?
Choosing a suitable foot bath can have a good foot massage and health care effect. Today, the Guomei editor will answer this question. I hope it will be helpful to friends.
As people's health awareness increases, foot bath tubs have become more and more popular with consumers, and a large number of products of different grades have emerged in the market, from hundreds of yuan to thousands of yuan, providing consumers with a wide range of choices.
According to the related data, compared with traditional household appliances, the sales of health-care household appliances such as foot bathtubs are booming, but foot bathtubs do not have specific industry standards, so there are certain safety hazards.
"It's just too dangerous to soak your feet in electric water!"
Mr. Li told the reporter that he recently bought a foot bath for his father as a birthday gift, but his father felt numbness in his feet when he was soaking his feet.
At first, Mr. Li thought it was caused by the vibration function of the footbath, but he didn’t expect that when the vibration function was turned off, his father still felt that his feet were numb.
Mr. Li used an electric pen to test, and the electric pen actually lit up. Mr. Li was surprised to find that there was electricity in the water of the foot bath.
Later, he contacted the merchant, and the merchant’s attitude was not bad, although he returned the foot bath, Mr. Li still felt unhappy.
Because he found that there was no clear and detailed industry regulations in terms of the highest temperature setting, the applicable group of people and the harmlessness of the material of the foot bath basin, which has been popular for a long time.
However, in general, foot bath tubs will not have the problem of electricity, but it is not ruled out that some products are not strictly inspected when leaving the factory.
Therefore, when buying, choose a separate foot bath tub.
There is no safety hazard in the separation of water and electricity.
At the same time, you can use the electric pen at will.
The 13th Provincial Tea Expo was opened - Visual Headlines - Hunan Daily News Network - Huasheng Online
Hunan Daily, December 10 - (full-media reporter Zhang Shangwu, Hu Panpan, correspondent Liu Xiaoling, photographer Li Jian) Today in the morning, the 13th Hunan Tea Industry Expo and New Hu Red Tea Promotion will be held in the Hunan International Convention and Exhibition Center. The tea industry will be shown, the tea technology will be innovated, the tea culture will be popularized, and the target of 100 billion tea industry will be accelerated.
Hou Shunli, Vice Chairman of the Board of Directors of the All-China Federation of Supply and Marketing Cooperatives, and Ye Hong, Vice Chairman of the Standing Committee of the Provincial People's Congress attended the opening ceremony.
Professor Liu Zhonghua, an academician of the Chinese Academy of Engineering, solemnly recommended at the opening ceremony: The source of lake red is new in Xinhua, and the rise of red tea injects new vitality into the "colorful Hunan tea".
In recent years, the provincial party committee and the provincial government have vigorously supported the development of the tea industry, promoted the construction of a 100-billion-yuan Hunan tea industry, and formed a development pattern of "Three Hunan, Four Waters and Five-Color Tea".
The tea industry within the province has increased innovation, with green tea, black tea, red tea, and other main tea varieties taking turns to launch efforts, and the main tea-producing areas are promoting the integration of tea and travel, which is driving a large number of tea farmers to increase their income.
The feng shui is changing, and red tea is making a comeback.
Experts in the tea industry in the province said that after picking green tea, picking red tea and black tea, tea farmers have income all year round, and the output value of tea gardens goes straight up.
At the opening ceremony, the provincial leaders awarded the fourth batch of enterprises authorized to use the "Hunan Red Tea" trademark. Xinzhou held the "Hunan Red Tea Source".
In the New Hu Red Tea Exhibition Hall, Fujian tea merchants spotted a high mountain tea called “Ice Spring” and immediately placed an order.
Wang Zhong, Secretary-General of the Provincial Tea Industry Association, said happily that the current epidemic and other factors have more or less affected the tea market, but from the scene of the Tea Expo, there were many highlights.
The new-style red tea has a touch of red, which injects the connotation of tea culture, and the Hunan tea industry is welcoming a new spring.
If these foods are not heated, can they be canceled?
I don't want it, because I can't park down there, he couldn't bring it up
Metaphysics is the study of questions that cannot be answered through rational reasoning and logic.
Metaphysics is the fundamental law of philosophy, which aims to explain the basic nature of existence and the world.
The Chinese translation of "Metaphysics" is derived from the phrase "形而上者谓之道，形而下者谓之器" in "易经•系辞上传", which was translated by Japanese Inoue Tetsujiro (in the Meiji period) from metaphysic.
Branches of metaphysics include ontology, natural theology and its related issues.
Ontology is the "study of which nouns represent real existing things, and which nouns only represent a concept."
Metaphysical naturalism is the denial of the existence of God.
Its theoretical basis is that all phenomena can be explained by the concept of natural reason, proposed by philosophers who support science and evolution.
Methodological naturalism, on the other hand, refers to a method of research that is silent on the existence of God.
The philosophy of mind is a branch of philosophy that studies the nature of consciousness and its relation to the body (especially the brain).
Dualism and monism are the two main schools of thought on the relationship between the mind and the body.
Epistemology is a branch of philosophy that deals with the nature, origin, and scope of knowledge.
Ethics is the systematic study of human moral life; here, morality is defined as all of the rules of behavior recognized by a group of people or a culture.
Mainly divided into meta-ethics (abstractly studies the nature of ethical theory or criticism) and normative ethics (judge various different moral views, and give moral criteria for the right or wrong behavior.
It studies what kind of moral behavior people should follow), applied ethics (an academic discipline that applies ethical theories to real-life situations, including bioethics, political ethics, etc.), and descriptive ethics (collecting information about how people live, and making generalizations based on the observed patterns.
It does not start from a pre-conceived theory of morality, but investigates the real choices made by actual moral agents, and all the moral factors involved in making those choices, and it studies the moral views held by social groups.
The history of ethics includes ancient Greek and Roman ethics and medieval Christian ethics.
The first part is the ethical thought of humanism, represented by Valla and Montaigne.
The second part: the ethical thought of the Reformation, represented by Calvin.
The third part: Political ethics, represented by Machiavelli and others, modern ethics (17-18th century, British empiricism ethics, represented by Hume and others, 17-18th century, continental rationalism ethics, represented by Spinoza and others, 18th century, French enlightenment ethics, represented by Voltaire and others, 18-19th century, German academic ethics, represented by Kant and Hegel and others, 18-19th century, British utilitarianism ethics, represented by Bentham and Sidgwick and others, 19th century, British evolutionism ethics, represented by Spencer and Huxley and others, late 19th century, German neo-Kantianism ethics, represented by Kierkegaard and others, late 19th century, neo-Hegelianism ethics, represented by Thomas Hill Green and others), transitional period ethics (non-rationalism ethics, represented by Kierkegaard, Schopenhauer and Nietzsche and others).
Logic is the study of "principles and standards of valid inference and proof".
Logic usually includes three parts: inductive reasoning, abductive reasoning and deductive reasoning, which can be divided into formal logic and informal logic.
Aesthetics is a discipline that studies the essence and meaning of beauty.
#NUMBER# yuan has been received, and it is the missing food.
Yang Xingte (che), whose real name is Jiang Bo, was born in the year of the sheep in the month of the sheep, walking on the grass, suitable for his place, so he was called Yang Xingte, and people called him “Uncle Yang”.
He is known as the "suspense genius" in the industry for publishing works such as "Strange Tales from Thailand", "Strange Tales from India", "Strange Tales from Japan" and "Strange Tales from South Korea" in the "Strange Code" series. He claims that he is "good at talking nonsense in a serious manner".
"Under the Lamplight," also known as "Strange Tales from a Chinese Studio," is a new work by the "suspense genius" Yang Xing, which will take you into the marrow of Chinese folk customs. What are the tragic and touching love songs behind the legends that have been passed down to this day?
South Xiaolou and Yue Wuhua, who are "wayfarers", once again embarked on a journey to reveal the mystery of suicide. Their identities will soon be revealed.
The “mystery genius” Yang Xing has turned his hair white. He has dedicated more than one million copies of his best-selling books!
The original "China Anecdote", the new work after "Exotic Code", the same author, the same protagonist, continuing the unfinished story of "Thailand Anecdote" and "India Anecdote"!
They took away one thing, you have to pay for a McChicken sauce.
You call the restaurant to bring it up
I just don't want to go downstairs to buy things, so I spend so much money on takeaway
Ding Zilin: To a friend.
I would like to express my sincere gratitude to all my friends for their humanitarian assistance over the past 30 years since the accident of my relatives, especially since I called for humanitarian assistance to my friends at home and abroad in my personal name in early 1994.
Nowadays, most of the deceased's parents have already passed away, and the orphans have grown up and have jobs.
It is your acts of kindness that have helped us through the most difficult of times.
Currently, the COVID-19 epidemic is raging around the world, and most of the donors are already retired.
Therefore, I earnestly appeal to you to stop the humanitarian donation for the Tiananmen Mothers, a humanitarian assistance activity that should have ended long ago.
I will always remember your kindness, and I believe your good deeds will be recorded in history.
I can only express my wishes in this way for various reasons. Please understand, my friends!
Please accept my sincere blessings.
Tao Ye said: Please allow me to take this opportunity to make a simple introduction to the 32-year history of the International Federation of Chinese Students and Scholars (IFCSS) and the Minnesota China Democracy Foundation (MCDF) engaged in humanitarian assistance.
In the process of humanitarian relief, the American Federation of Self-Learning and the Minnesota Chinese Democratic Foundation are parallel organizations, and the project implementers often overlap.
(Apple Daily Photo: The Tiananmen Mothers website is managed by Tao Ye.) pic.twitter.com/UxID9ZGjzm
Relief funds often fail to reach the hands of June 4 victims.
In 1994, at the suggestion of Mr. Ding, the “Tiananmen Mothers” set up a special group to coordinate and take charge of the receipt and distribution of relief funds.
In 1998, the MCDF established the "June 4th Orphans Education Fund". After 11 years of implementation, in 2009, after all the June 4th orphans had graduated from university, the MCDF established the "Special Assistance Fund for June 4th Orphans" and has been implementing it ever since.
These projects are mainly funded by campus and social donations in 1989, individual generous donations, and the support of the Democracy Foundation of brother universities.
Since 2018, it has also been supported by the Parole Research Foundation.
Until last year, after 31 years, the June 4th victims finally received a part of the donations raised in the name of June 4th in Hong Kong.
During this time, China Human Rights continued to implement their humanitarian assistance projects independently.
We understand that Mr. Ding stopped the June 4th donations for the consideration of the donors, and we are indeed some retired elderly people, and our income is not as abundant as before retirement. Therefore, we would like to express our gratitude to Mr. Ding's "Letter to Friends".
We will respect the decision of the asylum-seekers to terminate the project within two years, and immediately resume it when needed.
I would like to express my gratitude and respect to those brave fellows who have been generous and risked their lives to deliver humanitarian aid for many years.
Brand: mesobiosystem
Place of Origin: Mainland China
Color classification: Droplet chip 1, Droplet chip 2, Droplet chip 3, Droplet chip 4, Droplet chip 5, Droplet chip 6, Droplet chip 7, Droplet chip 8, Double layer droplet
Thank you very much for choosing our products. Before using our chips, please spend 5 minutes to carefully read the following information:
Please check the goods after opening the box to ensure that the goods are complete.
If there is anything missing, please contact the customer service in time.
The cover plate of the microfluidic chip is made of PC material, please do not allow solvents that react with PC to enter.
Do not use a manual injection syringe to inject the chip directly, otherwise it is easy to leak.
Before delivery, the microfluidic chip with a common base is tested with pure water at a sample pressure of 500mbar (100um channel depth) or 300mbar (50um channel depth).
The glass base chips are all tested with pure water under the sample pressure of 800mbar (100um channel) before shipment. During the use of the glass base chip, please pay attention not to collide with sharp objects, otherwise it will damage the base.
When using, please consider the viscosity of the solution and do not exceed this range, otherwise it will cause leakage.
For the common-base microfluidic microchip, under the condition of using a syringe pump to inject pure water, we recommend that the flow rate is set below 150ul/min, and the oil phase flow rate is recommended to be set below 50ul/min.
Consider the viscosity of your actual sample liquid, and increase your flow rate parameter value from slow to fast.
After the experiment, please clean the internal channel of the universal chip in time, otherwise it is easy to cause blockage.
Microfluidic chips are consumables and cannot be used repeatedly for a long time.
If the chip is damaged due to long-term use or improper operation, it will not be returned or exchanged.
If you need a microfluidic chip that can withstand greater pressure or flow, please contact customer service for customization.
The normal delivery cycle of the chip is within 1 week, and the stock can be shipped within 24 hours after placing an order. Please consult the customer service before placing an order.
If you have any questions about how to connect our chip with the sample system, you can refer to the following link https://zhuanlan.zhihu.com/p/60474873, or search for the WeChat public account “MesoBiotech” to get more help.
You can also visit our website (http://www.mesobiosys.com) to download a brochure that lists all of our products.
For more information on our products, please contact our online customer service.
I'm across from #PRS_ORG#
Hello
May I ask that the order time is constantly extended
How long does it take to deliver?
At the time of booking, it was said that it would arrive at 16:10-16:30.
Then I'll wait until 7:30 to see if it can be delivered
Where does the Holy Street lead to?
Which street in Hong Kong leads to St. George's Street?
What's the order situation like now?
I entered it in December.
Therefore, this month, you can use the #PRS_ORG# RED credit card to enjoy a $20 discount 4 times.
I didn't receive the order, can you help me check if the rider is still on the way
Hello, can you help contact the rider and ask if he is still on the way?
I didn't receive an order, checked and there was no food, no one contacted me to say it had been cancelled
Usually, when there is a delivery, the management downstairs will call to ask, and they will let the person in first after asking, but the management office has never contacted me.
Design, everywhere (recommended in the reading guide for middle and primary school students, recommended in the reading guide for middle and primary school students, recommended in the reading guide for middle and primary school students, recommended in the reading guide for middle and primary school students, recommended in the reading guide for middle and primary school students, recommended in the reading guide for middle and primary school students, recommended in the reading guide for middle and primary school students, recommended in the reading guide for middle and primary school students, recommended in the reading guide for middle and primary school students, recommended in the reading guide for middle and primary school students, recommended in the reading guide for middle and primary school students, recommended in the reading guide for middle and primary school students, recommended in the reading guide for middle and primary school students, recommended in the reading guide for middle and primary school students, recommended in the reading guide for middle and primary school students, recommended in the reading guide for middle and primary school students, recommended in the reading guide for middle and primary school students, recommended in the reading guide for middle and primary school students, recommended in the reading guide for middle and primary school students, recommended in the reading guide for middle and primary school students, recommended in the reading guide for middle and primary school students,
Cambridge Dual-Language Readers Novella, Fatal Memory (Level 2, Cambridge KET level, more than 800 words of vocabulary)
Cambridge original edition, an international award-winning work, has been popular all over the world for 20 years, and has been read synchronously by young people all over the world. It is included in the library catalogue of middle and primary schools across the country, compiled by teachers of national key secondary schools, and scanned the QR code to listen to the English and American voice theater effect recording.
[New] A black book about colors, a hard-cover picture book for 3-6 year-old children, illustrated by Peng Yi, was selected into the new reading base catalog of Bologna Children's Book Fair. It is a pre-school children's reading material published by Relay Publishing House.
The new genuine product can be issued with an invoice, and there are discounts for group purchases.
[China Business Overseas Direct Ordering] Descriptive Catalogue of the Writings of Sir Walter
The design of the reading series for elementary and middle school students, everywhere (selected in the reading guidance directory for primary and secondary school students)
A black book about colors 3 to 6-year-old children's picture book illustration award-winning in Bologna, selected into the new reading foundation directory, preschool children's reading material, Relay publishing authorized version
【Can be invoiced】Original Century Witness The Great Translator Danica Seleskovic Biography Literature Biography Literature Simultaneous Interpretation Language Translator Student Reference Book
This is an authentic product. Century witness, the great translator Danica Celeskovic, biographical literature, biography, simultaneous interpretation, language translators and students reference book, research publishing house
[Original books] [Xiaoli Reading Series for Primary and Secondary Schools] Design, everywhere (selected in the Reading Guide Catalogue for Primary and Secondary School Students) [can be invoiced]
The #PRS_ORG# testified that there was no one to pick it up, and the #PRS_ORG# falsely accused me of being self-serving
I'd like to reiterate that I made the delivery
When they finished, you didn't take it to deliver, and then I was falsely accused of taking it myself
I demand that you cancel it immediately, or I will call the police
Time Capsule Photography has no branches for the time being.
Members' comments
[Effect] Photo effect: I took two sets of clothes. Overall, it’s not bad. I like this set of pictures very much.
[Service] Service details: Because I was pregnant, I felt a little uncomfortable during the makeup process. The makeup artist and staff were very considerate. They let me rest for a while and kept pouring me hot water to drink.
Package price: RMB 1,000
Thanks for the rabbit's comment. I originally said that the rejection of ancient style is not suitable for ancient style, but I didn't expect the finished product to be so beautiful.
Thanks for Dandan’s recognition, your satisfaction will make us full of energy to move forward, and we will continue to work hard!
This photography studio is amazing. I highly recommend it to everyone!
Whether it is reception, makeup, clothing, lighting, photography or post-production, it is impeccable.
The makeup artist is especially meticulous, and will match a makeup style suitable for you according to your style. The cosmetics used are all high-end brands.
Teacher Tian Liang doesn't need to say more, his photography is very professional.
The whole studio has an artistic atmosphere, and there are two little cats to play with.
We work in Beijing. The better photo studios in Beijing need to be booked half a year in advance. Some of my colleagues have had their photos taken in Beijing and I looked at the photos and thought they were just so-so.
I specifically looked for this studio, a place with soul and attitude.
Our facial expression management is not very good, and we feel that this is also the shortcoming of most people. The photographer, Liangge, will shoot and record the natural and wonderful moments.
The makeup artist, the photographer, the post-production designer, a good team.
When it came out, we and the people around us couldn’t stop talking about it.
I have already recommended my friends to go there, and my friends were also very happy when they saw the photos.
I hope that such studios will not be buried, and that more people will find it and shoot their own style, instead of being all the same.
Thank you very much for the five-star reviews from Zhan Ying and Jing Ling. Both of them are very creative newcomers. We are a creative studio. As long as the customers like us, we will do our best to complete it. Thank you for getting to know and meet
The sweet and caring assistant, and the lively and cheerful photography teacher. Everyone in the team is super nice. It was a wonderful shooting experience. It is an unforgettable experience. The effect of the shooting is much better than I expected. Everyone has worked hard. I am very grateful to everyone.
Thank you for your comments. It is also a kind of fate to meet you. From Hohhot to Qinhuangdao, our trust is thousands of kilometers away. I am very happy to meet you. If there is a chance, I will come to Qinhuangdao again.
How do I pay?
The redelivered meals have arrived
No riders picked up
Now the restaurant staff are calling me
A programming novice who wants to share his personal experience.
If you plan to join this industry, you can choose to go to a place for training, but if you don't have this idea, it is better to self-study. After all, the cost of training is very high, and it takes 6 months to learn.
But if you are planning to enter this industry, training is indeed a very good choice, especially for those who have very weak self-control, training is a very good choice.
If you have a strong self-discipline, you can also choose to self-study, but it will be more tiring.
Of course, it is very important to choose a good training institution.
First of all, we should look at the teacher strength of this institution. If the teacher strength is not strong enough, this training institution will have no meaning. Of course, some newly established training institutions do not have particularly strong teacher strength.
Secondly, it is better to investigate the training institution before choosing. After all, only the students of the institution know how good or bad the institution is, and whether the courses taught are good or bad.
Hello, in fact, I don’t know how to answer your question, because I haven’t introduced your personal situation, and learning this thing has a lot to do with your personal situation.
For example, your profession, age, the language you want to learn, and even the city you want to learn in, are all related to the industry you want to learn or work in.
If you are a student and have not yet graduated, or if you have graduated from a computer major, I personally recommend self-learning if you have enough time. This is the most efficient and cost-effective. Now many offline and online training institutions are actually very good, but the cost of learning is high, and the time invested is relatively long, and it basically requires concentrated training for 3-6 months.
However, if it is what I said, self-study is very convenient. There are many free learning resources on the Internet now, or there are many training resources on B station. If you don't know how to find resources, you can also contact me through the introduction to get free resources or detailed consultation.
In addition, there are some classic books that can be integrated with videos for comprehensive learning.
If you are not a computer professional, but you can also pay some learning money and time costs, it is recommended that you go to a training institution to learn, so that you don't have to learn too hard, the teacher's explanation is also very detailed, and there are people to answer questions, and it is also helpful in terms of learning planning or supervision.
In addition, many training institutions will sign employment agreements now, and there are internal recommendations. After learning, they will recommend going to the company. In this way, the interview stage of finding a job can also save a lot of things.
The above is my opinion. I only briefly introduce it because I don't know your situation. If you have other questions, you can contact me at any time for exchange and communication.
I said before 1 o'clock, I saw it on the app
What is
I haven't finished yet, what are you doing?
I will accept all kinds of (installation, cleaning, maintenance), wall-mounted water heaters, water purifiers, washing machines, air conditioners, toilets, stoves, range hoods, lighting, professional beautification, housekeeping services
Thank you for those who silently gave me a thumbs up. I will work hard for a better life. Life is tiring, but I must go on.
Life will not let down those who work hard. If you like it, please pay attention to me. Thanks to those who silently like me.
Life is like this. Others only look at the results, and we have to support the process alone. In the face of life, we can only be strong and continue. There is no other choice. We can look back at the road, but we cannot go back...
Cleaning is a job and a responsibility. Life is beautiful because of service, and service is wonderful because of sincerity.
Although cleaning is the dirtiest work, we will use the most serious attitude to clean every corner of the customer’s house. When we see the customer’s satisfied smile and thumbs up, all the tiredness is worth it. Our efforts will be rewarded!
My daily work
- Your request, my service.
Serve with heart, clean with heart, and keep the beauty.
You care about the details, and Fenggui housekeeping will help you "clean" as much as I can. Service love home.
Keep Wanjia clean, set up a monument for family management, provide services to the end, and keep it clean at home.
My daily work is indoor and outdoor cleaning.
Although the crystal lamp is gorgeous, it will become dull if it is not cleaned for a long time, and it will only shine after cleaning. The same is true of life.
Only by doing it with care can we succeed. Only by being meticulous can we create something exquisite. We are serious about beauty.
Give me a chance, and I will definitely make you satisfied. Quality speaks for everything, because professionalism deserves to be trusted, and your recognition is my greatest encouragement!
It's not easy to make a living in any industry these days!
But I always believe that as long as I have a serious attitude, be persistent, and work hard, I will be a little better than others, at least better than sitting and complaining."
A day's plan starts in the morning, and all good things start in the early morning. I hope that you will start a new day with happiness, luck, health, and wishes, and keep a good mood all day long. Good morning.
When we were young, happiness was a thing, and having it made us happy. When we grew up, happiness was a goal, and achieving it made us happy. When we grew up, we found that happiness was a state of mind, and understanding it made us happy.
Be the most authentic and kindest version of yourself, follow your heart, and have no regrets in this life; there is only one path in life, and you should walk your own path; there are only two treasures in life: a good body and a good mood, and you should be bright and beautiful until you are old!
At every stage of life, we will encounter different problems.
Often, what holds you back is not ability, but the courage to face things positively.
Since we can't avoid it, we might as well face it squarely.
The more you fear, the more you will be defeated by difficulties; the more you meet the difficulties, the more problems will be solved.
Chinese curators join hands to hold Saudi Arabia's first contemporary art biennale - Xinhua
Xinhua News Agency, Riyadh, December 12 (Reporters Wang Haizhou and Hu Guan) The first contemporary art biennale in Saudi Arabia - the Diriyah Contemporary Art Biennale was officially open to the public on the 11th in the Diriyah JAX art district in the northwest of Riyadh, the capital of Saudi Arabia, with a total of 64 artists from Saudi Arabia, China, and other places participating in the exhibition.
This biennale was jointly organized by the Saudi Diriyah Biennale Foundation and the UCCA Ullens Center for Contemporary Art in China. Tian Feiyue, the director of the UCCA Ullens Center for Contemporary Art in China, served as the artistic director.
According to the curatorial team, the theme of this biennial is "crossing the river by feeling the stones", which implies the reform strategies adopted during the period of social and economic transformation, and also reflects the current situation of Saudi Arabia's social and cultural development.
The Biennale covers an area of nearly 12,000 square meters, and the exhibition hall spans six interconnected buildings, which are presented in six units: "Crossing the River by Feeling the Stones", "Inheritance as an Experiment", "Marginal Thinking", "Towards the Public", "Beautiful New World" and "On the Spirit of Art".
Among them, the works of 27 Saudi artists accounted for more than 40% of the total number of exhibits, including painting, installation art and performance art. The works of 12 Chinese artists were also very popular. Some artists used recycled materials in a novel way. For example, Xu Bing used discarded materials to reconstruct a classic landscape painting in "Behind the Story Series: Endless Stream and Mountain" (2014).
Barkley, the CEO of the Diriyah Biennale Foundation, said that he hopes that this biennial exhibition will establish international dialogue, allowing global audiences to have the opportunity to learn about Saudi Arabia's booming cultural industry and creative community, and strengthen interactions.
Tian Feiyue said: "The goal of the biennale is twofold. On the one hand, it allows Saudi contemporary art to participate in the global dialogue, and on the other hand, it allows Saudi audiences to integrate into the contemporary art world. "
It is understood that a series of lectures will be held during the opening week of the biennale. Artists, curators and opinion leaders in the creative industry will discuss topics such as cross-cultural exchange and the development of contemporary art.
I ordered the tomahawk steak
The restaurant told me that the rider couldn't deliver the bones
I want to find out the reason
Bones are OK, call the restaurant to have them package it up for delivery
However, the system is not very convenient. They all use another room.
I'm at #ADDRESS#, the branch in Meixianli
I'm a long way from there
Practical Business English Dialogues 100+ Business English Conversation Encyclopedia (with multiple language learning gifts)
10 minutes a day, even a beginner can speak fluently!
Common business scenarios are all covered, common business English expressions are all included, and business English communication skills are all explained!
Come with oral simulation exercises + audio of foreign teachers reading + free download of universal business small common sense, and easily improve your business English speaking skills!
Practical Business English 100 Conversation Scenarios by Wang Huili, Zhan Lili and Wang Yucui, the original book directly supplied by the China Aerospace Publishing House, can issue a regular electronic invoice. If you have any problems, you can contact the online customer service at any time!
English for 5 minutes before bedtime, those century-old classics and masterpieces, translated by Yang Chunli, Cheng Yingcui, Song Bing, 9787512415812, Beijing University of Aeronautics and Astronautics Press
Original books, electronic invoices, after-sales service, and any questions can be consulted with online customer service.
Women Who Wear Handmade Shoes, by Adriana Trigiani, translated by Dong Yan'nan and Chen Huiqiao, 9787513306645, Xin Xing Publishing House [Direct Delivery]
Original books, supplied directly by the publisher, and issue a regular electronic invoice. If you have any questions, you can contact our online customer service at any time!
Beautiful and confident 100% [German] Kempf-Wirth [original book]
In-store discounts, up to a certain amount, and many more discounts, welcome to buy!
[Wenxuan original] 100 practical business English conversational scenarios
The four warehouses of Xinhua Bookstore (Jiangsu, Chengdu, Hubei, and Tianjin) will deliver books to 75% of cities the next day!
Let's talk about autism - 55 questions closely related to autism
Beautiful English The letters that are suffocatingly beautiful (letters volume) (version 800 extended knowledge 1000 authoritative English essays 2000 classic quotes 3 [original book] [original book]
Yunnan: coordinate and standardize the management of rural public welfare posts - Xinhua News Agency
Xinhua News Agency, Kunming, December 12 (Reporter Lin Bifeng) In order to continue to do a good job in employment assistance for poverty-stricken people and consolidate and expand the achievements of poverty alleviation, Yunnan Province has recently issued relevant policies on the management of public welfare jobs in rural areas to promote rural revitalization.
A relevant official from the Yunnan Provincial Department of Human Resources and Social Security introduced that currently, Yunnan has developed 448,300 rural public welfare posts, which are used to settle employment for rural difficult groups such as off-poverty labor force, and play an important role in helping off-poverty people achieve employment and income growth, consolidating the results of poverty alleviation, and effectively improving rural public services.
This new regulation was jointly issued by the Yunnan Human Resources and Social Security, Rural Revitalization, Finance, and other seven departments. It mainly unifies the scope of recruitment of rural public welfare personnel at the grassroots level, the management of funds, the development of positions, and the management of positions, etc.
In terms of post development settings, the new regulations clearly stipulate that they should be set up in accordance with the principles of "setting up posts according to demand, determining people according to posts, dynamic management and total control", "who develops, who uses and who is responsible", and "one person, one post, voluntary disclosure and unified management".
The recruitment process must follow the steps of announcement, application, examination, announcement, appointment, pre-job training and arrangement of on-the-job training.
In addition, the new regulations also clearly defined the specific responsibilities of the main development departments of rural public welfare posts, the subsidy standards and subsidy methods of rural public welfare posts, and stipulated that each rural public welfare post development department should purchase accidental injury commercial insurance for rural public welfare post placement personnel. It also required the relevant departments to monitor the distribution of rural public welfare post subsidies on a regular basis.
The address was wrong
Hi
Can I cancel the order?
I re-ordered
Whether it has been cancelled
Second, although the right wing has had a period of success in history, it is not long, so it is short because it is brilliant when given a little sunshine and sweats when given a little water; when it gets a little success, it wants to look up to Sichuan, and when it is hit, it will be attached to the hair.
But pragmatically speaking, the right wing has played a positive role in the process of social progress.
The positive significance of the right-wing should not be denied in terms of ending the definition of truth standards during the Cultural Revolution, developing the economy, improving technology, and promoting the institutionalization of politics and the protection of human rights.
Three, as for me, although I do not entirely agree with some of Li Weidong’s views, I am very concerned about his views, and I also respect Li Weidong as a person; because he is serious, he is serious about China, and he also takes China’s social problems seriously.
However, I oppose his anti-communist theory. I believe that anti-revolution is necessary, and revolution will inevitably lead to social unrest, damage people's livelihood, and mix political groups with mud and sand. Moreover, foreign countries will take advantage of the situation.
Fourthly, in order to change or improve China, one must have patience and be responsible for the country and the people. Political opportunists who try to get chestnuts out of the fire are not rightists, but scoundrels.
Let's talk about the left again.
The left, in fact, is a group of orphans of the times and politics.
If the right has a positive meaning for the society, the Communist Party will listen to some of the right-wing views and analyze their thoughts when needed. However, the left doesn't have this good fortune, because what the left wants is exactly the dregs thrown away by the Communist Party!
Five, I have recently seen some friends scolding the anti-communists and refuting the leftists, and they are quite energetic. I think there is no need to do so.
Don't try to reason with a traitor or a left-winger. They're all one-track minds, and there's no way to reason with them.
Also, don't try to prove that we are right, and don't try to make the counter-revolutionaries and the leftists admit it, why bother?
I tell my friends that when the counter-revolutionary curses you as a 50-cent person, and when the left-wing curses you as a right-wing dog, it actually proves that our middle way is correct!
Many people had ideals when they were young, but when they got older, they forgot their ideals, or pursued their ideals, but became obsessed.
And the ideal is getting farther and farther away, and even the dragon-slaying boy has become an evil dragon.
I think left and right generally refer to constraints and freedom, and China as a whole should be left-leaning due to its historical cultural innate genes.
Domestic right-wing freedom focuses on efficiency and development, while left-wing supervision is more concerned with fairness and safety.
Now the society as a whole hopes to pay more attention to fairness, while China and the United States are competing with each other, and the left is positive. It is estimated that it will continue for many years.
Although I don’t understand it, I’ll just give it a thumbs up.
Nothing to say, Hua Hua is so righteous
In the past two years, the blockade and encirclement of Huawei's chips by the US empire has not only put Huawei in an unprecedented predicament, but also caused huge losses to "American" enterprises.
The suppression of the Chinese chip industry by the United States requires its own companies and relevant enterprises in allied countries to simultaneously block China's chip industry, and the direct consequence is that the orders and profits of global chip suppliers are affected, causing the research and development investment and production capacity of chip production enterprises to decrease, and thus causing the disorder of the shortage of the global chip supply chain.
Today, "chip shortage" has affected the major industries in the world, such as automobile production stoppage and mobile phone price increase. Almost all industries that use chips are deeply affected.
In order to master the "chip" autonomy, more and more technology giants in more and more countries have begun to follow the road of "de-Americanization".
To firmly control the global semiconductor control and curb the development of China's semiconductor industry, the United States has taken frequent actions in recent times. It hosted the "chip summit" and invited 64 giants to establish a semiconductor alliance. It also withdrew funds to support domestic technology giants in the United States, such as Intel, an old technology giant in the United States. In order to regain the dominant position in the chip field, it invested 20 billion US dollars to build two wafer processing plants in Arizona, USA, and opened up the chip outsourcing business to the outside world.
When most people think that Intel's move will have a certain impact on TSMC, and it is very likely to take away TSMC's "job".
The reason why it is so confident is that Intel, as an old technology giant of the United States, has been deeply engaged in the semiconductor field for decades, with a large number of human resources and technical reserves, and must quickly rise in the short term and defeat TSMC.
However, TSMC founder Zhang Zhongmou does not care about Intel's decision.
At the "2021 Master Think Tank Forum" held in April this year, Zhang Zhongmou made a shocking statement. For Intel's move to invest in building a wafer factory, Zhang Zhongmou said without any scruples: It is very ironic for Intel to build a chip foundry.
The reason why Zhang Zhonghua is disdainful of Intel’s entry into the wafer field is that Zhang Zhonghua still remembers the grudge between TSMC and Intel more than 30 years ago.
In the 1960s and 1970s, Intel was a bright pearl in the U.S. manufacturing industry, standing at the top of the world and dominating the global semiconductor industry.
Until the 1980s, the world's high-end semiconductor chips were all in the hands of a few strong countries.
At that time, the semiconductor industry was characterized by the IDM model, and the chip was completed from design, manufacture to packaging and testing by one factory. Intel was the representative of that era.
However, such a mode makes some small and medium-sized enterprises overwhelmed. Many semiconductor entrepreneurs face the huge cost of production line construction and can only give up.
Under the influence of market demand, after entering the 1980s, the chip industry began to show the phenomenon of division of labor and cooperation. In 1984, Zhang Zhonghua heard that there was a company specializing in chip design, so he thought that if there was a company specializing in design, then a factory specializing in wafer manufacturing could be established.
Soon after, Zhang Zhongmou's vision became a reality, and TSMC was born.
TSMC has focused its core business on the single link of "wafer processing". It does not engage in design and only provides contract manufacturing services for wafers.
TSMC, which was just established at that time, was just a little guy in front of the giant Intel.
In order to obtain capital support, Zhang Zhonmou once sought investment from Intel, but when Intel heard that TSMC was only engaged in the manufacturing link of the semiconductor industry, it was obviously a little arrogant and looked down on TSMC, so it decisively refused to invest in TSMC.
Zhang Zhongmou also recognized that Intel at that time looked down on the wafer process service.
Unexpectedly, the giants who used to look down on wafer manufacturing services now have to start to do wafer foundry.
Therefore, Zhang Zhongmou felt that it was ironic for Intel to enter the wafer foundry.
Today, TSMC’s market value has already surpassed that of Intel.
In the face of TSMC's strong offensive, Intel is naturally not allowed to stand still.
Today, TSMC is rushing towards 3nm chips, while Intel is still stuck at 14nm seven years ago.
It is not easy to catch up.
I can't wait
I ordered at 7:06 pm 😅
Today, let's take a look at some of the [strange hot searches].
What is normal public opinion?
Randomly select three hot searches: February 2nd Dragon's Head, Good Luck Friend Price Increase, and Huolala Incident. The public opinion expands to form a wave peak, and then the [index decreases] (smooth curve) and finally dissipates. If secondary public opinion is generated, there will be a small wave peak again.
They look the same as the [Network Public Opinion Evolution Model] displayed on the official website of the Cyberspace Administration of China.
What is abnormal public opinion?
Randomly select six hot searches from the same event, and present "isolated peak", "sawtooth" and "cliff".
The "isolated peak" means that it is artificially heated and quickly rushed to the top of the hot search list to attract the attention of the public; the "sawtooth" means that it is periodically heated to ensure that the topic is entrenched in the hot search list; the "cliff" means collective evacuation. This hot search has played its "function" and received a new task and rushed to a new battlefield.
In Figure 9, the heat peak of one event is exactly the trough of another event, and the time difference is only a few seconds. It must be that the unified water army received the task and launched a new round of offensive.
The professionalism of black public relations is evident: dozens of hot search topics are on the list at the same time, which ones attract attention, which ones are responsible for popular science, which ones provoke war and create momentum, which ones divert attention, which ones affect cognition, which ones mislead judgment, which ones incite emotions, which ones drag decisions, and black products accounts are divided into batches and nodes for fine-grained operations, almost taking into account all the elements of public opinion dissemination and expansion.
Public relations is a science. Black public relations will have no place to escape if it is only based on objective data, without any subjective factors such as stance and emotion.
Those who pass by must leave traces, and we will dig up these traces together.
Data source: Hot Search Time Machine.
Omicron cases found for the first time in Mauritius and other countries-Xinhuanet
Beijing, Dec. 12, 2021, Xinhua News Agency: According to a report from Xinhua News Agency’s foreign correspondents, Mauritius, Cyprus and Malawi have recently reported the first cases of infection with the Omicron variant of COVID-19.
Mauritius reported the first two cases of the omicron variant in the country on the 10th.
According to Mauritius Minister of Health Kailesh Jagutpal, one of the infected persons is a tourist who arrived in Mauritius on November 27 from South Africa; the other infected person is a Mauritian local resident who tested positive for nucleic acid on November 30 after contact with a person who had recently returned from South Africa.
After the two infected persons were isolated and treated in the hospital, their nucleic acid test results turned negative. Currently, they have returned to their respective places of residence.
On the 10th, the Cyprus Ministry of Health announced that the country had confirmed its first three cases of infection with the Omicron strain.
The three people were students, and they came back from overseas travel at the beginning of this month. As they were all mild cases, they did not need to be admitted to the hospital.
In order to prevent the spread of the Omicron strain, the Serbian government is constantly strengthening its prevention and control measures.
From December 6 to January 10, 2023, passengers aged 12 and above who enter the country by plane must pay for a nucleic acid test at the airport after arrival.
On the 10th, the Ministry of Health of Serbia announced that it would begin to vaccinate children aged 5 to 11 in the country with the Pfizer COVID-19 vaccine.
Malawi's Health Minister Khumbize Chiponda said on the 9th that the country had discovered its first three cases of infection with the Omicron variant.
The country's health department carried out genome sequencing on 12 positive COVID-19 samples collected from November 9 to December 2, and found these three infection cases.
The delivery never arrived
Even the rider's phone number was fake
I've already re-ordered
Will the previous single be refunded?
If not, please cancel the order and refund
I wanted to order early so I could eat early, but now it's 7 o'clock and I still haven't eaten anything
I don't understand what you're saying...
Is your Chinese translated? Or do you prefer to use English?
That was sent to
Do you want to call him?
Dear customers!
Thank you for choosing our restaurant. We are always committed to providing you and your family with more delicious and safe dishes, and better services. Your satisfaction and praise have always been our motivation to move forward!
Thank you for your five-star praise. I love you.
Thank you for choosing to eat at Zhiyun Restaurant. We are very sorry for the trouble caused to you!
At the same time, I would like to thank you for your real experience evaluation. We will take effective measures to improve in time. We will strictly control the quality and amount of the dishes. Our phone number is 18912251735. We look forward to meeting you here again.
Dear customers, thank you for choosing to have a meal at Zhiyun Restaurant. We are deeply sorry for the unpleasant dining experience caused by the problem of the dishes. We have communicated with the kitchen and strictly controlled the dishes. Thank you for your understanding and support. I am Xiao Yun of Zhiyun Restaurant. I look forward to meeting you again!
Come to the banquet and leave with a good mood!
Dear customers, thank you for your evaluation and support for our "Xiao Yun". We are the happiest when the food that we cook with our heart is affirmed by you!
Looking forward to meeting you again
Dear little master, first of all, thank you very much for your recognition and evaluation, and we will work hard to do better!
I would also like to thank you especially for your support and likes in your busy schedule. I wish you a good meal and a good mood every day!
I don't think it helps at all!
They received a stomach full of money.
The order is a phoenix's claw
Okay, the phone number is #PHONENUMBER#
Do I need to stay in the conversation?
I #NAME# called and explained to your staff
Your rider told me the address was too far
Da Mei 360 integrated home decoration
Address: No. 156, Huancheng South Road, 12th Floor, Happy Home
It was a friend’s introduction, and because of the trust, I chose to come and have a look. My initial budget was 70,000 yuan for a basic renovation.
As soon as you enter the store, they start a series of tricks.
I went to the store for the first time just to show them my floor plan. They didn't go to the site to measure the house. They actually gave me a quotation, saying that my 135-square-meter house could be done for 70,000. They roughly showed me their materials, but I didn't know what brand of materials they were.
Their second trick is that once you go to their store, they will drag you to pay the deposit (and once you pay this money, you will never be able to get it back, unless you have enough experience to argue with them).
When I was hesitating whether to pay the deposit, they would invite their so-called manager to tell you that if you pay the deposit today, we can give you a lot of discounts.
This is a big pit, and I am a living example of being cheated. I paid a deposit of more than 10,000 yuan when I was impulsive.
He gave me a quote of 70,000, which didn't include the water and electricity renovation, and didn't include any doors and cabinets, and the bathrooms, which are the biggest expenses of the base installation.
Aside from these, their service point fees are also higher than those of other companies.
I lost trust in this company. They didn't tell me anything before I signed the contract.
When I went to ask for my money back, they acted like they were very experienced, with a special little team to deal with you.
They will always say it's the customer's problem and they are blameless.
There are various excuses and many details. I don’t want to say them one by one. In short, don’t choose them, because my friend’s house decorated by them is also of poor quality, and they will charge you various fees later.
It’s so annoying. They’re just the original fake dragon decorations, and now they’ve changed to Big Beauty, as if they’ve gone out of business again and changed to something else.
So, don't choose such a shitty decoration company.
In the future, everyone should do some research on Baidu and ask for some advice when they choose because the renovation is not a small amount of money.
To ask the merchant a question, please log in or register.
It is strictly prohibited to publish various forms of merchant comments. For details, please refer to the merchant inclusion declaration.
The decoration design channel of Dianping in Kunming provides the latest merchant information such as the address, phone number, and business hours of the Da Mei 360 integrated home improvement. If you want to find a decoration company, just go to Dianping.
If it doesn't arrive within 30 minutes, please cancel the order!
Is there no other way? For example, change the address?
Well, then, don't cancel this conversation. If I don't get my money back in 5 to 10 days, I will definitely pursue it.
I asked if it could be cancelled in less than 15 minutes.
The chicken should be cooked, but what we received was raw meat, so we couldn't eat it.
Starry Sky Has About丨The Gemini Meteor Shower Will Peak on the 14th-Xinhuanet
Xinhua News Agency, Tianjin, December 12 (Reporter Zhou Runjian) An astronomical popularization expert introduced that as the last large-scale meteor shower this year, the Gemini meteor shower, one of the three major meteor showers in the northern hemisphere, will usher in its peak on December 14. Friends who like meteor showers can observe it after midnight on that day.
Beijing astronomy enthusiast An Qiu took this photo of the Gemini meteor shower in Qinghai on December 13, 2018.
Most meteor showers have cometary parent bodies, but the parent body of the Geminids is 3200 Phaethon, an Apollo-type asteroid.
The Geminid meteor shower is also the second known meteor shower that is not "birthed" by a comet.
Shu Lipeng, a director of the Tianjin Astronomical Society and an astronomy popularization expert, introduced that, just like New Year’s blockbusters, the Gemini meteor shower generally appears at the end of the year, and the “screening period” can last from December 4 to 17.
The meteor shower is known for its large and stable flow, and is called one of the three major meteor showers in the northern hemisphere along with the Quadrantid meteor shower and the Lyrid meteor shower.
A prominent feature of the Geminid meteor shower is that the speed of the meteors is slow, the color is rich, and there are many fireballs, which is suitable for both visual observation and amateur astronomical photography.
On December 13, 2020, Yang Jing, an amateur astronomer in Tianjin, shot the Gemini meteor shower in Jiuzhou, Tianjin.
According to the astronomical forecast, this year's Geminid meteor shower will reach its peak at around 15:00 on December 14. The ZHR (the number of meteors that can be seen per hour under ideal observation conditions, when the radiant point is directly above the observer's head) will be 150.
The chart of the recommendation index for the Gemini meteor shower.
“Last year, the Gemini meteor shower left a deep impression on people, but this year's Gemini meteor shower will be affected by moonlight, and the brilliance will be slightly discounted.
November 14 is the 11th day of the 11th month of the lunar calendar, and the moon phase is a waxing gibbous moon. The bright moonlight will interfere with observation, but fortunately, the moon will set in the late night. At this time, the radiant point of the Geminid meteor shower will also rise higher.
Friends who like meteor showers can observe them in the hours after midnight when the moon has set, but they should pay attention to keeping warm. "
How can you see as many meteors as possible?
"It is not recommended to observe in the city. You can choose a place in the suburbs or countryside with high altitude, less light pollution, and a wide field of view facing northeast, and then wait patiently until the moon goes down for visual observation.
It is worth noting that the Geminid meteor shower has a large flow in all directions. When observing, you do not need to stare at the radiant point of the Geminid meteor shower all the time.
If you are a photography enthusiast, you should choose a wide-angle, large-aperture lens to shoot the magnificent “meteor shower”, and use high ISO and maximum aperture when shooting.
A tripod, spare batteries and a shutter release cable are also essential, based on considerations of stability and durability. "
Xiuli Peng reminded.
What is the difference between laser TV and traditional TV in terms of market positioning?
According to my understanding, the traditional TV mentioned by the questioner should refer to LCD TV, and the difference between laser TV and LCD TV in market positioning mainly lies in the following two points:
First, the laser TV focuses more on the big screen market.
Compared with the market positioning of LCD TVs, laser TVs are obviously more focused on the large-screen market, or in other words, laser TVs were born for large screens.
At present, the mainstream LCD TVs are mostly 55 inches to 65 inches, while the size of the laser TV is generally above 75 inches, and the largest is more than 100 inches, which fully meet the needs of users for large-screen color TVs.
In recent years, the global shipments and sales ratio of laser TVs have been constantly increasing, accounting for more than 60% of the total sales volume of 80-inch and above TVs.
According to the forecast of Zhongyikang, the sales growth of laser TV market will exceed 140% in 2020, and continue to maintain high-speed growth.
The reason why it has achieved such good results in the large-screen market is mainly due to the excellent performance of the laser TV in eye protection.
Based on the imaging principle of laser television diffuse reflection, the light emitted by the laser source does not directly enter the eyeball. Compared with the backlight source of liquid crystal television, the imaging process is closer to the imaging process of objects under natural conditions, and the stimulation to the eyes is also smaller.
The Xi Si Laboratory of the China Electronics Standardization Research Institute and the ophthalmology experts of Peking Union Medical College Hospital obtained 144 sets of test data through a strict comparison experiment of watching laser television and liquid crystal television under the same conditions of the crowd.
The data confirmed that the laser TV indeed has strong eye protection characteristics, and even has a certain improvement effect in certain aspects.
At a time when vision health is getting more and more attention, laser TV has not only attracted more and more users with its eye-protection advantages, but also opened up another breakthrough in the color TV market.
Second, the laser TV is more focused on the high-end market.
In contrast to the falling prices of LCD televisions, the current market price of laser televisions is mostly over 10,000 yuan. With the upgrade of size and light source, the price will gradually rise.
Why is the laser TV so expensive?
It makes sense.
With the continuous development of light source and technology, laser TV has many advantages that LCD TV and projector cannot achieve.
With ultra-short focal length projection technology, the projection distance of the laser TV is relatively shorter than that of traditional projectors, and it can achieve a 100-inch large screen experience at a short distance. The required space is not large, and the host is small and occupies very little space.
In terms of brightness, large-brand laser TVs can reach more than 2000 lumens.
In addition, it has lower heat output, less damage to the equipment, and a longer service life for the television.
In addition, many high-end laser TV models are equipped with true 4K ultra-high-definition picture quality, artificial intelligence system, biomimetic screen, and many other cutting-edge technologies, which can provide users with a more shocking audio-visual experience.
It is not a fake demand, but a product of demand segmentation. In terms of picture quality and input-output ratio, laser TV is not suitable for audio and video players. If you want to take into account the large screen and insufficient viewing environment, you can try it. Everything has its advantages and disadvantages. After weighing the pros and cons, you can make your own judgment. I am afraid of listening to one-sided words.
In simple terms, the ultra-wide-angle near-focus projector - the laser TV - has to use expensive ultra-wide-angle lenses and mirrors in order to be close to the screen, which is not in line with the best optical design.
In order to block some of the ambient light, the micro-structured Fresnel screen is expensive, and the price of an 80-inch screen is basically the same as that of a 65-inch LCD.
There is one more thing. I especially hate that projector manufacturers use diffuse reflection for the eyes as a selling point. Please, the light on the screen that the eyes can see is direct light for the eyes. If you diffuse it to the ceiling, the eyes can't see it. If you have to be serious, LCD TVs are also diffuse "direct light". When you turn on the TV, isn't the ceiling also illuminated?
Moreover, if the projection screen is not a diffuser, it will not be able to form an image.
The hot-spot (light-spot) effect of the high gain screen has been overlooked. When a large amount of light is reflected into the eyes from a certain angle, it is really uncomfortable.
The Visual Aesthetics Photography Gallery Selects Quality Shops and has no branches for the time being
I added the appointment date on WeChat, and the little sister arranged the available time and sent it to me. The reply was quite timely~
Before leaving, I looked at the shooting works in the store. There were more outdoor wedding dresses. The shooting was very beautiful, and there were many shooting styles involved.
After arriving that day, I had a simple exchange of ideas with the little sister, and she was very patient to help me try on two sets of the style of clothes that I was confused about, and finally decided to start makeup and styling. The photographer will put some props before shooting, and guide the action, and pay attention to every detail.
However, I may not have communicated my specific shooting ideas with him, so the result was not the style I wanted, but it should be good-looking 🙊🙊
After the shoot, the photographer will help to select the photos and communicate the post-processing style. It feels quite thoughtful.
It takes about half a month to repair the film, and it is waiting for the effect.
The second time to participate in the photo-related big dinner activity. Most of the clothes in the venue can be chosen for a photo shoot.
In the end, I chose a black chiffon dress to experience a different style.
The whole shooting process takes about 2 hours, including makeup and shooting. The photographer in charge of shooting is the younger brother of the 95-year-old. It feels a little green. I hope that he can give more advice in customer shooting action guidance in the future. He is quite talkative, and the shooting process is very pleasant.
The photography gallery of visual aesthetics and photography selected quality stores reply
It’s on the front page now, so come and check out Queenie~
When I went to the store, I filled in my name and phone number first, and then chose the clothes. The wedding dress can also be chosen. I changed three or four sets of clothes and was quite patient. After choosing, I made up my makeup for a long time, and the service attitude was also good. Later, when taking photos, they would teach you how to pose, but the feeling of the photos was that my face was too big. The retouching was said to take half a month, and it was sent to me in three or four days, and it felt like there was no difference from the original film.
[Environment] The overall environment is good.
There are so many options for clothing.
There are almost three places for makeup, and there is a photo studio inside.
The service is very warm and attentive.
Stylists are pretty patient.
Photographers will also take time to show you how to pose.
If the photographer is not satisfied, he will also take the initiative to re-shoot.
【Experience】The styling may be a bit too much, and the original double eyelids were pasted into triple eyelids.
The tail of the eyebrows was also shaved off, which was a little embarrassing for those who do not draw eyebrows on a daily basis.
The photos were given ten days ago, but the P-picture effect is not very satisfactory. I feel that the double eyelid stickers are still very obvious.
Because I didn’t know what style I wanted, I tried two sets. In the end, I chose the black dress. The little sister said that this set is a retro style similar to Audrey Hepburn.
After choosing the clothes, I started to do my hair and makeup. The hairstylist and makeup artist sisters were so patient in helping me. I was very satisfied with the results.
After the make-up was done, we started to take photos. The photographer gave me instructions on how to pose the whole time. The process was very relaxed and harmonious.
After the shooting, he carefully selected four of his favorite pictures to be retouched. The little brother said that the photos would be ready in 15 days. He was very satisfied with the outcome.
It's been 3 days with no response... I can't join the #PRS_ORG# Plus monthly plan because your system can't recognise my credit card!
The strangest thing was that I was using the same credit card each time I paid
Now, I have to pay for shipping every time.
Can I be exempted first and then pay the monthly fee after your investigation?
Is it reliable to buy insurance for a small umbrella?
Xiaoyu Umbrella is an internet insurance brokerage platform.
In terms of setting conditions: according to the Regulations on the Supervision of Insurance Brokerage Institutions (revised in 2015), in order to become an insurance brokerage company, three keywords must be met: the shareholders and initiators have no major illegal records in the past three years, the minimum amount is RMB 50 million, and it must be approved by the China Insurance Regulatory Commission.
In fact, these three requirements are quite harsh. In summary, it is necessary to have the strength, to be approved by the national authority department of the China Banking and Insurance Regulatory Commission (which is responsible for the supervision of insurance companies and banks in the country), and the shareholders must have a good style. As a small umbrella insurance company, the policyholder does not need to doubt whether the small umbrella insurance is regular. After all, there are these three thresholds, and not all insurance companies can meet them.
At this point, it's not bad, it's trustworthy.
In terms of insurance products: Xiaoyu umbrella insurance is an insurance supermarket, and many companies' star critical illness insurance are sold on this platform, such as the newly listed Haitong Super Maria No. 5 critical illness insurance. The claimant and the underwriter are all Haitong Life, and Xiaoyu umbrella insurance is just a third-party intermediary. There is no need to doubt its credibility.
In terms of payment methods: Internet platform products are generally more cost-effective than traditional insurance products because they do not have the operating costs of business outlets and the cost of business employees’ salaries. In addition, payment methods are flexible and support monthly payment, which can relieve the payment pressure of policyholders. At the same time, it can also maximize the leverage of insurance.
That's pretty good.
It's something to consider.
In terms of professionalism of the salesperson: this is particularly important, because insurance is an industry with very high professional requirements. Many Internet product customers can buy insurance by themselves, which will lead to many misunderstandings. In terms of health declaration and occupation, non-insurance professionals often add their subjective consciousness when applying for insurance, thinking that they are healthy or meet the requirements, which will easily lead to many claim risks, and there may be the risk of rejection.
I myself have done insurance telephone sales in "Tencent Micro Insurance" (just like the little umbrella, it is also an Internet insurance brokerage platform), and I am very responsible to tell you.
Internet insurance is true and reliable. What is not reliable is the people. Internet channels do not have professional practitioners, and there are also a lot of sales misleads.
For example, 1 yuan insurance covers 6 million yuan, buy insurance and get a mobile phone, free to receive 60,000 critical illness insurance, these marketing strategies are not wrong, but they avoid the important issues and will not tell the policyholder that the first month is 1 yuan, and the second month is charged according to the normal fee, ranging from tens of yuan to 200 yuan, and many customers do not know what they are buying after one or two years of payment.
They thought they could pay $1 and the insurance company would pay $600,000 (a pie in the sky).
Free mobile phones are only given to policy numbers with special tail numbers, such as 6666, 8888, and if the winning message is sent, no one will remind you if you do not exchange it.
(This is another pitfall for the policyholder) The free 60,000 critical illness insurance is short-term. If you only rely on this, without other commercial insurance, what can the 60,000 do in the event of a critical illness? It cannot solve the problem, and your future life will begin to run naked.
Currently, the state is also cracking down on misleading internet insurance sales.
Therefore, in general, the platform is not a problem, the product is not a problem, and the problem is the professionalism and professional ethics of the business personnel.
It is suggested that the main question should be comprehensively and carefully considered. In fact, the products of many offline insurance brokerage companies are broader, and customers have more opportunities and products to choose from, and some products have a better cost-benefit ratio than Internet products.
I have helped 59 Internet customers to insure offline products and save 2,000-3,000 yuan of premium per year.
If you have any questions, please feel free to communicate and exchange with me.
Me: Mingya Insurance Broker, with 3 years of enterprise management training experience, has served nearly a thousand enterprise users and cooperated with more than 100 insurance companies. Before applying for insurance, I will start from the needs of customers and customize insurance products for customers. During the application for insurance, I will compare three insurance companies for customers and try my best to get the best underwriting result for customers. After applying for insurance, I will organize and manage the insurance policy for customers to make customers feel at ease and worry-free.
To grow with every customer for life.
I hope my answer can help the questioner!
According to the definition of the insurance regulatory department, Internet insurance refers to insurance business that can be completed by the policyholder independently after clicking the insurance link.
In this process, the applicant does not need to sign, the insurance advisor does not need to sign, and all the steps can be completed independently by the applicant.
Although there is not much "ceremony" in applying for Internet insurance, and there may not even be a printed paper contract, this does not affect the validity and legal effect of the electronic contract.
This model is somewhat similar to the assembly line work of "telephone sales", but there is a fatal problem with buying insurance in this way, that is, follow-up services may not keep up.
Insurance is usually a long-term contract that lasts for decades. When we buy insurance, should we seriously think about whether the "intermediary" we choose is a "insurance intermediary" that can accompany us for a long time and provide us with services many years later?
How can I contact the delivery person?
It's almost 3 o'clock
Do I get compensation for that?
I said, "I'll knock on the door."
But the rider just left it on the doorstep and walked away
They also sent the wrong one.
Your rider has already taken my order #NUMBER#, but it still tells me I'm waiting
The courier received my delivery at 19:25, but still refused to leave
After I bought it, do I want any other take-out?
What to do
Where did your rider go
Do you have to wait?
I'm here to deliver
Okay, if you don't cancel, I'll call the police.
But my food will have safety and hygiene issues
Classic Sword and Knife Appreciation Guide Gold Edition Collector's Edition [Genuine Book with Worry-Free After-Sales Service]
[Authentic books, fast delivery, quality without worry, can be invoiced]
Classic Badge Appreciation Guide + Classic Sword Appreciation Guide + Classic Military Uniform Appreciation Guide Golden Collector's Edition 3 volumes World Military Books Introduction to the Performance of Classic Military Badges Military Uniforms and Swords
Nine Lectures on Chinese Painting Appraisal and Collection Strategy
[Full price discount, fast delivery, can be invoiced, and genuine books]
Western swords: collection and appreciation [original book, lightning delivery]
The Pianist's Guide to Technical Exercises [Original book, fast delivery]
Industrial Design Hand-Drawn Treasure Handbook of Creativity + Industry Guide + Performance by Luo Jian, Li Yulong and Army, Tsinghua University Press [Genuine Book, Lightning Delivery]
The essence of Chinese antiques auction: porcelain English edition [genuine book, fast delivery]
Jiuge Picture Book [Original Book and Fast Delivery]
A Picture of Dream of the Red Chamber [Original book, fast delivery]
A History of Chinese Painting
The Book of Plants and Birds [Original Book, Fast Delivery]
Realism and Chinese Films in the 1980s
Chinese logo design·1 [official book, fast delivery]
Herbal Flower Poems (authentic book, fast delivery)
Sword Art Online 02: Aincrad [Original Book with Worry-Free After-Sales Service]
Song Jianfeng -- a famous portrait painter's short story 【Original book, fast delivery】
Good governance and the rule of law - lessons from institutional history and the gains and losses of governance
The 20th Anniversary Collection of the "Lectures on History and Culture for Party and Government Leaders" Wang Chunyu, Zhang Dake, Xiong Zhaozheng, Ge Jianxiong, Deng Xiaonan, and other 14 history masters, cultural celebrities, and well-known scholars gave public lectures to party and government leaders.
You just need to enter the coupon code to get the discount.
No problem, remember not to arrange a re-send, I have bought another one, and I don't want to waste it.
Thank you for your help
From the past to the present, I have always opposed any form of slander and abuse, and I cannot accept such personal attacks.
In a civilized society, we can accept everything, but we must prevent this kind of scoundrel.
If we don't look at political parties and factions, the first thing to resist is this uncivilized style.
From the moment you started sending me Facebook friend requests, to posting sarcastic posts, to trying to post what you claimed to be my home address and my father's name on social media, I have chosen not to respond.
After that, you continued to tag me at a rate of six meals a day, and continued to discuss some implicit, humiliating remarks about me with your so-called friends on Facebook, like my appearance, figure, good upbringing, whether to plant strawberries on the bed, and so on. I...I let it go.
But later, I received more messages from my friends about your Facebook friend account uploading a photo of you and comments with sexual harassment.
I'm sorry, as a woman, I can no longer remain silent.
Since the news of my reporting to the police was published, you have not been restrained at all, and have become even more arrogant.
I don't care what your political background is, and I don't care what your social status is. In our society, both men and women need to be respected.
Yes, you can continue to make your sarcastic, innuendo, humiliating, insulting comments, you can continue to say that you are only caring and concerned about me, you can continue to think that this is not harassment, you can even continue to deny that it is your picture or continue to make any kind of offensive comments.
That's right, I can't, and I don't have the power to stop you.
I don't know you, and I don't want to know you, and my appearance and figure don't need your evaluation.
I don't even think that there's a girl out there that would want to be humiliated like that to be famous.
A friend asked me, "How are you doing?"
I said I would, and you wouldn't believe me.
I can't think of any girl who would say 'I'm okay' after being bullied like that.
It is only those who have no basic decency who would choose to hurt a woman in this way, whether in the workplace, in society, in politics or in business.
I believe that justice is in the hearts of the people.
I cut some of the comments for you to judge
No one should be able to impersonate you on your own posts, right?
I can only say that you are a public enemy of civilization
A smile from the heart
Vietnam People’s Daily Network - Vietnamese Prime Minister Pham Minh Chinh attended the third Vietnam National Digital Technology Enterprise Development Forum
During the third Vietnam National Digital Technology Enterprise Development Forum, two major meetings were held to discuss the topics of digital technology enterprises and national digital transformation, and digital technology enterprises and COVID-19 and post-epidemic economic recovery and development.
Minister of Information and Communications Nguyen Manh Hung said that in 2021, despite the continued spread of the COVID-19 pandemic, the number and revenue of Vietnamese digital technology enterprises still maintained a growth trend, reaching nearly 10%.
In 2021, the number of typical digital products in Vietnam will be cultivated and concentrated to solve the major problems faced by Vietnam, and many digital products have gone abroad, and the ranking of Vietnam's digital technology has been improved.
Minister Ruan Mengxiong called on digital technology enterprises to shoulder the responsibility of developing national digital transformation platforms, and the task of developing digital platforms in these countries is to shoulder the national mission.
At the forum, leaders from various departments and government agencies, as well as enterprises, organizations and individuals engaged in the research, development, application, and transfer of digital technologies, shared their ideas and solutions for mobilizing and gathering resources from all sectors of society to develop Vietnam's technology enterprises, working together to promote the country's digital transformation, and post-epidemic economic recovery.
Premier Fan Mingzheng emphasized in his speech at the forum that digital transformation is an inevitable path for the world and an objective demand for development.
The digital transformation has become a global issue, and the digital transformation serves the whole people, so it is necessary to mobilize the whole people to participate.
People and enterprises are the core, subject, goal and driving force of digital transformation.
Therefore, all policies must be for the people and enterprises.
Premier Fan Mingzheng stressed that the digital transformation must reflect the national spirit and must be based on internal forces, strategic, long-term and decisive factors, and external forces as important and breakthrough points.
He also believes that the digital transformation should drive the development in depth and sustainable development, participate in the prevention and control of the new coronary pneumonia epidemic, economic recovery and development, and respond to changes after it, overcome the phenomenon of natural resource depletion, and help green transformation and development of green energy.
Digital transformation needs to participate in the construction of databases related to the protection and promotion of national cultural values, historical traditions, national customs and customs, and promote the digital transformation of banks, tax, land management and development, logistics and other fields.
The biggest goal of digital transformation is to make people happier and the country more prosperous.
Prime Minister Pham Minh Chinh required all levels of government, all levels of agencies and enterprises to increase leadership and guidance in the development of digital technology, improve their understanding of digital transformation, continue to formulate and improve the system of digital transformation, strengthen state management, and promote the development of digital technology enterprises with the spirit of respect, communication, listening, positive and proactive.
During the forum, Prime Minister Pham Minh Chinh attended the award ceremony for the 2021 “Made in Vietnam” Outstanding Digital Products and the opening ceremony of the “Made in Vietnam” digital products.
I have reported it and sent pictures, but there has been no reply
What a cow, not a bit of a cow
It is a chicken with saliva and raw meat.
I can't eat it
Did you make sure it was fresh cooked food and not old?
unacceptable
I've already placed an order
They said it will be delivered before 7 p.m.
Why to remake
This is so messed up
The opening ceremony of the 2021 China International Rail Transit and Equipment Manufacturing Industry Talent Summit - Rolling News - Hunan Daily News - Huanqiu.com
Hunan Daily, December 10 (All-media reporter Zhou Zhiheng) On the 9th, the 2021 China International Rail Transit and Equipment Manufacturing Industry Talent Summit was opened in Zhuzhou.
Wang Cheng, a member of the Standing Committee of the Provincial Party Committee and Minister of the Provincial Party Committee Organization Department, attended the launch ceremony and gave a speech.
Wang Cheng pointed out that the holding of the Talent Summit was an important measure to implement the spirit of the Central Talent Work Conference and the 12th Provincial Party Congress, and demonstrated Hunan's sincerity in attaching importance to talents, seeking talents, and making good use of talents.
Hunan has a good tradition of loving and respecting talents, a broad platform to promote the development of talents, and a good environment for realizing a better life. In recent years, Hunan has deeply implemented the talent-led development strategy, and built up a full-chain talent work pattern, which has become a fertile soil for the growth and achievement of talents, a hotbed for innovation and entrepreneurship, and a pleasant land for living and working.
At present, Hunan is comprehensively implementing the strategic positioning and mission tasks of "three highs and four new", and will further open the door to attract and recruit talents, introduce more favorable policies for talent innovation and entrepreneurship, concentrate more resources, and create better conditions. It is hoped that outstanding talents from all walks of life will work together for the high-quality development of Hunan.
The venue set up the Changsha, Zhuzhou and Xiangtan pavilions and the Hunan Free Trade Pilot Zone pavilion. The Provincial Department of Science and Technology, the Provincial Department of Industry and Information Technology, and the Provincial Department of Human Resources and Social Security released the key demand list for technological innovation in the advanced manufacturing industry, the talent demand directory for the intelligent manufacturing industry, and the young talent demand directory for the intelligent manufacturing industry in the postdoctoral mobile station.
48 large-scale enterprises, including CRRC, China Communications Construction and Yanda Technology, recruited talents on the spot, and nearly 1,000 related professional recent graduates and social talents participated in the matching of talent projects.
Hello
Just placed an order and it shows the rider is waiting at the restaurant, but the restaurant says the order is ready but they haven't seen the rider
Can you help me follow up, because I'm in a hurry, thank you
It is possible to be late by half an hour for no reason at all
Do you actually have a solution?
The editor brings you which one is good in Balichang?
1. [Directly operated by the distillery] Ningcheng Baliguan Old Cellar 42 degrees 500ML strong aroma sorghum liquor. The mouthfeel is soft and mellow. The whole box contains four bottles.
Reason for recommendation: Selected sorghum as the raw material, brewed with traditional technology, white wine from the Inner Mongolia Plateau, the taste is more classic, thick and sweet, with a little bit of sweetness, rich layers, using the traditional solid-state method of white wine brewing, retaining its original flavor without loss, allowing the body to carry a rich and mellow taste.
This level 1, capacity 500, storage method at room temperature, cool, dry and ventilated place, packaging other, alcohol degree 42, aroma type strong aroma type, province Inner Mongolia, product weight (kg) 2.9, currently there are 4 people to evaluate, and received 100% praise rate.
2, the old cellar of Ba Lihan in Ningcheng 52-degree barrel-stored grain liquor [10-kg package]
Reason for recommendation: After years of aging, it is thicker and more transparent. It is a kind of liquor loved by the nomads in Inner Mongolia. The strong aroma is in line with the traditional brewing process and intoxicated the simple and kind-hearted Chinese people. It is suitable for all kinds of banquets or home use.
The product has a capacity of 5000ml, packaged in a bottle, the product weight (kg) is 8, the aroma type is strong aroma, the storage method is ventilated, the province is Inner Mongolia, the level is level 1, the alcohol content is 52, and currently more than 50 people have evaluated it and received a 95% approval rate.
3. [Directly operated by a liquor factory] Ningcheng Bailihuan Old Brewery 42°500ML strong aroma sorghum liquor. The mouthfeel is soft and old wine. A box of six bottles.
Reason for recommendation: This liquor is selected from the ecological brewing of sorghum. The aroma is balanced, fermented in the cellar, and the wine is aged. The flavor of the liquor is more fragrant.
White wine from the Inner Mongolia Plateau is more classic in taste, with a strong aroma that flows over the guests' lips and teeth, making them drink to their heart's content.
Reason for recommendation: The selected sorghum is processed by a unique craft, so that you can drink it with ease when you hold a banquet or have a drink at home.
High-speed train home
Address: No. 555, High-speed Railway North Road, Check map
This place has a complete range of home appliances and many brands, including all well-known brands.
During the 12.12 period, I went to the "Hanson" water purifier store to see the water purifiers. The store was holding an activity, and the price was more favorable.
Actually Home has a total of 11 floors, from the 2nd basement to the 9th floor. The 1st and 2nd basements are parking spaces, and parking is free during the day!
The surrounding area is not very good. There are only a few hardware stores, and the taste of the restaurants is average.
This elevator is also speechless. It is like having a big illness. From -2 to -1, it keeps going back and forth, and I keep pressing this floor. From the safety passage to the first floor, it is also speechless. It directly leads to a furniture store. The furniture store is closed, and the safety passage cannot be exited!
There is still room for improvement at Aju Home. There are many places that have not been developed.
Address: No.555, North 1st Road of High-Speed Railway, Saibei District. The transportation is convenient, the parking lot is large, and it is still free during the day.
Environment: To be honest, the store is large, with 8 or 9 floors, and you can buy all the furniture, household appliances, and various small items you want at home, and many well-known brands have settled in the store, such as Mussi, Opai, Huatai, Boss, Fengchuang, Hansun, Yak, Youfang, Silan, Fupinju, Wanjiale, Dahanziran, Zhonglian, Meide, Yadan, etc. The brands are really too many. I can only remember so much. It is a good place to buy products. If you are tired, you can sit on the sofa and take a break.
Recently, I wanted to buy a comfortable sofa. My friend said that there are many sofas to choose from here. After looking at Gome Home and Meike Home, I felt that it was okay, but the price was slightly expensive, so I was still in a dilemma.
The Urumqi Home Furnishing Mall Channel of Dianping.com provides you with the latest merchant information such as the address, phone number, and business hours of the High-speed Railway Home Furnishing Mall. If you want to find a decoration company, just go to Dianping.com.
Already sent to my guests, #PRS_ORG# can't be completed
It has been paid, it has been paid
If it can be delivered within 20 minutes, it will not be canceled.
The main channel of the Yangtze River has achieved full coverage of water green comprehensive service areas - Xinhuanet
Xinhua News Agency, Wuhan, December 11 (reporter Wang Xian) The Fuling Water Green Comprehensive Service Area of Chongqing City was completed and put into operation as scheduled on the 10th. This is the second water green comprehensive service area officially put into operation in the upper reaches of the Yangtze River after the Lushan Water Green Comprehensive Service Area of Sichuan Province was officially put into operation on the 8th.
By now, the water-based green comprehensive service area has covered the upper, middle and lower reaches of the Yangtze River.
Chu Jianhua, Deputy Director-General of the Yangtze River Navigation Management Bureau of the Ministry of Transport, introduced that previously, Hubei, Hunan, Jiangxi, Anhui, Jiangsu and other provinces had built and put into operation 10 water green comprehensive service areas in the middle and lower reaches of the Yangtze River, which had been recognized by a large number of seamen and played an important role in promoting the high-quality development of Yangtze River shipping.
The full coverage of water-based green comprehensive service areas is another milestone event in the construction of the green shipping of the Yangtze River, and the Yangtze River ship pollution reception and shipping service capabilities have been significantly improved.
It is reported that the water green comprehensive service area is an important facility to provide all-round production and life services for the large number of ships and seamen, and help the large number of seamen to solve the "urgent, difficult, worrisome" problems.
The two water green comprehensive service areas in the upper reaches of the Yangtze River completed and put into operation this time integrate life services, production services and government services into one, with green and environmental protection as the theme, ship maintenance and ship emergency rescue services as the features, and realize the “one docking, multiple services” of ships in the port, which will make the work of the sailors who travel on the Yangtze River all year round more efficient and life more convenient.
Three US aircraft carriers gather around China, and the most powerful weapon in the US Navy’s arsenal makes a rare visit to Guam, 2022-01-17, Multi-dimensional, pro-China media, Multi-dimensional report: The latest news on China-US relations: The latest satellite image shows that three US aircraft carriers are gathering around China; US media also revealed that one of the most powerful weapons in the US Navy’s arsenal made a rare visit to Guam, sending an important signal to the US allies and enemies in the Indo-Pacific region.
According to the China think tank "South China Sea Strategic Situation Perception Platform," on January 9, a satellite found the USS Carl Vinson aircraft carrier in the vicinity of the Balabac Strait.
The Balabac Strait connects the South China Sea and the Sulu Sea and is a strategic place in the first island chain of the West Pacific.
The platform predicts that the "Carl Vincent" will be deployed in the South China Sea.
This is the first time for the "Carl Vinson" aircraft carrier to carry the F-35C fighter jet and the CMV-22 "Osprey" carrier-based transport aircraft for deployment.
In addition to the "Carl Vinson" aircraft carrier, there is also the "Abraham Lincoln" aircraft carrier (USS Abraham Lincoln) that departed from the United States on January 3.
The aircraft carrier "Lincoln" also carried the F-35C carrier-based fighter squadron for the first time, which belongs to the 314th fighter attack squadron of the U.S. Marine Corps.
In addition to the two aircraft carriers mentioned above, the US Navy has also deployed the USS Ronald Reagan aircraft carrier in the Asia-Pacific region, which is docked in Yokosuka, Japan.
The carrier battle group also includes the guided missile cruiser USS Chancellorsville and the guided missile destroyer USS Stockdale.
Three U.S. aircraft carriers gathered around China, and the most powerful weapons rarely visited Guam. On January 17, 2022, the "South China Strategic Situation Perception Platform" released the latest satellite images, showing that three U.S. aircraft carriers were gathering around China.
(Weibo@South China Strategic Situation Awareness) The three US aircraft carriers gather around China. The most powerful weapon rarely visits Guam. On January 17, 2022, the CMV-22B carrier-based transport aircraft of the US military.
(Weibo @ South China Strategic Situation Awareness) According to CNN on January 17, one of the most powerful weapons in the U.S. Navy’s arsenal made a rare visit to Guam over the weekend.
The Ohio-class nuclear submarine USS Nevada, carrying 20 Trident (Trident) ballistic missiles and dozens of nuclear warheads, sailed into the U.S. naval base in Guam on Saturday (January 15).
The three US aircraft carriers gathered around China, and the most powerful weapon rarely visited Guam. It is analyzed that this is a signal sent to the allies and enemies in the increasingly tense situation in the Indo-Pacific region.
It was the first visit of a U.S. ballistic missile submarine to Guam since 2016 and the second public visit since the 1980s.
Three U.S. aircraft carriers have gathered in the vicinity of China. This is a rare visit to Guam by the most powerful weapon. In recent years, China has built a large number of military facilities in the Nansha Islands.
This is Yongxing Island in the South China Sea.
(South China Sea Research Forum) The U.S. Navy said in a statement that the visit of the Ohio-class nuclear submarine "Nevada" to Guam this time strengthened cooperation between the United States and its allies in the region, demonstrated the United States' capabilities, flexibility, combat readiness, and continued commitment to the security and stability of the Indo-Pacific region.
Ballistic missile submarines are usually referred to as "boomers".
The whereabouts of the 14 "thundering submarines" in the U.S. Navy fleet are usually kept strictly confidential.
The secret around the ballistic missile submarine has made the "Thunderbolt submarine" the most important survival weapon in the "nuclear triad", and this system also includes the ballistic missile launch wells in the United States and the B-2 and B-52 bombers that can carry nuclear warheads.
When friends talked about the recent fall of Meta by 26%, the market value evaporated by 2510 billion US dollars, and Zuckerberg responded "facing unprecedented competition". What is the reason?
Meta (formerly Facebook) is essentially an advertising company, and the main source of income is advertising. Today's money-making advertising company has its own traffic channels.
Facebook, Instagram, WhatsApp, etc., no matter what the functional positioning is, they are all Meta's traffic channels.
Not only that, Meta is also the largest "advertising alliance". Many Apps are connected to Meta's advertising, and realize monetization through Meta's advertising platform.
But times have changed.
First, because of the adjustment of Apple's privacy policy, it is difficult for Meta to obtain user data information, which affects the efficiency of advertising placement.
Apple's current privacy policy is very user-friendly, and it will clearly prompt users whether to allow the app to obtain their information. Most people's normal reaction is not to allow it.
If Google stabs another knife, the impact on Meta's revenue will be even greater.
Second, the Chinese factor in Meta's previous revenue growth has also weakened (the proportion of this factor is uncertain, but it does exist).
Everyone knows that Meta has no business in China, but this understanding is not accurate.
At least 10% of Meta's annual revenue comes from China, mainly from companies that do business overseas in China.
Meta has hundreds of employees in its Hong Kong office, and there are several large agents in mainland China.
Chinese companies want to expand their overseas market, and Meta is an unavoidable advertising channel. Most of the money spent goes to Meta.
It is interesting that now Byte's TT is one of Meta's main competitors, but in the past two years, Meta has made a lot of money from ByteDance.
Domestic agents are all helping Bytedance to advertise on Meta, and Meta's performance in Greater China is also very good.
I have not specifically looked into it recently, but I am sure it will not be better than before.
The era of large-scale spending by Chinese companies overseas has passed.
Thirdly, the expansion of new traffic channels is not smooth.
Facebook is getting older, and new platforms such as TT are not in the hands of Meta.
The biggest problem is not just the falling income, but the lack of growth expectations.
The capital market does not just look at income, but more importantly, it looks at what the future expectations are.
Clearly, Meta's expectations were not met.
In order to tell a new story to the market, Zuckerberg talked about "metaverse".
The metaverse is indeed one of the directions for the future, but the implementation cycle of the metaverse is long, and this story is not enough to support Meta's market value in the next two or three years.
Therefore, the next two years should be a difficult period for Meta.
Don't be fooled by Facebook's current prosperity, which has annual revenues of $100 billion to $200 billion. In fact, Facebook now has a very strong sense of crisis. Compared with other Internet enterprises and high-tech companies, it has no good and safe moat.
Although his several social software have a high daily active users and are also mainstream social software, such as Facebook, WhatsApp, etc., but in the face of TikTok's rapid development, Facebook has no confidence, and the overthrow is just a blink of an eye.
The concept of the metaverse, which is beyond reach, has no hope of success in a short period of time, so Facebook is very dangerous. This is also the fundamental reason why Zuckerberg changed the name of the company and kept looking for new tracks. However, I think his choice of track is wrong, and it is a dead end. The above is some of my thoughts, for reference.
Article 17 The state shall implement the registration and practice management system for registered fire engineers.
Those who have obtained the first-level and second-level registered fire engineer qualification certificate can apply for registration as a fire engineer at the corresponding level.
Article 18 The Fire Department of the Ministry of Public Security is a registration approval department for the registration of first-level registered fire engineers.
Provincial, autonomous region and directly-controlled municipal public security fire departments are registration approval departments for second-level registered fire engineer qualifications and are responsible for the preliminary review of first-level registered fire engineer qualifications.
Article 19 People who obtain the first-level or second-level registered fire engineer qualification certificate and apply for registration shall be employed by an approved fire technology service institution or fire safety key unit, and shall submit the registration application materials to the fire department of the public security organ in the place where the employing unit is located (if the employing unit is a company, it shall submit the registration application materials to the fire department of the public security organ in the place where the company is registered).
Article 20 The provincial, autonomous region, and municipal public security fire departments shall, after receiving the registration application materials of the applicant, inform the applicant of all the content that needs to be amended in one time, if the application materials are incomplete or not in accordance with the legal form, either on the spot or within 5 working days, and the application shall be deemed to be accepted from the date of receipt of the application materials if the applicant is not informed within the time limit.
Both accepted and rejected registration applications must be accompanied by a written certificate with the official seal of the local public security fire department and the date noted.
Article 21 The public security fire departments of provinces, autonomous regions, and municipalities directly under the central government shall, within 20 working days from the date of receipt of the registration application, complete the preliminary review of the first-level registration fire engineer qualification registration application materials and the registration approval of the second-level registration fire engineer qualification according to the prescribed conditions and procedures, and report the first-level registration fire engineer qualification registration application materials and the preliminary review opinions to the Fire Bureau of the Ministry of Public Security for approval.
The Fire Department of the Ministry of Public Security shall make a decision on whether to approve within 20 working days from the date of receipt of the application materials and preliminary review opinions submitted by the fire departments of the provincial public security organs.
If the approval decision cannot be made within the specified period, the extended period and reasons shall be notified to the applicant.
For decisions not to approve, the reasons must be stated in writing, and the applicant must be informed of the right to apply for administrative review or to file an administrative lawsuit in accordance with the law.
Article 22 The registration approval department shall, within 10 working days from the date of making the approval decision, issue and deliver the registration certificate at the corresponding level.
Article 23 The validity period of each registration certificate is 3 years.
The registration certificate is a work permit for a registered fire engineer of the corresponding level within its validity period, which is kept and used by the registered fire engineer himself.
Article 24 For those who apply for initial registration, they shall apply within one year from the date of obtaining the first-level or second-level registration fire engineer qualification certificate.
When applying for initial registration in arrears, you must meet the continuing education requirements of this regulation.
The specific measures for the registration management of initial registration, continuation registration, change registration, cancellation registration and non-registration shall be separately stipulated by the Ministry of Public Security.
Article 25 Continuing education is a prerequisite for the renewal, re-registration and overdue initial registration of registered fire engineers.
During each registration period, fire safety engineers at each level should complete the relevant continuing education in accordance with the requirements.
Article 26 The registration approval department shall promptly publish the registration of fire safety engineers to the society, establish an integrity file for registered fire safety engineers, and implement credit management for their business activities.
Article 27 The registration management departments of the registration of fire engineers at all levels should strictly implement the relevant provisions of the Administrative License Law of the People's Republic of China.
This is the end of today's exam information sharing. I hope it can help you.
Everyone must work hard to prepare for the examination, and strive to pass the fire engineer examination as soon as possible!
Real-time sharing of the latest examination information for finance/accounting/construction.
I cancelled - I've been waiting for so long
You keep delaying
However, the whole box of chicken is raw meat and can't be eaten. Can I get a refund?
There was no pineapple, no omelet, and no steamed bun. #PRS_ORG# refunded #NUMBER# yuan
But can you get a refund on the chicken?
Because they were born unable to eat
If I want to cancel? Can I?
The "Peace Rescue-2021" joint military exercise between China and Vietnam has been successfully completed-Xinhuanet
Xinhua News Agency, Hanoi, December 12 (Zhou Na and Teng Huijin) On the morning of the 12th, all the Chinese participants in the “Peace Rescue - 2021” joint military exercise between China and Vietnam safely returned to the Chinese mainland in Guangxi, marking the successful completion of this 7-day exercise.
This joint exercise, the two armies of China and Vietnam focused on the major topic of humanitarian medical rescue, closely related to the mission of military medical support and rescue of the wounded, and completed the joint command of military medical support, joint on-site rescue, and mass casualty treatment according to the practical standards, effectively improving the military medical support capabilities of the two armies.
The exercise results were affirmed by the Chinese and Vietnamese armies.
The Chairman of the Exercise Guidance Committee of Vietnam and the Deputy Director-General and Chief of Staff of the General Logistics Department of the Vietnam People's Army, Ruan Xiongsheng, said at the closing ceremony of the exercise that through this exercise, the Vietnamese military doctors have learned the knowledge of exercise organization and professional activities from the Chinese military doctors, and also saw the medical and support equipment of the Chinese side.
The results of the exercise proved the professional capabilities of the medical forces of the two countries in medical assistance and epidemic prevention and control.
Chen Chunming, the head of the Chinese guidance and coordination group and the deputy director of the Health Bureau of the Central Military Commission's Logistics Support Department, said that this exercise is another innovative practice based on the successful holding of the 2018 joint clinic activity, which has a very important milestone significance.
During the exercise, the People's Liberation Army of China donated medical protective masks, medical protective clothing, and rapid nucleic acid detection instruments to the Vietnamese People's Army.
